ADVERTISEMENT.
Having
obtained the ensuing adventures for
publication, as the reader will see, a circumstance,
which I am about to relate, gave me serious alarm,
lest this volume should be classed with the common
novels and made up stories of the day. It would
give me pain to have it lose the little interest which
might appertain to it, as a recital of plain and
simple matters of fact. My apprehension that such
might be its fate, was excited by hearing, the very
evening after I had completed this compilation
from the notes of Mr. Clenning, a critical dialogue
between two old, spectacled, female, novel-reading,
tea-drinking cronies, as they discussed the merits
of a recently published novel over their evening tea.
I seemed to them to be absorbed in reading the
newspapers; but in truth my ears drank every word.
The incidents of the story upon which they sat in
judgment, were as nearly like this biography of
mine as fiction may approach to fact. I considered
their opinions a kind of forestalling of my doom.
The sprites of the lower country did not pitchfork
the fictitious Don Quixotte with more hearty good
will to the burning depths, as the real Don Quixotte
related their management, than did these excellent
old ladies dispose of this book. The wretch!
said the first; he has removed the landmarks
between history and fable. The fool! said the
other; he does not know how to keep up the
appearance
of probability. My husband inquired
on the spot, said the first, and the people had
never even heard of such a man. The
block-head
!
said the second; he should have laid the
scene just four hundred years back. He
caricatures
nature horribly, said the first. He is
wholly deficient in art and polish, said the second.
It is a poor affair from the beginning, said the
first. The author is only fit to write for the
newspapers
,
said the second. He has been an exact
and humble copyist of Sir Walter Scott, though
he is just a thousand leagues behind him, said the
first. He is nine hundred miles behind Mr. Cooper,
dear man, said the second.
I could proceed to give a chapter of criticism of
this sort, as kind, as discriminating, and as wise
and considerate, as most of the similar discussions
in which poor authors are dished. As I walked
moodily home from this edifying descant, I could
not help reflecting, that this was a fair sample of
what I might expect from nine-tenths of my
readers
,
should I have the fortune to be read; and the
chances of even this, I could not but consider
fearfully
against me. I felt, in reference to the madness
of a rash writer in venturing before the public,
as the Roman poet did of him who first trusted
himself in a frail ship to the winds and the waves.
Then again a change came over my thoughts, and
I took courage as I repeated the old saw,
magna est
veritas, &c
. The plant, thought I, is always strong
where nature works at the root. There is the
appearance
of truth in these adventures, which no art
can pattern. Let them say of me what they choose,
as a writer, so that they allow me fidelity as a
biographer. Let me assert, too, that there are a
thousand stranger histories than this hidden among
our forests. Let our readers see, as we see daily,
men that have distinguished themselves in every
quarter of the world and in every way,
brought up
at last here in the West; let them hear incidents
so marvellous, that I have finally come to consider
nothing strange, or incredible; let them meet with
such personages as I encounter every day, and they
would finally cast off their incredulous temper, and
adopt a more docile and believing frame of mind.
I could relate whole volumes of strange narratives of
marshals, and mariners, and warriors, and poets, and
authors, and actors, from La Salle and Hennepin to
Tecumthe and Thoroughgrabb.
If the reader still inquire, why adventures, like
these of Mr. Clenning, have not found their way to
the Atlantic country before, I answer, that many of
these personages, who have encountered so many
moving accidents by flood and field, have come
to the stillness and repose of our woods, in many
instances, to avoid the annoyance of scribblers, and
newspapers, and biographers, in the hope that they
might here live unnoticed, and die in peace,
without
caricature, puff, or eulogy. There they will
be disappointed. We of the quill mean to
have at
them
, and bring them all forth to the light and the
air. We could find occupation in this business for
a hundred pens, and a life of the length of
Methuselah's
.
If the reader knows any thing about the western
country, he cannot but have heard of the Marine
Settlement, and of the celebrated Mr. Birkbeck.
Here, on one of the most beautiful prairies in the
world, are congregated a number of thriving farmers,
who can milk fifty cows, and set forth half a dozen
stout teams of oxen to turn up the green sward of
their meadows. These men have visited every shore
on the globe; and from ploughing the pathless
brine, have come here to turn up the peaceful
furrow
.
If the reader doubt for a moment whether
Arthur Clenning be a Juan Fernandez, an
Alexander
Selkirk, or a mere man of straw, he owes to
my reputation, as a biographer, to visit that
settlement
,
and ask, in the proper west country phrase,
might there be in your settlement a Mr. Arthur
Clenning
,
who had strange adventures on an island in
the south seas? If he thinks this too heavy a tax,
let him make the same inquiry, post paid, by mail;
and my reputation for fidelity shall be decided by
the response. Not doubting that this point will be
settled to the reader's satisfaction and conviction, I
proceed forthwith to account for the manner in
which I became possessed of the materials of this
biography.
I had perceived in all parts of the western country
how universally, and with what prodigious interest
the adventures of Captain Riley were read. Being
of that unhappy class of men, a writer by
profession
,
and having been for a long time beating the
field, in hopes to start some kind of game worth
pursuing, it occurred to me, that I might visit that
gentleman, and obtain materials for a second
edition
of his life and adventures. The thought came
upon me in all the freshness of a first conception.
The next morning I was on horseback, and crossing
the Mississippi, for I then lived west of that river,
to journey to lake Erie, near which, I had
understood
,
that gentleman lived.
Being in feeble health, I journeyed across the
beautiful prairies east of the Mississippi, admiring
the grand and flowering nature before me at my
leisure. It was delightful weather in the season of
early autumn. On the evening of my second day's
journey on one verge of the vast and fertile plain
to which I have referred, I passed a number of
fine farm houses, and saw others of the same aspect
before me. In the centre, just beside me, and on
the margin of a magnificent wood, was an
establishment
with appendages indicating not only comfort,
but opulence. The house was of brick, painted
white, with pillars supporting piazzas, that ran round
it. Every thing was rural and in good taste. The
whole scene breathed an air of tranquillity, repose,
and abundance. The eye, the imagination, and the
heart rested upon it in a moment. It was one of
those places, where we read by a glance the taste,
thoughts, and character of the inmates. I said to
myself, if a contented and retired mind were to
search the whole earth for a local habitation, here
would it select a resting place.
As I rode, musing and slowly, by this habitation,
I remarked, that murky clouds hung round the
western horizon, and thunder was heard in the
distance
.
It was nearly nightfall, and as I had
ascertained
,
it was some miles to the next inn. I inquired
of a passing traveller, to whom this establishment
belonged? I reckon you are a stranger here, he
replied. Every body knows the rich Clennings.
All these houses, before and behind you, belong to
them; and the owner of this white house is here
called `King of the Clennings.' He has been over
the seas, and has a story to tell, that beats Robinson
Crusoe hollow. He has lately had a fortune fall to
him over the seas. There is not a handsomer lady
than his wife in all Kentucky, which is saying a
great deal. I made some inquiries, whether he was
in the habit of receiving strangers? I reckon so,
was the answer. All the rich people love to go
there, instead of staying at the tavern.
Putting these circumstances along with the
calculations
of an invalid, in respect to the greater
promise of comfort in such a place than in a public
house, and adding to them the necessity of a speedy
shelter from the approaching storm, I dismounted,
knocked, told my story, and was so welcomed, as
to leave no doubt on my mind respecting the
hospitable
intent of the owner of the establishment.
Powerful and continued rains detained me there
two days. He who can say that he has had two
happy days in succession, relates something worthy
of recording in his tablets. I so put it down in
mine. I had breathed, the while, such an
atmosphere
of cheerfulness, contentment and
benevolence
,
that when the clouds began to disperse, and
the blue of the firmament once more to show itself
in the zenith, I almost regretted this admonition of
nature, that I had no longer a plausible pretext to
prolong my stay.
I will attempt no portraiture of the head of this
establishment in this place; for the reader will see
it in the following pages. I do not dare attempt
the thing in reference to his lady. She was, in truth,
so sweet a woman, so beautiful, so good, so
hospitable
without ostentation, so dignified, and yet so
simple in her manners, that if I were to go on with
the painting and colouring that rise to my memory
and my thought, it would only seem as if I were,
in good truth, commencing a novel. Besides, it
might give pain to a certain
lang syne
friend; and
raise the impression, that I indulge my thoughts
and my pen in language not befitting various
circumstances
that appertain to my case. In sober
truth I avow, that although I feel tempted to avail
myself of terms of the age of twenty-one, I believe
my impressions are only the abstract homage of due
sensibility to beauty, loveliness and goodness united.
One salutary result certainly remainedthe
conviction
,
that there can be a really contented,
affectionate
,
and happy family. I always feel an emotion
of thankfulness to Providence, when I see a sensible
proof, that the idea of happiness on the earth is not
an illusive and empty mockery.
I might undertake a portrait of the sweet
Augusta
,
the eldest daughter, a girl apparently of
twelve years, of whom something, also, will appear
in these pages. This was, indeed, one of the
loveliest
girls that I had ever seen. This loveliness
was compounded quite as much of intelligence and
amiability as of beauty. There was mingled with
these charming qualities a certain archness, and
pretty sauciness, smacking considerably of the
fille
gate
, and petted favourite, that threw a touch of
earth on the picture, and reminded one, that she was
not entirely of another order of beings.
Circumstances called the father and mother away,
part of the afternoon previous to my departure, and
Augusta was charged to entertain me in their
absence
.
I believe I had the fortune to be
particularly
acceptable to her; for she showed me her
compositions, her drawings, her collections of
flowers and insects. She played, and sung for me;
and the whole derived a charm from being
apparently
done, as with a view to minister
forgetfulness
to the sufferings of an invalid. My manner
declared what I thought of this little, kind, and
VOL. I.2
ministering beauty. Her perfect frankness won
mine. In remarking upon her letters, and those of
her correspondents, she discovered that I had the
tone and conversation of one, to whom criticism
upon such subjects was familiar. In short, I
inadvertently
disclosed the object of my journey. Her
eye sparkled with pleasure. Why, sir, said she,
with a little ironical archness in her eye, you need
not continue this weary journey in search of a
Tadmor in the desert, when there is here a
Babylon
ready built to your hands, as I read in a speech
the other day. If you want to make a book out of
a voyage, and a shipwreck, my father can furnish
you undisputed adventures, much more striking
than those of Captain Riley. He has written the
whole story on purpose to print it. Sir, I hope
you will say, that there are no books now going
half so pretty. He wrote it before he became rich,
in hopes to make money by printing it. When we
were in the cities, he used to carry his manuscript
to the booksellers. I always pitied my poor dear
father when he came home from seeing those
strange and hard hearted people. I finally teased
him to tell me what the wicked folks said to him;
and he told me that they informed him he had no
name; that the world was full of books, and
language
of that sort. My dear father became rich,
and I thanked God that he would have nothing
more to do with booksellers. Since that, the
manuscript
has been allowed to sleep. I sometimes see
my name in it, and I should be so proud to read
myself in print! If you will take it and print it,
I will answer that my father puts it at your
disposal
.
You are just such a man as I wanted to
seefor you deal with booksellers. I have teased
my father incessantly to publish it. You cannot
tell how delighted I should be to see myself in a
book.
My dear little maiden, said I, do you think
your father would allow you thus to dispose of a
manuscript which, I dare say, is valuable? She
answered me by handing the manuscript. Take
it, said she, if you will, as the gift of Providence,
and ask no questions. The rude people have a
way of calling my father king; and mamma says,
`that Augusta is empress over the king.' How
proud I should be to see this made into a book!
You will find it a pretty, and a well written history,
all but one place in it about me, and you must
scratch all that idle nonsense out. I can promise
you, that if you like it, you can do with the rest as
you please. So saying, she put into my hands the
ponderous manuscript, and skipped out of the
room.
After retiring to my bed-chamber, I surveyed the
manuscript, here and there, by candle-light. It
struck me, that it would make an interesting book.
My vanity indeed whispered me, that I could have
written many parts of it much better myself. But
then, here was a book of real adventures; and if the
reader could only have seen the living actors in this
manuscript as I saw them, I answer, that nothing
more would have been necessary to have engaged
his undivided interest. Many passages, too,
seemed
to me to be written with great spirit and
eloquence
.
It was no trifling consideration, that the
work was finished to my hands, and would save me
a prodigious amount of mental labour, of
arrangement
and preparation. The more I thought of it,
the more it seemed a reasonable and hopeful
speculation
;
and I ended by indulging considerable
solicitude, lest I might find more difficulty with the
father in obtaining the manuscript, than with the
daughter.
At any rate, I had pleasant and golden visions
that night. My mind floated in Elysian dreams,
wandering from the island of the manuscript, to the
content, affection and enjoyment of this charming
family. I dreamed of angels, and digging up
immense
sums of money from the earth. When I
awoke in the morning, I deemed these dreams of
good omen, and prophetic of the money which I
should make from the book.
When I descended to breakfast in the morning, I
found that the father and daughter had talked the
matter of the manuscript over. I assured him, that
I thought the manuscript one of great promise.
Nevertheless, said I, there is no certainty; for
the public is as capricious as a spoiled beauty;
and I added something about compensation. He
smiled, and said, that I must take it as the gift of
his daughter, if at all. I was soon confirmed in
the justice of Augusta's impression, that she was
empress over the king. In short, an unconditional
transfer of the manuscript was made to me. I gave
up the thought of proceeding on my journey to
lake Erie, and Captain Riley's, delighted to have
taken game in such a short hunt, and to recross the
Mississippi, and return to my family. I was as
impatient to give the manuscript to the reader, as,
I dare say, he is to obtain it; and I only add, that
he will find very little of the professed author in the
work, as I have only in a very few instances
departed
a little from the original. I ought also to
advertise the reader, that the complimentary views
of Mr. Clenning's character are found to be in the
hand writing of another person, supposed to be that
of Mrs. Clenning.
2*
CHAPTER I.
Ye country lads of yankee land,
Who live at home at ease,
Ye little know,
What we, poor sailors, undergo
Upon the stormy seas.
Sailor's Song
.
Well
say the ministers,
that the heart is deceitful
.
It may be unconscious vanity that impels me to
wish to relate my history among the rest. The
reader must settle that as he may. He will see,
that I have put myself in earnest to relate the
passages
and adventures of my life. In point of
extent
and number, he will find, that my deeds and
wanderings make no mean figure in comparison
with most that have been told. I think, if the
reader has a sound understanding and a charitable
heart, he will admit, that reading my story on the
whole will have a good moral effect. It is true, the
world has as yet heard nothing of my fame as a
writer; but that is no good reason why it never
should hear of it. I have never written, I admit, a
treatise upon philosophy, or morals: the
community
will have so much the more ground of
confidence
in a plain, straight forward story, related
by a man who could not fabricate and deceive, if
he would.
If I am not a profound scholar, I have seen and
suffered much; and travelling, experience and
misfortunes
,
as I flatter myself, have stood me, in some
measure, instead of the discipline of the schools.
Since I have become richfor I may as well let the
reader into that secret from the beginningit has
been insinuated to me by some friends, who wanted
an endorser, that I have become a better, as well as
a wiser man, for what I have endured. Great part
of what I have to relate, is little more than lonely
records of the feelings of the human heart in a
desert island, penned fresh, as they sprung up in
my bosom. I would have consigned this
manuscript
to the flames, if I had not thought that the
moral on the whole would be a good one. If it be
of any use to disclose the movements of the human
heart with the simplicity of a child, without
concealment
or disguise, my story will not be without
its utility. I am at least confident in my
conscience
,
that I intend no harm. For the rest, it is
modesty and humility, I am sure, which have
prompted me to speak of myself in the third
person
,
and no disposition to copy the example of
Csar in his Commentaries. I wholly disavow,
too, the authorship of any thing in these annuals
complimentary to myself.
Arthur Clenning was born the twelfth day of
July, 1790, on the New York side of lake
Champlain
.
His father, Arthur Clenning, was of Scotch
origin, and both he and his mother were often heard
to say over the winter evening fire, of a highly
respectable
and remotely ancient family. They were
among the first settlers in the north east corner of
New York, then a deep and dreary wilderness.
Arthur was the second generation in descent born
in the country. That he ever improved his slender
advantages for scholarship was, probably, owing
to a feeling of pride of ancestry, hereditary, or
inculcated
,
or, perhaps, both. Having it constantly
taught at home, as a standing article of the domestic
catechism, that he was of a good and an ancient
family, he learned from infancy to think a great
deal of himself. The constant teaching of father
and mother was, Remember, Arthur, you are not a
common boy. Or, think what your forefathers
would have said or done in a like case. Or,
remember
that you are descended from the
Clennings
on the father's side, and the M'Allisters on
the mother's. In this way, though sometimes
poorly clad, and often hungry, Arthur was taught
to draw himself up, stand on his base like a
pyramid
,
and respect himself.
In actual condition, his father was a common
farmer with a hundred and fifty acres of land, and
a numerous family of children, with appetites
always sharp from labour, high health, and a brisk
and Canadian atmosphere. He lived at one
extremity
of a considerable village, with a white
meeting house, a spire, and a settled minister. The
village was built of such materials, and arranged in
such a way, as is calculated to call into action all
the elements of emulation and pride, and all those
inward aspirings, of which such a kind of village,
the free school in it, and the common union of all
the people every Sabbath, on a footing of perfect
equality, are well known by experience to be the
fostering nurse. Many were the early shifts
between
poverty and pride, which native genius,
sharpened by necessity, and nurtured by family
ambition
and example, taught him to make. The praise
was early conceded to his family, as a thing out of
question in the village, that no other family there,
and it might have been added, in the world, could
keep up such a respectable, or as the phrase was,
tidy
outside, with such small means. In fact, the
village was an assemblage of New England people,
and was no more than a slice of New England
transferred to New York, with all the native habits,
good and bad, more firmly fixed by comparison
with the foreign manners of the Dutch, settled in
the vicinity. No where on our globe can there be
found better nurseries of liberty and equality,
emulation
of every sort, and incitement to sharpen the
intellect, than in such a free school as that of this
village. It often enclosed in its narrow walls more
than a hundred scholars, of all ages, conditions
and sizes, from twenty-one to five, and from the
children of the minister, the justice of the peace,
aristocrats by prescription, down to the chubby
sprouts of the blacksmith and the tinker; and from
Susan, the pretty daughter of the patron of the
village
,
whose blond curls fell on her neck, to two
yellow children and three black ones, that sat
at a bench by themselves in one corner of the
school. It is well known, that in those schools
every thing is managed on the code of rough and
tumble, and yet an admirable principle of general
justice, and a fine influence of moral reaction runs
through these nurseries of genuine republicanism,
good sense, and self-respect.
Arthur sometimes made his appearance in this
school clad in ill assorted finery from his crown to
his middle, and thence downwards in ragged
pantaloons
,
without stockings or shoes. Nothing was
so sure to render the scholar a speckled bird,
an object of united ridicule and warfare, as any
attempt at finery, any manifestation of feelings
above the common level. The first miseries
written
upon his memory as lessons, were occasioned
by assumptions of this sort, and by feelings which
had been cherished even from the mother's breast.
He had often experienced the bitter feelings,
inflicted
by the ridicule of the school, elicited by
poor attempts at making a show in dress, or in
some other way dictated by self-importance. Thus
were early taught habits of self watchfulness and
concealment of the feelings.
A single instance will show what was the mode
and measure of retribution inflicted upon these
inward
aspirings, whenever they became manifest.
Arthur had reached the head of a class of thirty, by
spelling, and had displaced from that proud
preeminence
the butcher's son, who generally held
that place. He happened to be unusually fine that
day. The comfortable swelling, nurtured in his
bosom, would not be repressed. His eyes looked,
and his manner showed exultation. As the school
was dismissed, amidst the rush of a hundred
children
,
squeezing from the narrow precincts, he was
making his way among the rest. The displaced
captain of the class elbowed him as they came in
contact. The matter was too palpable to be passed
over in that hour of triumph; and a war of menace
ensued. As soon as they were fairly clear of the
door, the butcher's son repeated some of the proud
sayings of Arthur, cautioning all present not to
think of meddling with the fine young gentleman,
descended from the Clennings and M`Allisters.
The envy of twenty boys was roused at once. As
the dogs of a village assail a stranger cur, all fell
upon Arthur in a moment. He was rolled in the
mud, and beaten without ceremony.
This was but one lesson of a hundred, painful at
the time, but full of moral effect. It is thus that
the independence, self-scrutiny, self-respect, and
the sturdy, unshrinking self-reliance of the northern
character are formed. In this kind of discipline is
formed that sort of mind, that penetrates motive
and investigates character, and creates the yankee
shrewdness, that inspires moral pride and
self-estimation
,
and forms the intrepid soldier and the
unshrinking
mariner, whose characteristic hardihood
is so well understood over all the globe.
At ten, Arthur began to manifest uncommon
fondness for his book, devouring every thing in the
form of reading that the village could furnish.
Books of geography, voyages and travels, were his
favourite reading. This appetite, originally
instinctive
,
received farther incitement from the
praises of the minister and the schoolmaster. To
hear himself called a young book worm by the
one, and distinctly pointed out by the other as the
best scholar in the school, was enough to exalt his
head to the stars. Many and serious were the talks
and counsels of those who wished to please the
family, that such a genius ought to be encouraged,
and that he ought by all means to have, as the
phrase was, a liberal education. The Clennings
were neither loath to hear, nor slow to believe every
word; but their means absolutely forbade. When
the thing was discussed for a moment, other
members
of the family pointed out the partiality and
injustice
of doing for one member of the family what
could not be done for the rest, in colours so striking,
that the proposal never underwent a serious
examination
.
To atone for the grand deficiency of a liberal
education as well as he might, Arthur made
himself
a favourite with the minister, by a docility
which was foreign to his nature, and by reading to
him fair and rather complimentary notes, which
he had taken of some of his best sermons, as he
heard them in the church. The minister was
amiable, modest and exemplary. But what
minister
can resist such a compliment? Arthur had the
satisfaction to see, that he was at once an adopted
favourite. This obtained him the whole range of
the minister's library, and much kind and gratuitous
instruction beside. He had a maiden aunt, too, the
proudest part of the Clenning establishment, who
fostered her virgin pride and honours at a very low
board in the family. Having a pittance of an
annuity
,
she affected the independent lady, and was
equally dreaded and disliked at home and abroad.
To her, besides her small income, had descended
by heritage a wonderfully miscellaneous collection
of books. An apartment was fitted up for these
books, in which the old lady used to knit, and take
snuff, seldom opening a volume herself, except when
some one knocked at her door, in which case she
was found reading in due decorum. Over this
treasure she brooded, like the animal in the
manger
;
for few would suffer the humiliation of her ill
will to get at her books.
To have free admission to this intellectual
treasure
,
Arthur studied her humours, discovered her
ruling propensity, and put himself so wisely and
VOL. I.3
cautiously on the track of gaining her good graces,
that he alone was allowed entr, to read as much,
and as often as he pleased.
From these circumstances, as may be readily
imagined, his education was wonderfully desultory,
and without plan. But this absorbing propensity
for reading, consumed so many of the hours in
which he was expected to have been engaged in the
same labours with the rest of the family, that he
suffered much from chiding and complaints of
indolence
.
As he grew towards maturity, these
complaints
became so frequent, and so wearying, that
he began early to turn his thoughts towards escape
from them, by setting forth into the world, and
becoming
the chooser and maker of his own fortunes.
At nineteen, he could talk fluently from Josephus
and Rollin's Ancient History. Often had he
described
Plato's beard, and the pyramids, to the
chance guest, or inmate of the family. He had
drawn the genealogical tree of the house, and
produced
a treatise upon the heraldic bearings of the
M`Allisters for his maiden aunt. He had written a
fair copy of verses upon the flaxen curls of the
aforesaid Susan, his school-mate. He had
delighted
the very core of the heart of the minister, by
publishing a most extravagantly complimentary
critique of a thanksgiving sermon of his in the
village
newspaper. Besides all these extra
capabilities
,
he was well grounded in the rudiments of a
good plain English education, was reasonably
versed in mathematics, knew the use of the globes,
and, notwithstanding he had understood it was a
bad omen for a scholar, he wrote an uncommonly
fine and fair hand.
Although he sometimes manifested a little of that
finesse and cleaverness, that are supposed to be
natural to the yankee character, in making his
approaches
towards those whose good will he wished
to gain, he was on the whole well principled, and
trained with a fund of moral and religious feeling
and purpose, and a deep and noble internal
determination
never to disgrace the name and blood of
the Clennings and M`Allisters. Add to this, he
had an excellent consitution, and when the snow
whistled over the Green Mountains in his vicinity,
he could eat beef and pudding with any lad of his
size in America. But in the same family there
were eight children, most of whom involuntarily
adopted the admirable maxim for an invalid, of
rising from table with as keen an appetite as they
had at setting down. Of course, dyspepsia was not
in fashion in that family.
At this time, chidden as he was every day for
indolence, often hearing the mournful questionings
of the parents, how they should support so many
hungry children? and his mind and imagination
expatiating in the distant regions about which he
read, he began to feel his purposes ripen to go
abroad, where he could see, and eat more, and be
more entirely master of his own time and thoughts.
His request to be permitted to go to sea, was at
first resisted alike by his parents and the minister.
The motives of the former were mixed. The
latter
,
probably, felt pain at the idea of losing so
gifted a hearer, and so partial a critic. But he
finally brought the maiden aunt to his side; and
she, from spending her annuity in the family, had
a preponderating influence. Yet with her
appliances
in his favour, it was nearly a year before he
obtained unequivocal permission to go to sea.
It ought to be recorded, as a due tribute to the
rest of the family, that when this consent was
gained, and this purpose announced, the parents,
the brothers and sisters, felt regret and sorrow at
the thought of the parting that approached.
Perhaps
they even repented the severe and complaining
remarks which they had made, concerning his
indolence
.
But it was a numerous family. Seven
children still remained. Anxieties for the food and
clothing of so large a family in rather straightened
circumstances, and the tranquillizing effect of daily
toil, prevented these sensations from rising to a
painful excess. His father went to New York, with
other objects indeed, but chiefly to obtain a place
for his son on board of some ship. By great good
fortune, he obtained the birth of steward on board
the packet ship Powhatan, bound from New York
to Liverpool. An uncommon concurrence of
circumstances
only, could have brought about this
success. The Captain was a native of Plattsburg,
had known Mr. Clenning, and, on a particular
occasion
,
had received favours from him, which he
had never forgotten. Mr. Clenning learned, that
there were at least a dozen applications for this
single birth of steward, all accompanied by
certificates
and recommendations of uncles and cousins,
with testimonials of uncommon cleverness and
education
.
It may be supposed, that this was most
gratifying intelligence to Arthur on the return of
his father, and the more so, as he heard with
delight
of the wonderful apparatus for cookery, and
the rich abundance of stores on board the ship.
Intellectual as he was, it went joyfully to the heart
of the lad to believe, that, having charge of the
stores of the ship, he should never again be obliged
to stint his appetite; and resolutely did he
determine
,
that neither passengers nor crew should ever
eat the detestable salt meat broth, which had made
such an essential part of the Spartan provisions at
home.
When the day of parting came, the minister
blessed him. Susan looked melancholy. The
villagers
shook hands with him, wished him a good
voyage, and forgot him in their own
thought-dispelling
occupations. The maiden aunt bade him
bear her remembrances to father-land, and not
forget
that he was descended from the M`Allisters.
His brothers and sisters appeared to feel more than
could have been expected. His parents would have
been inconsolable, had they not had seven more to
love and feed, after he should be gone. In short,
just as much feeling and regret was manifested in
this case, as is generally shown in like
circumstances
any where but in books. For Arthur
himself
,
3*
when he left the humble roof, the quiet home,
the generally affectionate and pious parents, and,
more than all, when about to make a turn in his
path which would hide the house, the village, the
spire, the lake, and the scenes of his infancy, and
his daily walks and inspection from view, and
perhaps
for ever, all the feelings natural to an
unsophisticated
heart, rushed upon him. The perils of
the ocean, the sense of distance and loneliness came
over his mind, and he began to contemplate the
rashness and folly of foregoing the homely, but
sure care of such a mother as his, for the
indifference
of strangers. The first half hour after his
native village was hidden from his view, brought
with it misgiving and shrinking from the hazards
of his purpose, and almost a half formed wish to
return. Inexpressible feelings of shrinking and
gloom had the master sway over his mind for some
time. But the propensity to rove was engrafted on
his mind. He was naturally of a buoyant and
cheerful disposition, inclined to see things on the
bright side. He began to count up his capabilities.
He remembered how often he had defeated the
village
lawyer in his argument, and put the minister
to the extent of his powers, to answer his objections.
He had heard an hundred times, and in as many
ways, that he was an uncommonly likely young
man. He was going to seek his fortune, and he
felt a proud consciousness, that descended, and
educated, and trained as he was, he could and
would do nothing that should disgrace his name
and character. The world, upon which he was
entering, received from his sanguine temperament,
the gay colouring of youthful vision. He was
going to England, from the land of woods and
nature to the land of splendour, luxury, and art.
He was going to see his great relatives in Scotland;
for he was charged to visit the ancestral stem, as
soon as he should arrive in the old world. A
presentiment
,
that he should return with riches and
honours, to make a figure in the eye of the
fair-haired
Susan, and those of the village who had
manifested feelings of envy towards him, was not
without its influence in soothing his feelings of
loneliness at quitting the paternal home.
Alternating between views, at one time of this
cast, and at another of discouragement and
homesickness
,
he arrived at his new and strange position
on shipboard. He put himself resolutely to learn
the duties of his office, and in a few days was at
ease in them. The voyage was short, pleasant and
prosperous. A steady breeze propelled the ship
so smoothly on her course, that he did not even
experience
sea sickness. The stern despotism on
shipboard
at first militated strongly with his republican
habits and feelings. Once or twice, the tone in
which certain duties were enjoined upon him, caused
thoughts of resistance to arise in his bosom. But a
specimen or two of the manner in which the captain
managed insubordination, had a wonderful effect
to inspire a docile and faithful execution of all the
orders with which he was charged.
In twenty-eight days from the time in which he
left his native village, on foot and alone, he was in
Liverpool, as though dropped from the clouds.
The Powhatan was to stay some time at that port,
and then return direct to America. To return in
her was no part of his purpose. He remembered
his promise, and the charge of his parents, and
determined
immediately to set out on a visit to his
relatives in Scotland. He received the pittance of
his wages, put his effects into a bandanna
handkerchief
,
received the good wishes of the crew, and
a hearty shake of the hand from the captain, and
whistled off for Scotland with as much gaiety as he
could assume. There is no accounting for the
impulses
of our feelings at different times, and under
different circumstances. No parting had ever
affected
him so painfully as when, at the head of the
street, he turned round to take a last look of the
stars and stripes
of the good ship Powhatan. At
that parting he seemed to lose parents, friends,
country, home, and every thing, and to be about to
identify his existence and thoughts with a world
entirely
new. As he waved his hand, and said,
farewell
stars and stripes of my country, an effort was
necessary to repel the moisture from forming in his
eye. The distant prospect of the blue hills of
Scotland
,
too, rolled up with so much freshness the
remembrance
of the beautiful and interminable line
of the Green Mountains, in view of which he had
been reared, gave him a distinct perception of the
horrible feeling of home sickness.
On the third day of his journey, the frowning
mountains that he had been constantly nearing, had
begun to assume that distinctness of outline, and
that visible dimension of the objects on their
summits
,
as convinced him, he must be near that point
of the Highlands where his relatives resided. He
began to inquire of the passengers that he
accidentally
met on the road, if they could direct him
to the Clennings and the M`Allisters. A grin in
his face, and some quizzical remark in broad Scotch,
which he hardly comprehended, was generally the
response that he obtained. Ridicule is not apt to
sit easy on any mind, but to the young mind it is
particularly annoying. Arthur had not learned to
curse; but he offered a trial of his yankee sinew
and muscle to some of these passengers, who
carried
their jokes, as he thought, a little too far. At
lengh, when he almost desponded of finding any
one who could or chose to give him any direction
to these much sought relatives, he chanced upon a
considerate resident in the vicinity, who put him on
his way.
The Clennings lived on the first ascents of the
hills, and the M`Allisters still deeper in the glens
of the mountains. It is natural for us to measure
the cordiality of the greeting, which we expect from
friends, not only from having heard affectionate
and frequent mention of them, but by the trouble
we have taken to find them out, and arrive at their
residence. Many a winter's evening had Arthur
heard beguiled with stories of the antiquity and
importance of these people, whom he had travelled
one hundred and fifty miles on foot to visit. He
had heard much, too, about the eagerness and
warmth with which the Scotch feel and recognize
the ties of relationship to the third and fourth
generation
.
For the first time in his life he had been
cast wholly upon strangers, and treated with the
careless indifference which nature's commoners
bestow
upon each other; and his heart now craved
the kindness of friendship and consanguinity, rather
with the earnestness of appetite, than calculation.
Judge, then, his disappointment, when, after
crossing
the threshold of a large stone farm-house, he
was harshly asked in broad Scotch what he wished
of the Clennings. He was manifestly received by
the head of the family, a tall, lean, and hard
favoured
farmer, as if he was supposed to have come
to help devour them. Never was more mortifying
scrutiny, than that which he was compelled to
undergo
in order to prove his identity. It was not
without the most diligent and severe sifting into all
the circumstances appended to his connection with
them, that he was allowed to be a scion of the
genuine
wood. It was clear to him, that they
considered
the American branches as alien and
degenerate
parts of the tree. Often, while encountering
the circumstances of this harsh and unkind
reception
,
so different from that which his fancy had
sketched, did he reproach himself in the bitterness
of his spirit, for the reckless folly which had
tempted
him away from the sure welcome of home, to
try the hospitality of strangers. It is only in such
places, that we learn the value of the sacred hearth,
and that dear spot, our home. But he was at length
grudgingly admitted, as it seemed to him, upon the
single ground of his being a Clenning. A most
repulsive comparison of this reception with the
common hospitality proferred even to strangers at
his own home, instantly and painfully suggested
itself
.
He soon realized, too, that the evils from
which he had wished to fly at home, for instance
poverty and pride, might exist elsewhere. He found
that these evils were appended to the condition of
the Clennings of the old world still more forcibly
than to that of the new. He saw, that the bard
had reason, who said, that we go beyond the seas,
and shift our sky and climate, without changing
our mind or circumstances. Indeed, apart from
all the partialities of a son, Arthur could not help
thinking the American branch of the family as not
only the most easy and abundant in their
circumstances
,
but least ridiculous in their assumption,
and intrinsically the most amiable and respectable.
Evidently to the joy of the Scotch Clennings,
Arthur soon took his departure, to scramble up the
hills to visit the M`Allisters. Here he found
something
more of cordiality in his reception. But the
ill star of the race seemed to have the ascendant
here also, for the M`Allisters, however disposed to
be kind, were still poorer than the Clennings.
Between
these kindred races, he contented himself, as
he might, a number of weeks, occasionally lending
his aid to the prosecution of their rural labours, that
he might not be burdensome. In the progress of
this acquaintance, he made full proof of his
comparative
scholarship with the numerous race of the
Clennings and M`Allisters; and convinced them,
as well as himself, that the American was by for
the better disciplined and instructed member of that
ancient race. This and various other
circumstances
subjected him to painful manifestations of
pride, jealousy and envy, which required all his
prudence and forbearance so to manage, as not to
evince either poverty of spirit, or disposition to
quarrel with his relatives and his host.
By a steady perseverance in such a course, he
was gradually trampling over these mean, but
natural
feelings on the part of the young men of the
establishments, and was evidently making rapid
advances
in the good graces of the female members,
one or two of whom were very beautiful. On the
part of one of these fair third cousins he was given
with sufficient clearness to understand, that she had
no fears of the wide Atlantic, nor objections to a
residence in the American woods. This partiality
soon became manifest to the two families. They
evidently recoiled from the thought of such a
misalliance
on the side of their beauty, and betrayed
sufficient marks of a disposition to get rid of him.
His wages had all been spent in articles of dress,
that he might not shame his relatives by his
appearance
.
The youth was in the interior of Scotland,
a stranger in a strange land, without money or
connexions
.
His prospects on the whole were
sufficiently
gloomy. He wrote a letter, rather
desponding
in its tone, to his parents, and made known to
his ancient relatives his purpose to return to
Liverpool
,
and try the seas again. The pride of the
family, and perhaps more worthy and generous
feelings were aroused in his favour, and the rather,
as they said, that he gave no countenance to the
partiality of his fair relative.
A large armed ship, The Australasia, in the
service of the East India Company, was fitting up to
carry out passengers to New Holland. The
commander
,
Captain Clenning, was a connection of the
family, and was supposed to have an affection for
the beautiful Miss Clenning that had manifested
such evident partiality for Arthur. The family
made interest with Captain Clenning to obtain a
place for him on board his ship. The birth of
steward on board this ship was offered him, and
never came proposal more opportunely. Weary
of his dependent and disagreeable condition, he
would have preferred a condition still more menial,
to have got rid of dependence upon his ancient
relatives
.
With all his ambition, and high purposes,
rather would he have returned to America, and
have gone into the fields as a day labourer for life,
than have seen himself exposed from day to day to
internal feelings of dislike and contempt, poorly
disguised by his host under the semblance of
countenance
,
graciousness and protection.
Thankful was Arthur to Providence for this
VOL. I.4
chance, which, bring what humiliation it might,
was preferable to his condition there. With much
more cheerfulness of heart than he left Liverpool to
visit his ancient blooded kinsfolk, did he once more
bundle up his whole baggage in his bandanna
handkerchief
,
and prepare to make his way back to
Liverpool
on foot. The parting from the M'Allisters
and Clennings was an affair poorly got up.
Gladness
on the part of all the concern but one, was
thinly disguised by the appearance of sorrow, and
the famed tenderness of Scotch relationship.
For this time, Arthur left the house of relatives
and acquaintances with pleasure, and felt himself a
free man when his foot once more pressed the
plains, and he saw no faces but those of strangers.
The sight of the stars and stripes in Liverpool
once more kindled the deep affections, and painfully
called up the thoughts of sacred home and the Green
Mountains. It was hard to resist the united
movements
of the love of country, of friends and home,
and the deep craving of the heart for the
countenance
and the voice of acquaintances, and pass
by these ships that bore the emblem of his country.
But the offer of the place on board the Australasia,
seemed to him as the call of Providence; and
besides
,
he reflected, that even on board the American
ships he would be as entirely a stranger, and as
completely unknown, as in that foreign ship. He
passed over the cable of one of his country's ships,
adding hastily, not now, nor never, unless I can
return to thee with reputation and wealth. But
when I forget thee
, my country,
may my right hand
forget her cunning
.
Amidst a moving crowd of passengers and their
friends, making their way on board the Australasia
for embarkation, he descended to the cabin of this
large and noble ship. More than a hundred
passengers
were to embark with him. They were
taking
in great numbers of sheep and other animals,
to carry to the distant regions of the south seas. A
hundred convicts were also to be transported in the
same bottom. To one who has not seen the hurry
and bustle of such a scene of preparation, to remove
so many human beings to the opposite extremity
of the globe, and most of them, doubtless, for ever,
it would be useless to attempt to describe it. Had
he felt less personal interest in this note of
preparation
,
the whole, as calling into operation all the
movements of the human heart, and all the actings
of the human passions, would have furnished a
spectacle
of intense interest. In one quarter, closely
confined and guarded, were the outcast malefactors,
with the mark of contempt and reprobation fixed
upon them. Some of them were clad in tattered
finery. More than half were females, some having
countenances that were once evidently beautiful.
One or two faces were still exquisitely so. All
were haggard, sin-worn, and with the marks of guilt
and shame on their brow. On the other hand were
the hardy tars, hurrying to and fro in their
appropriate
dresses, and busily engaged in the
preparations
for departure. There were the passengers,
with mixed views and motives, preparing to fix
themselves
in another hemisphere, all concealing in their
bosoms expectations of more wealth, importance, or
enjoyment, in thus shifting their position to a new
quarter of the globe. He could not fail to remark,
that one of the passengers was a stout and portly
man, nobly dressed, with a look of importance, a
step of dignity, and an air of authority and
self-importance
on his countenance and his whole
deportment
.
He seemedto compare great things to
littlelike the king bee of the hive. Deference and
homage were marked in the manner of every one
on board, as he stepped on deck. On his arm hung
a young girl of exquisite beauty and loveliness of
person; nor, distant as were the condition and hopes
of the friendless American steward from any
prospect
that he could ever approach these people on
a footing of equality, did he fail to have his pulses
quickened by knowing, that a lady of so much
loveliness
of person was destined to share the same
dangers of the ocean with himself, and be cooped
within such narrow limits, from which there was no
escape during a voyage of months.
In due time all the parting embraces were given
and taken. This moving colony of men and
animals
was bestowed on board the precincts of the
ship. The convicts were crowded forward to their
prison. The fasts were cast off. The cry of
Yo,
heave!
arose from the mariners, and the mass of life
moved slowly away from the wharf. In casting his
eye over this crowd of people, with whom his lot
was now identified for so long a voyage, the first
obvious thought of Arthur was, that among all on
board there was not a single associate for him. The
captain, though a Clenning, had a cool and stern
haughtiness of manner towards him, which said
sufficiently
plainly, that he must keep his distance, and
not expect to be recognised as a relation. The
sailors whispered the odious appellation
yankee
, as
they passed him. The passengers of wealth, witl
their families, were, as too often happens, more
insolent
,
inversely, as their real rank and consequence
were less; and if they thought of him at all, would
only consider him as intermediate between menial
and companion, and of course interdicted from any
intercouse in either relation. His duties would
often bring him in contact with the convicts, with
whom any intimacy was out of the question. The
idea of being in a perfect solitude in the midst of
four hundred human beings, all to be included for
months in the narrow precincts of a ship, making
her way over the trackless waters, was sufficiently
painful, as well as humiliating.
To show that Arthur was a practical philosopher,
young and undisciplined as he may be supposed
to have been; to prove that he acted as every one
ought, with a mark, an aim, and by system, and
that he did not float along the current of time as
most young men do, without plan or object, it will
only be necessary to record his rules of conduct
reduced
to writing, and upon which he appears to
have acted, as steady and invariable principles.
4*
1. My place is an humble one. I have therefore
so much the more need of caution in my
deportment
,
to render it respectable.
2. I will always measure back a little, and not
much more civility than I receive.
3. I will always be strictly temperate; command
my temper, my thoughts and words; and in my
deportment
,
balance rather towards the grave than the
gay.
The vessel set sail with a fair wind, and was soon
beyond the view of the white cliffs of England,
leaving no mark on which the eye could rest, but
the sky and the sea. It would be useless to make
many observations upon a voyage that almost
includes
the circuit of the globe. If much nautical
remark were given, if an accurate journal were
detailed, and if every thing appertaining to the
weather, the ship, her course and progress on the
voyage, were noted in the full and accurate terms
of sea technics, but few would understand the
language
,
and still fewer would be interested in it.
Every thing that relates to nautical science and
seamanship
,
will therefore be omitted, and such terms,
and such language only will be used, as may be
supposed to be familiar to landsmen, and within the
comprehension of every reader.
For the first and second month, the ship had a
pleasant and steady breeze with little intermission
of light and baffling winds. Arthur made it a point
to understand his duty and to discharge it most
punctiliously, and to the letter. Having, as has
been remarked, an uncommonly fine person and
figure, in the tediousness and ennui of a sea
voyage
,
and in the want of other objects of
observation
,
a person so often in the view of every one as
the ship's steward, could not fail to have been the
theme of that kind of interest and discussion, that
every character on shipboard undergoes in such
circumstance. Various and wavering estimates of
him appeared to have been formed at different
times. His common denomination with the
passengers
was, the handsome yankee. The sailors
designated him by a coarser epithet. An attention
to his duty at once civil, stern and undeviating,
could not but win him a certain degree of respect.
Such deportment always counts, and has an
undefinable
influence. Some pronounced him a
quaker, some a methodist, and some a conceited
and impertinent republican. It must have been
particularly soothing to the feelings of a young
man to perceive, that he always received a due
observance
from the ladies on board.
No part of his duty was more trying, than his
necessary intercourse with the female convicts.
Challenges, curses, derision, immodest looks,
gestures
and words, soon forced him to a hasty retreat,
which never failed to produce such a shout of
ridicule
at his expense, as scarce even the
firm
philosopher
,
much less a fine looking young man, can bear.
This was the more trying, as among them there
was one girl, scarcely past eighteen in appearance,
not only of extreme beauty, but of the most modest
and graceful manners. Katharine Olney, for so
she was called, always attempted to repress this
manner in her abandoned associates, always spoke
gently to the steward. This of course identified
her with him in the coarse ridicule of the rest, and
many were the rude jests of the inmates of their
quarters upon the modest and sentimental lovers,
as they were termed. So often had such language
occurred in this intercourse, so often had he seen
this girl distressed and in tears, in her attempts to
repress the abandoned deportment of the rest, that
a deep feeling of shame, pity, and sorrow always
came upon him, as he entered the quarters of the
convicts. It will readily be supposed, that it
required
no small degree of philosophy and
forbearance
in him, not to be moved with this distress of
the beautiful Katharine Olney. The temptation
was increased, when this forlorn and abandoned
girl, whose hopes had been blighted in the bud,
told him her tale of sorrow and ruin, and implored
his pity and confidence, while she spoke of her
hopeless prospects in the country to which she was
going. Natural and unaffected grace was in all
she said or did. She sung most charmingly. She
always seemed modest, and wore that touching
aspect of sorrow, humiliation, and resignation to
her forlorn condition, which are so peculiarly
calculated
to touch the sympathy, and engage the still
deeper interest of such a mind as his.
Every one knows that a sea voyage, especially
one of such length as that from England to New
Holland, is the most tedious and monotonous
business
in nature. The continued recurrence of the
same objects and scenes, and the weariness and
disgust
which they excite, especially in minds not
amply stored with the materials of thinking,
abundantly
prove, that we were made to range amidst
that variety of objects that nature has every where
placed around us. Every mode and form of
amusement
were put in requisition. Music, cards,
conversation
,
promenading, every thing had been tried,
until in turn it had become wearisome. This ennui
seemed to manifest itself most painfully among the
ladies.
Among the number on whom it shed its baneful
influence, was the young lady of whom mention has
already been made. Augusta Wellman was the
only child of a proud and disappointed courtier,
whose self-importance was measured by his wealth,
which was immense, and concentrated by having
obtained a high office at the close of a falling
ministry
,
with whom he fell. He retired to his estates
in the country, carrying with him this single and
lovely daughter, as proud as himself. His
scheming
mind in the country preyed upon itself. He
finally took the whim of becoming a patron and a
leader in practical farming. He had made his
speechhad distributed premiums, and been the
Mecnas of agriculture. He became infected with
the prevalent propensity of the time, to increase the
stock of merino sheep. A wealthy acquaintance
had already emigrated to New Holland, and had
entered largely into the business of raising merinos
in that country. He had written back to his friend
such flattering accounts of the country, and its
prospects
and capabilities, especially for that branch
of farming, and had presented such favourable
estimates of the climate, as delicious and salubrious,
and tending to prolong life for such kind of worn
down epicures as he was, that he had finally come
to the determination to transport himself to the
other extremity of the globe; and as he could not
be a great man in England, to render himself
decidedly
the greatest, as he would be the richest
man in New Holland. A flock of merinos was
transported with him. An ulterior object, it was
whispered on board, was to marry his proud and
beautiful daughter, to the only son of his rich
friend, already settled in New Holland.
Augusta Wellman was aged eighteen, gay,
carressed
,
and spoiled at once by indulgence and
denial
,
if such an enigma may be uttered. She
appeared
beautiful and capricious; and to be a strange
combination of sensibility and pride. Such a
voyage
is sure to call forth all the strong points and
propensities of every shade of character. Even the
common sailors on board could have made shrewd
conjectures touching her mind and disposition, and
the still more palpable traits of her haughty, cold,
stern, avaricious and unfeeling father, who knew
no other qualification than wealth, was wrapped
up in immeasurable estimates of his own
importance
,
and who loved his beautiful daughter, only
as she was identified with his possessions, and the
perpetuation of his name and estates.
For a few days, this proud beauty was under a
most guarded and vigilant watch. The father, in
the plenitude of confidence in his own sagacity and
foresight, had calculated, and surveyed every person
on shipboard, from whom danger might be
apprehended
,
as having designs upon his daughter as
an object of fortune hunting. He had settled down
to the conviction, that there was not the slightest
danger from any individual on board. An
indulgence
and a license of range was, in consequence,
allowed to his daughter, such as she had never
experienced
before. For a while, the novelty of this
extended range delighted her. She was as gay as
a lamb, bounding in the first sunny days of spring.
Even Mr. Wellman, insensible and austere as he
was, felt the cheering influence of her gaiety. The
gay, the beautiful Miss Wellman, was the delight
of every body on board. Wherever she moved,
the most assiduous attention followed her, much to
the annoyance and envy of the ladies on board,
that were less favoured by beauty and fortune.
But in a few days, the tiresome monotony of
every thing on board wore out this flow of spirits.
Every variety of amusement had been tried to
weariness. The grand scenery of the Cape of
Good Hope and Table Bay had been passed. The
ship was almost becalmed in the bland and sultry
atmosphere of the tropics. Augusta had ceased to
take any interest in her promenade, her harp and
piano, her conversation and the gallantry of her
admirers. She had received all the homage that
could be levied from every gentleman on board, in
all the combinations that their wits could devise,
and served up with every spice that could render
it piquant, until the whole had become perfectly
cloying and insipid.
One of the most wearing duties of the steward
in these cases of ennui, and the thirst of the sultry
weather, was to furnish lemonade and sherbet for
the passengers. The skill and assiduity of Arthur
in making these drinks, won many compliments
from the ladies for the handsome yankee. For
some days the frequent calls of the fair heiress for
lemonade, passed unnoticed by him as matters of
course, and growing out of the thirst inspired by
the heat. It was at length discovered by him,
that in her caprice of taste, and wearied with her
empire over the gentlemen passengers, she had
made a study of him for the sake of variety. The
proud humility of his deportment, the erectness of
manner, with which, like another Mordecai, he met
the condescending badinage of this Vashti, piqued
her, by interesting her vanity and her curiosity.
Here was a man of fine form and person in humble
life, whose eye flashed, and who seemed to want
neither understanding, feeling, nor spirit, who did
not appear to acknowledge in his manner, that he
was disposed to show her any of that homage and
admiration that was paid her, even by the sailors
as she passed them. This circumstance became
more piquant, when she learned that he was an
American, a variety of the species which she had
been taught to consider as a kind of half tamed
savages. When she travelled into his precincts,
ostensibly for the purpose of drinking lemonade,
he could not but discover, that her real object was
to play off upon him a kind of badinage, half
playful
,
half in ridicule; and to treat him with a sort of
condescending and yet degarding equality. She
soon discovered, with equal astonishment and
interest
,
that he expressed himself with grace and
fluency, that he had read and reflected much more
than herself, and she was made sensible of
intellectual
inferiority in the case of a person, whom she
had supposed as much her inferior in mind and
cultivation, as in fortune and condition. This
discovery
contributed to give edge to her curiosity;
and the entire absence of all suspicion, touching
this intercourse on the part of her father, gave her
all latitude and every desired opportunity for the
indulgence of it.
He on his part, piqued also with a condescension
which was evidently composed chiefly of pride and
scorn, made it a point to be very respectful, and
yet erect. He measured out to her with guarded
observance, all the deference due to her condition,
but always resolutely avoided paying her the least
particle of that kind of homage that she seemed
alone to prize, and which was so constantly paid
her by every other person on board, the homage
bestowed on a young, proud, and conscious beauty.
VOL. I.5
He was pleased to find, that she had tact to
discriminate
this deficiency and to feel it acutely.
There is no condition in life so humble as to be
beyond the range of the ambition of conquest, in
such a mind as hers; and to suppose that he,
however
different in condition, did not enjoy the
consciousness
that he piqued her vanity and wounded
her pride, would be to suppose him more or less
than man.
The united influence of pique and curiosity, and
desire to humble even the ship's steward under the
influence of her charms, a new study of human
nature
opened before her, in this unbending
American
,
equally handsome and insensible, an object of
interest and distraction from the tiresomeness of
the voyage, which so increased the frequency of
her visits, as to render them perplexing, and at
times almost annoying. They became more
questionable
and unpleasant to his balanced and correct
views of propriety, by being evidently sought as
free from inspection as the case would admit. At
one time, she affected to enter into conversation with
him on the equality of a young lady with a young
gentleman, whose society she sought for the mere
pleasure of it. At the next call, she adopted the
tone of speaking to a servant, whose character was
a kind of monstrous and unnatural rarity, from
knowing more and looking higher, than might be
expected from his place. She was probably
sometimes
in doubt, whether the sturdy insensibility to
her charms which he seemed to manifest, resulted
from ignorance and obtuseness of feeling, or from
plan and design. Whatever view she took of the
subject, manifestly gave excitement to her curiosity,
and frequency to her visits.
One day, as she came for her usual conversation
and lemonade, she appeared to be suffering alike
from the extreme heat and from ennui. She
yawned
repeatedly while her lemonade was preparing,
and showed in her countenance traces of real
suffering
from lassitude and debility. Steward,
said she, I shall tire to death on board this weary
ship. Never was such a stupid collection of
mortals
found in one place. Nothing but sky, and sea,
and heat, and dull people. You will have to
answer
for my death. To make the affair worse, you
give us nothing fit to eat or to drink. It is
absolute
starvation both of body and mind. Your
lemonade is as mawkish as the ship's water. Yet
you seem to be a very learned and knowing sort
of a personage. Fie on you, Mr. Steward! Are
all your American people such a tall, grim,
tasteless
race of beings? He answered, that she must
be aware, that they could command neither the
varieties of a market, nor ice, nor fresh lemons, on
so long a voyage; that he hoped she would
understand
the difficulties of the case, and be indulgent
to make allowances, and to believe, that he tasked
his best powers to make the passengers comfortable.
He added, that if his means equalled his wishes,
she should not want nectar and ambrosia, nor the
luxuries and delights of the Houri.
It was the first compliment which the steward
had ever attempted to pay her. She held up her
hands in ironical and well dissembled astonishment.
Nectar and ambrosia! said she, in a tone of
amazement. Nectar and ambrosia indeed! Why
are you not a yankee, steward? Do you ever
meet Houri in your woods, steward? I had heard
that your people drank whiskey. Have you ever
tasted ambrosia? Not at all, replied Arthur.
But every one in my country reads novels, and
we not only know that there are such personages
as Houri, but are exceedingly prone to worship
them. Indeed, you have! said she. I dare
say, you have often perpetrated the wit of
comparing
your rustic beauties to these same Houri
before. He replied, that although there were
few in his country to compare in beauty with Miss
Wellman, what they wanted in that point, they
more than compensated in humility, amiable
manners
,
and modesty, and that they sought rather to
conquer by gentleness, than the mere blaze and
display of personal charms.
She evidently felt, and most keenly, the important
of what the steward had wished to say. Her father
happened to come up as this dialogue passed, and
while she was still holding up her hands in
counterfeited
astonishment. My dear father, said she,
you have little imagined what a knowing man we
have to make our beverage for us. I wish to apprise
you, that you may henceforward treat him with
more respect. Would you believe him, that they
have Houri in his country, and drink nectar
instead
of whiskey? Saying this, she walked away
with her father, manifesting obvious pique in her
countenance, as she went.
After an absence of a day or two, these visits
were renewed, and became more frequent; and she
continued to accord the steward so much notice
and regard, and so protracted her conversations
with him, that she began to excite the notice and
remark of the passengers. By a steady and
unalterable
adherence to his maxims and principles,
Arthur found, that he had travelled through every
degree of estimation in the minds of the passengers,
from dislike to confidence, and from that to regard.
He often received ironical and left handed
compliments
,
on having been the only person on board
that seemed to have won any degree of favourable
notice from the proud heiress. But he never for a
moment forgot his principles, or the kind of
deportment
prescribed alike by duty and self-respect.
When Miss Wellman saw him evidently hold back
from applying her marked attentions in his favour,
the conduct seemed to her perfectly inexplicable.
She attempted to expound the enigma in vain.
Sometimes pride and disdain came to her aid, and
she abstained a whole day from a visit. Then
pique, curiosity, and a disposition to solve the
riddle
,
caused her visits to become more frequent than
ever.
All this license had resulted from the
circumstance
,
that her arrogant father had never dreamed
5*
that merit, and talent, and interest, are sometimes
disguised in a humble condition; that an
intelligent
girl, whose thoughts had never been
disciplined
,
might very naturally make comparisons
between insipid men in the dress of gentlemen, and
a gifted and fine young man, whose talents and
accomplishments even counted beyond their value,
from being discovered in a condition where they
were so little to have been expected. But some
person on board, either a gossip or envious, finally
opened his eyes to the state of the case. He came
one day upon his daughter, when she was
chattering
away in her accustomed style with the steward,
about the nectar, ambrosia, and Houri of his
country
.
He darted a glance of inexpressible
contempt
upon him. His daughter's countenance
quailed under his angry and flashing eye, and
became
as pale as death. Whatever language he
used in the case, or what measures he took, was
not known. The effect was, that she came for
lemonade
no more, nor spoke to him again, during
the voyage, except in the tone of the most distant
and measured civility.
It may not be said that he felt no pain at this
deprivation. Guarded and distant as he had been
in his manner of receiving her courtesies and
conversations, to have the intercourse thus rudely
broken off, and with such palpable contempt on
the part of the father, was a bitter humiliation.
About the same time, another disagreeable incident
occurred to interrupt the tranquil order of his duties.
A petty officer, whose command allowed him
occasional
visits among the convicts, had been smitten
with Katharine Olney, and had availed himself of
every opportunity of access to the convicts'
quarters
,
to pursue his suit, as much to the annoyance
and terror of the penitent and unhappy girl, as to
the malignant envy of most of the other wretched
women. From the first day, she had manifested
towards Arthur, not the partiality of affection, but of
sisterly confidence. This feeling had been
strengthening
with the intercourse of every day. She had
finally come to regard him with the frank and
confiding
trust of that relation. Nor, with such a
character
and heart as he possessed, could he be
supposed
to be indifferent to the pleading confidence of
such a fair penitent, so young, so humble, and,
apparently
,
reformed, and whose ruin common report
traced to the basest treachery and a combination of
circumstances that few could be imagined capable
of resisting. From the persecutions of the young
officer of the commissary, she appealed for the
protection of Arthur, and he would have denied
the blood of his father and his country to have
refused it.
The consequence was, a most violent quarrel with
the young officer. He rushed upon the steward,
when on deck, with his dirk. Fortunately, he
averted the blow, wrested the weapon from the
assailant, and, in the heat of the affray, handled
him so roughly, that he was severely bruised. The
steward was arrested and confined, and a general
prejudice against him, as an insolent and
quarrelsome
foreigner, pervaded the whole ship's company.
The affair, however, underwent a severe, but a fair
investigation. Katharine Olney gave evidence that
strongly tended to remove the general impression
against him. It was long afterwards before he
learned that more effectual intercession was made
in his favour from another quarter. He was not
only honourably acquitted, but the result of the
trial, so different from the first impressions against
him, manifestly raised his character with the
passengers
.
He was no longer estimated a stiff and
ignorant rustic, a methodist, or a quaker. But a
romantic tale of his being a young man of ancient
Scotch descent and fallen fortunes, and the most
chivalrous courage, and generous and noble
bearing
,
circulated in lieu of the reports that had gone
against him the day before. Henceforward he was
treated, not only with kindness, but marked
attention
;
and the discharge of his duties was so
peaceful
and pleasant, that he began to look forward to
the termination of the voyage, and to his being
turned loose upon the strange and distant world
of New Holland with apprehension and solicitude.
The pleasantness of the voyage continued until
after the ship had passed not far from Sumatra,
and was supposed to be nearing New Holland.
The weather at last began to change; not suddenly,
but an almost imperceptible and leaden-coloured
gloom grew upon the sky. The season of the
monsoon seemed to be anticipated. First, a thick
mist arose from the sea with drizzling rain, and
winds that shifted to every point of the compass in
the course of a single hour. The sky was
continually
accumulating gloom, and the wind freshening
until it blew a gale. Arthur now saw, for the first
time, the terrific spectacle of a high and heavy sea.
A chill went to his unpractised heart, as he looked
abroad upon the illimitable expanse of dark blue
mountains, with their curling, whitened, and
rolling
summits. Mountain dashed against mountain,
and the ship, which looked so stately and swan-like
upon a smooth sea, seemed like some little frail
speck of matter, ready to be plunged for ever
beneath
the foaming abyss. Nothing but the long
experience of practised seamen, could inspire any
other persuasion, than that at every plunge down
the declivity of the billow, the ship would be
merged in the yawning gulf below. The
debilitating
and unnerving effect of sea-sickness added
its physical influence to the awfulness of the
spectacle
,
in impressing his mind. Words lose their
power, when we wish to convey an adequate idea
of the aspect of the sea in such a storm, or the
feeling
of weakness and desolation, as the beholder
views himself, far removed from all succour, on
the trackless and angry waste, and can only look
up to that invisible and awful Manager of the
elements
,
who seems to manifest his purpose in the
increasing terrors of the tempest, the deafening
roar of the winds and commotion of the waves,
and whose response, thus manifested, indicates, that
application, even to him, is either not heard, or
not regarded.
Much, and often, as he saw the increasing horrors
of the tempest, and dismay of his companions in
danger, did he think of the security and tranquillity
of his quiet home under the sleeping Green
Mountains
;
of the calm and noiseless course of events
under the nursing eye of his mother, from year to
year. He meditated, that comparison was too late,
and in witnessing the distracting terror, which was
becoming general on board, with the disinterested
feeling of a mind naturally noble, he lost his own.
Not but he viewed the sea, as it seemed to others,
an angry and devouring power, ready to execute
its gigantic and brute vengeance upon them. Not
but his imagination, like the rest, could descend to
the sea-green caves of poetry, on the bottom of the
depths, a thousand fathoms below. Not but he
could imagine the bleaching and swollen corses,
and the hollows of the eyes in the skulls, filled with
pearls. But he consoled himself, that drowning
had been said to be the easiest mode of that death,
which, in some form, was inevitable. He thought,
from how many sorrows an early death would free
him. He whispered the earnest prayers of
confidence
and affection to his heavenly Father, and
moral courage, calmness, and resignation, came
over his mind. He became thus more capable of
inculcating calmness and self-possession upon the
rest.
What with the increasing uproar of the storm,
the sea-sickness, and the growing apprehensions
and despair, no words could adequately describe
the scene on board. Here was seen, how quick
community of extreme danger, and the immediate
and threatening terrors of death, level the
adventitious
barriers of pride, and the self-consequence of
rank and distinction. Sense of the subordination
necessary for self preservation kept up the requisite
authority of command. But in other respects,
every person on board seemed to be of one
standing
.
Some of the convicts were pale, in silent
horror
.
Others, reckless and intoxicated, sang snatches
of obscene songs, or uttered horrid ejaculations of
joy, that the happy, and the rich, and the fair, and
the undefiled in reputation, had to share the same
fate, and be drowned with them. In another place,
lips which had never uttered prayers before, moved
in the earnestness of petitions for the divine mercy.
In another place, the passengers, male and female,
crowded round the captain, and other officers of
the ship, imploring them to inform them what were
the prospects, and if they had ever encountered
such a storm before, or if there were any hopes
of weathering the gale; and their countenances
brightened with hope, or they betook themselves
to prayer, as the answers were encouraging or
otherwise. There were two mothers on board,
with infants at their breasts. There was something
affecting, and of the moral sublime, in the calm
and impassive fortitude with which they clasped the
dear babes to their bosoms, and moved their lips,
as they looked upwards.
Of all the passengers, no one manifested more
calmness than the beautiful Katharine Olney. The
convicts, no longer guarded, mingled on deck with
the rest. Arthur saw her leaning over the tafrail
of the ship, as it took its prodigious leaps up and
down the mountain surges, or as the waves burst
on the deck. Her countenance was pale. Her
dishevelled hair streamed in the winds, and she was
drenched with the spray. But she alone seemed
at home in the commotion, and to view the whole
scene with the calmness of one who had nothing to
fear nor to lose. In the momentary intervals of
the roar of the winds, and the cries of the sailors,
and the shrieks of terror, her sweet voice was heard
singing the beautiful song,
Farewell, ye green fields.
She beckoned Arthur to her side, and sung to a
rich and delightful melody the following charming
verses from Mrs. Hemans.
What hid'st thou in thy treasure-caves and cells?
Thou hollow-sounding, and mysterious main!
Pale glistening pearls, and rainbow-colour'd shells,
Bright things, which gleam unreck'd of, and in vain!
Keep, keep thy riches, melancholy sea!
We ask not such from thee.
Yet more, the depths have more!what wealth untold,
Far down, and shining through their stillness lies!
Thou hast the starry gems, the burning gold,
Won from ten thousand royal Argosies!
Sweep o'er thy spoils, thou wild and wrathful main!
Earth claims not these again.
Yet more, the depths have more! thy waves have roll'd
Above the cities of a world gone by!
Sand hath fill'd up the palaces of old,
Sea-weed o'ergrown the halls of revelry.
Dash o'er them, ocean! in thy scornful play!
Man yields them to decay.
Yet more! the billows and the depths have more!
High hearts and brave are gather'd to thy breast!
They hear not now the booming waters roar,
The battle-thunders will not break their rest.
Keep thy red gold and gems, thou stormy grave!
Give back the true and brave!
Give back the lost and lovely!those for whom
The place was kept at board and hearth so long,
The prayer went up through midnight's breathless gloom,
And the vain yearning woke 'midst festal song!
Hold fast thy buried isles, thy towers o'erthrown
But all is not thine own.
To thee the love of woman hath gone down,
Dark flow thy tides o'er manhood's noble head,
O'er youth's bright locks, and beauty's flowery crown,
Yet must thou hear a voiceRestore the dead!
Earth shall reclaim her precious things from thee!
Restore the dead, thou sea!
To hear this beautiful and desolate girl raising her
rich voice amidst the uproar of the storm, sounded
VOL. I.6
on the ear of Arthur, as the dirge of lament over
the ship and the crew. He asked her how it
happened
,
that she alone was calm in the midst of such
threatening prospects, and such general terror and
consternation. She paused from her song to
answer
,
and her eyes filled with tears. Time was,
said she, my friend Arthur, when I, too, should have
trembled, and when I should have recoiled from
making my last bed in this tumultuous sea. But that
day has past. Love, and fame, and hope, and all for
which mortals hope or desire life, are alike extinct.
There is not a ray of light for me below the sun.
What should I have done, how should I have lived
at Botany Bay? I had begun to cherish for you,
especially since you so kindly interposed for me,
the affectionate feelings of a sister. But my regard
for you was too sincere, even to wish to have been
recognized by you at Botany Bay. How dreadful is
the doom of infamy! It carries its own
contamination
even to those that would wipe it away. There
is a chance that you may survive this storm, and
escape in the boats, or on the wreck. There is none
for me. Should you ever return to England,
present
this little package to my mother, according to
the direction. When she shall see it, it will be all
that will remain of her only and ill fated child. You
ask me why I am calm? I look to these waves as
an asylum. When the water shall rush into my
ears, nature may recoil for a moment. To embrace
the cold and barren billow, in the tranquil sleep of
death, is all that now remains for Katharine Olney.
Saying this, she put into his hands a small package,
addressed to her mother, and walked calmly away,
resuming her song, Farewell, ye green fields.
The storm, meanwhile, increased in fury. The
captain continued to answer, that all was well, and
that there was little danger, though his countenance,
and that of the most experienced mariners, told a
very different tale. The whole ship's company
were mixed in indiscriminate confusion. Every
wave that broke upon the deck, began to penetrate
to the cabin, and every thing on board was drenched
with the spray. The ship laboured, and the seams
began to open. When the mountain billow burst,
a thrilling shriek would ensue. Some counselled
this, and some that, project of safety. Some were
for lightening the ship, and some for laying her
out of her course, to let her move more directly
before
the wind; others were discussing the chances
of taking, in the final extremity, to the long boat;
and as the boats could not possibly live with all the
company on board, some were ineffectually
proposing
to determine by lot, who, in the last emergency,
should have the chance of the long boat. It was
an impressive view of the earnestness of invention,
and the instinctive keenness of anxiety for
self-preservation
,
suggested by the dread of death.
Arthur once more came in contact with Miss
Wellman. Her haughty and avaricious father, now
absorbed with a deeper sentiment than concern for
his daughter, while he held fast to the rigging,
and watched, with apprehension and horror, the
terrible commotion abroad, forgot his anxiety for
her, in still deeper concern for himself. It was not
without extreme difficulty, and being often thrown
down, that she reached Arthur, who was holding
to the mainmast. She calmly asked him what he
thought of the prospect, and the chances of the
storm subsiding, or the ship surviving it. He spoke
with all the assurance that the case would possibly
admit, confessing that he was little qualified to
judge. She complimented him, on his seeming to
be almost alone in preserving self-possession,
adding
,
that it was no more than what she had expected
of him. She remarked, that the chances seemed to
be slender, and against them. As a proof of her
good opinion of him, she continued, she requested
him, in the last extremity, to give any chance that
might be allowed of escape, to her father, who was
feeble and infirm, and would be utterly incapable
of making any exertion for himself. For me, she
said, with a sad smile, so that you can preserve him,
leave me to my fate. She apologised for making
these requests to him, that she was but too well
aware that most of the passengers, however capable
of compliments and professions in the hour of
security
,
would think only of themselves in the period
of scramble, danger, and death.
Waves now at intervals began to sweep the whole
length of the ship. When such a wave was shipped,
the crash, the uproar, the cries of the sailors, the
creaking and shivering of the ship, the sweeping of
the upper works, the consternation and despair,
visible in every face, the drenching floods of rain
that came pouring from the sky, as well as the
dashing
of the spray from the sea, seemed to leave little
room for additional shading to the horrors of the
scene. But when the night came on, thick, dark,
and dreary; when water, notwithstanding the plying
of all the pumps, had gained the cabin from below
as well as above; when every ray of light was
extinct
,
except occasional gleams of lightning, that
only passed across the ship to render darkness
visible for a moment; it was then perceived, how
many successive shades of horror our progress
towards
the last hour can assume. All description
would fail, in depicting the gloom of so many
countenances, as the pitchy darkness of that night
settled over them. Thunder, lightning, rain in
torrents, the howling of the wind, the vessel
plunging
along among the mountain billows, the gradual
sinking of the shrieks under deck from mere terror
and exhaustion; these were among the prominent
and striking features of that awful scene.
The ship, however, survived all the horrors of
that long night of Egyptian darkness; and the
people once more saw the dim and misty light of
the morning. But it only served to show to the
forlorn
inmates of the ship, that her power of
sustaining
the waves was gradually sinking; only to
convince
them, by her quivering and reeling as the
wave struck her, that she must soon, and inevitably
be wrecked. At ten there was the cry of a new
leak. Every person, who was able to stand at the
6*
pump, was put in requisition. To the other
distresses
,
was now added that of wearying and
exhausting
labour. Notwithstanding the exertions
even of desperation, the water rapidly gained upon
the ship, and the cry of three, and four feet water,
was succeeded only by short intervals. Another
night was coming on; and on every brow was
written
the conviction, that the ship could not survive
another night. All subordination, except between
the captain and crew, was at an end. They still
kept their places, and performed their duty, under
all these circumstances of despair. In them was seen
the effect of years of training, of stern discipline,
and implicit obedience. The exertions of these
intrepid men, under such circumstances, added a
sublime moral interest to the scene. The
boat-swain's
whistle, and the shrill and clear cries of the
captain, were still heard from interval to interval,
and the seamen still managed their cordage, and
clung to their ropes, after all hope of being saved
had been relinquished.
At nine in the evening, a tremendous wave burst
upon the Australasia, that seemed to open the seams
of the ship from the bows to the stern. Amidst the
pitchy darkness, and the deafening uproar, it was
instantly manifest to all on board, that some new
disaster had happened. Instantly every person
below, that was able to mount, was on deck. It
was then discovered, that the greater portion of the
people on board, were gone with all the boats.
The ship was left to her fate. She wore and
capsized
.
The few who remained, soon cleared the
masts from the ship. Arthur remembered the charge
of Miss Wellman; but neither father nor daughter
could be seen in the confusion and darkness. By
a flash of lightning, he discovered a detached mast,
which still floated near the ship which was evidently
sinking. He plunged into the sea, and held fast to
the mast.
From that moment, he was unconscious of the
fate of all on board, but himself. He was so often
plunged beneath the waves, and swallowed so much
water, that he soon became exhausted; and so lost
to all that passed, as to retain very imperfect
recollections
of a scene, in which some hours must
have elapsed. He clung with the grasping hold
of instinct to his mast. At length, at no great
distance
,
appeared before him immense piles,
apparently
of flame. Enough of thought and reason
remained to convince him, that it was the
phosphoric
aspect of the waves, dashing upon rocks.
The view, by inspiring the hope that the shore was
near, restored him to consciousness and exertion.
He perceived that he was drifting upon land, and
that the surf was bursting upon rocks just before
him. Providence guided the mast to which he
clung between two jutting cliffs, to appearance only
far enough apart to permit it to float between them.
Between them it did float; and, in a moment
afterwards
,
struck upon the beach. He had not sufficient
strength to hold to the earth, though he felt it with
his feet. He was once more swept back into the
deep by the recoil of the surf, and was again buried
under the wave. He awakened to hope and
consciousness
for a moment, only to feel this renewed
plunge in the waves with aggravated bitterness.
He remembered the rushing noise of water in his
ears, and the flashing of a thousand fleaks of glaring
light from his strained eyes, and a kind of
convulsive
and sinking horror was his last recollection.
His next sensation was as of recovering from
exhausting sickness, and a faint sensation of light
opening upon his eyes, and a painful but unavailing
attempt to comprehend where he was. The ripple
of the wave, just dashing upon his feet, began, by
degrees
,
to impress that truth upon him. He extended
his hands and feet, and felt the soft and wet sand
upon which he lay. Faint gleams of morning
twilight
enlightened the sky; but without light enough
to render objects distinctly visible through a thick
mist. He began to comprehend distinctly, that the
surf still rippled but a step from him; and he still
felt the chill of the waters occasionally dashing upon
his feet. He found a violent exertion necessary to
drag himself a little distance from the surge. This
effort was sufficient to exhaust him. He drew his
feet under him, to remove the chill, and recover the
vital warmth. A full sense of his condition came
over him. He thought of his dear home, of his
affectionate parents, the sweet spot where he had
drawn his first breath, the blue line of his native
mountains, and all the tender remembrances that
are the last images to crowd on the mind of the
stranger, who sinks in a foreign land. He felt a
sinking and careless tranquillity. Objects swam
before his eyes, as in fainting. He considered
himself sinking in his last sleep, whispered his last
prayers, and resigned himself to die.
He evidently slept some hours; for, when he
opened his eyes, it was in the full glare of the
meridian
sun, which shone intensely on his head. The
beautiful and flying clouds that
come after the rain
,
flitted occasionally across his glaring disk, and
tempered the dazzling radiance of the sky. He
looked round him, as one awakening from a painful
and feverish dream. The dreariness of his forlorn
and desolate condition rushed upon him, along
with the grateful sentiment, that he was almost
miraculously delivered from the waves. He found
himself lying on a clean white sand beach. Two
paces only from his feet dashed the subsiding waves
of the late storm. On each side of him towered
gigantic cliffs of black and volcanic stone, whose
bases resounded with the hoarse and incessant
lashing
of the surge. Through the opening in the cliffs
was seen the
broad, flat sea
, still whitened with
the foaming of the late storm. Beyond, a belt of
clean white sand rose, like a glacis, from the beach;
a kind of smooth lawn, carpeted with grass, and
enamelled with flowers. It was sparsely studded
with trees of a new and foreign aspect; their tall,
straight stems rising, like columns, to an
astonishing
height, without a branch. They were
surmounted
at the summit with interlaced branches,
spreading, like an immense umbrella, with foliage
of prodigious size and most brilliant verdure.
Oppressed with the heat and the glare of the sun,
he dragged his weary limbs to the shade of one of
these trees; and half raising himself, looked round
upon a prospect at once inexpressibly lovely and
desolate. With the weakness and exhaustion, he
felt a new and strange sensation, at once of sinking
and of pain, which he judged to be the effect of
extreme hunger. Though in other respects
tranquil
and free from pain, he was aware, that unless
he could soon find food, he must perish of hunger,
after escaping the perils of shipwreck. At the
same time, such was his extreme weakness, that had
food been placed visibly before him, at any
considerable
distance, he was sensible that he could not
have commanded the effort necessary to reach it.
He felt that no time was to be lost in making his
best efforts for food, while any strength yet
remained
to him. By repeated and painful efforts
he reached the beach. Who can imagine his joy
on discovering a cask of bread lying on the margin
of the river, bearing the brand of the Australasia?
True, it was bilged; and the hard bread was swelled
and drenched with the salt water. But, tasteless as
it was, it was the staff of life. As he appeased his
hunger his strength returned, and with it the usual
keenness of perception.
With his recovered strength, he rolled the cask
up the beach, calculating that it contained the
means of subsistence, at least for a time. He looked
up to that universal and affectionate Father in
heaven, who spreads the common feast for all that
live; and tears of gratitude and joy filled his eyes,
and the voiceless eloquence of a grateful heart
ascended
,
in prayer and thanksgiving, to the eternal
throne. Somewhat refreshed, and now able to walk,
he once more directed his steps to the shade. The
sun sank in dazzling splendour behind the trees,
and cast his crimson colouring far off on the waves.
Birds of brilliant plumage and foreign song
commenced
their preludes of the evening hymn of
nature
.
At a distance in the forest, he heard the
melancholy cry continually sinking away, and
renewed
,
in strains half human, and yet of such mild
and feeble plaintiveness, as to raise no impressions
of ferocity and danger. He looked a moment in the
direction of the cry. But objects again swam
before
his vision. Streams of variegated light flashed
again in his eyes. He felt that he was sinking to
sleep. For one moment he was conscious to the
danger of passing the night exposed to serpents, to
be devoured by wild beasts, or slain by savages, and
to be wet with the dews of the night. But there
was no other alternative, than to take whatever
dangers might present. A house, seen at the
distance
of half a mile, might as well, for his strength,
have been removed a hundred leagues.
CHAPTER II.
I shall visit dear Lochaber no more.
Ye winds, that have made me your sport,
Convey to this desolate shore
Some cordial endearing report,
Of a land I shall visit no more.
Cowper
.
He
awoke the next morning, as the sun was
raising
his broad and purple forehead from the ocean,
pouring his oblique rays through the trees, and
awakening a thousand songs from the tenants of
their shade. The balmy freshness of morning,
mingling the aroma of the tropical verdure and
flowers with the evaporating dew, filled the
atmosphere
.
The gently-rippling bosom of the ocean
was purpled with the waxing splendours of the sun.
The youthful solitary arose, refreshed and thankful
for the boon of such an existence, though alone to
enjoy it. He looked up to Him, who, for some
kind and wise purpose had saved him, while so
many others had perished. The beauty and
freshness
of the renovated nature, in which he stood
alone, spoke to his heart, that, though far removed
from the companionship of man, God was there.
His first act was that of devout and heartfelt
thanksgivings
to the preserver of his life, and the author
of this glorious nature. He earnestly invoked the
Divine benedictions on his parents and friends, and
thought keenly and with bitter self-reproach upon
his indifference to the society of his brothers, sisters,
and friends, while he was yet with them; and alone
as he was with his conscience and God, he felt what
a blessing the companionship of friends is, and how
differently he would act his part in it, could he but
share it again.
Having finished his devotions, he walked to the
beach. He trembled, lest some wild animal should
have found and preyed upon his priceless stock of
bread. But it was still unharmed. A few
shellfish
,
found on the beach, satisfied his craving for
animal food, and along with bread, bitter and salt
with sea water, made him a breakfast, that hunger
and a sense of the mercy of the Almighty, in
granting
even this resource from dying with famine,
rendered palatable. To secure this supply of bread
from future danger was his first effort.
He dared not trust it exposed on the naked
beach, until he should have explored the region on
which he was cast. He rolled it, with great labour
and toil, to the cliff on the shore, and by strong
exertion, raised it to such a height on the table
surface of a perpendicular elevation of the cliff, as
would secure it from becoming the prey of beasts,
and the cask preserved it from the ravages of the
birds of prey, that were hovering in great numbers
on the shore.
VOL. I.7
At ease upon a point so vital to his subsistence,
so many thoughts and meditations crowded upon
him, that it was long before he could command
sufficient singleness of calculation to view his new
position, or come to any definite conclusion what
was next to be done. He paced slowly, back and
forward, with his hand upon his brow, and engaged
in intense and painful thought. There was a
splendour
and beauty in the solitary scene before him,
which filled his eye. But society alone cheers, and
satisfies the heart; and the first thought, from the
view of every thing before him, untouched by the
axe, unmarked by the hand, unimpressed by the
footstep of man, was, that he was the only human
being that existed in this charming solitude. Such
a beautiful nature only speaks to the heart, when
we feel that others enjoy it with us; that other
eyes sympathize with ours in the pleasures of vision,
and that other hearts commune with us in our joys.
Well say the Scriptures,
that it is not good for man
to be alone
.
Still, as a lover of nature, the vividness and
freshness
of the landscape made its way to his heart;
and he paused, as he slowly sauntered among the
trees, in admiration of the novelty and splendour
of the new creation round him. He admired the
trees, that reared their straight columns so high in
the air, their trunks enwrapped with the tender and
beautifully formed foliage of vines, and their
cone-shaped
tops spreading an alcove of verdure; birds
chiding and singing on their summits, of a plumage
of indescribable richness, and forms entirely new;
sea fowls, with their necks stretched out in
advance
of their bodies like an arrow, screaming and
sailing between the trees and the cliffs; animals of
a size and colour, wholly foreign to his eye,
frolicking
on the trees; a clear brook winding from the
cliffs, and its waters dancing along in the
sunbeams
.
Such was the prospect upon which he
gazed. In the distance, a single animal of
uncouth
appearance, nearly of the height of man, and
moving on, by bounding in leaps of a dozen feet
at a spring, was known to him, from the
resemblance
to engravings which he had seen, as a
kangaroo
.
This animal he well knew to be harmless;
nor had he yet seen an object to inspire fear, or a
sense of danger.
Not far before him, a prodigious cliff towered on
the shore of the sea, overlooking every object but
the mountains, which rose at the distance of a mile
from the shore. To think of climbing them for a
survey of the country, was a project too arduous
for his present strength. He walked slowly to the
cliff. In the direction of the sea, nothing was
visible
but the boundless and heaving billow; on the
immediate skirt of the sea, nothing but continued
ranges of these black cliffs, continually lashed by
the foam of the surge, that tumbled upon their
bases. Through the interior, at the distance of
one and two miles, and in some places a league,
there sprang from the smooth grass turf a barrier,
almost as regular as a wall, to an immense height,
and composed of the same black and volcanic rock
with the cliffs on the shore. At an elevation of,
perhaps, three hundred feet, there was a narrow
grass terrace, enamelled with the most brilliant
flowers, hanging from flexile stems, and contrasting
delightfully with the black and shining masses of
rock, which they covered. From this terrace
mounted another wall to another terrace. By these
regular gradations, sloping back like the sides of a
pyramid, the black walls rose into mountains above
the region of the clouds. The aspect of the beauty
of the trees, received almost a terrific contrast from
the frowning, gigantic, and savage grandeur of
these mountains, upon whose summits, smoking
with volcanic fires that were never quenched, the
clouds rested, and the thunders burst. The regular
belt of open woods between their vases, carpeted
with grass, formed a beautiful and equable stripe
of verdure, contrasting in its amenity and softness,
with the awful mountains that bounded it on one
side; and the white and sterile sands, and the blue
and boundless billow, that skirted it on the other.
It was the labour of half an hour to gain the
summit of the cliff before him. The rounding of
the shore indicated an island. No contiguous
islands or rocks, rose from the bosom of the wave.
The sky, shining in cloudless and tropical
brightness
;
the illimitable sea, undotted by a sail; the
repelling loneliness and immensity of sterile nature
stretched in front; and volcanic mountains, that
arrested the clouds behind, were the grand features
of the scene, which spread above, around, and
below the young solitary. From the cliff, he
descended
to wander in the woods along the smooth
carpet of grass, preserving a parallel distance
between
the mountains and the sea. He cast a
surveying
eye around him, as he made his way along
the grassy and flowering sward, often crossing rills
of pure water that wound from the base of the
mountains
,
through the grass and flowers. He came
upon rivulets, and beautiful little streams; but still
seeing the same birds, the same animals, barren
trees, and gaudy and unknown flowers, the same
screaming flights of sea fowls, and the same
monotonous
beauty of animal and vegetable nature.
To his view, there was something in this sterile and
useless exuberance and gaudiness of nature, these
beautiful flowers that shed their perfumes upon the
desert air, and this soothing amenity of the
landscape
,
that almost had the aspect of mocking his
solitude. It may be, said he to himself, as his
heart thrilled with the momentary suggestion, it
may be, that the same Providence which brought
me to land, has cast some of my companions on
this same solitude, and that at this moment, like
me, they are wandering in search of the same
objects
,
society, food, and shelter. The impulse to
make known his presence by calling upon them,
was too powerful to be resisted. Companion!
Companion! he cried, I, too, am alone! He
waited a moment almost in terror, as a thousand
magnified voices answered from the mountains,
7*
Alone! alone! The deafening sounds seemed
the reply of a thousand giants, that inhabited the
caves of the mountains. He waited in breathless
anxiety, till the remote reverberations, Alone!
alone! died away, and his calmer reason
convinced
him, that these cries were no more than the
responses of echo. He sat him down in the shade,
and his eyes filled with involuntary tears. The
birds on the trees, said he, have their families
and their loves. The animals play in groups, and
each one at night retires to kindred shelter and
society. But thou, who hast left a father's house,
unconscious of the value of home, and unthankful
for the comforts and joys of society, wilt fall
unpitied
,
unrelieved and alone, in the desert, and
probably, human eye will never see thy bleached
bones. Oh! here, at such a time and place, is the
response of the heart to all that the impious and
unbelieving have said against religion. In this
extreme
desertion, his heart betook itself to the ever
present Divinity. Father in heaven, said he,
Thy spirit hovers over the deep. Thou dwellest
above these mountains. They who pray to Thee in
my father's house in company, and I who pray to
Thee in this solitude, both speak to the same ever
present, ever gracious Being. Blessed be thy
name, that I can commune with Thee, if with none
beside. Pity, sustain, and shelter me, forlorn and
lonely as I am, with a sense of thy presence. Thou
hast planted in my bosom this earnest craving for
the society of my kind. Either in thy good time
and way, restore me to my kind, or be Thou to
me society, consolation and hope, so long as Thou
shalt see fit to continue me in life. Whenever
Thou shalt see fit to remove me from this solitary
communion with Thee below, may it be to the
multitudes which no man can number, who exult in
thy presence above.
Thus tranquillized, composed, and fortified with
prayer, he looked to the coming night without
distressing
anxiety. He had charged himself on
Him,
who heareth the young ravens when they cry
; and he
saw the sun descending almost with a feeling of
cheerfulness. There was an inexplicable feeling,
that inclined him to consider the spot, where he
first awoke to consciousness on the shore, as his
home. He marked it out on the sand. In the
temperature of that climate, it was the place most
cool and grateful to his feelings for sleep, and
gladly would he have stretched himself there for
the night. But on the naked beach, he would be
exposed not only to be devoured by wild beasts,
but to the still more certain danger of sickness
from the evening dews. His first object was to find
a shelter for the night. The next point of interest
was, to search for some regular dependence for food
and subsistence, when his bread should be
exhausted
.
His third grand object was, to explore
the country, and ascertain whether it was an island
upon which he was cast, or a part of the shore of
New Holland, or New Britain.
His own inference, from the evidence before him
was, that he had been wrecked near one of the
volcanic islands, that rise in such numbers from the
depths of the South Sea. He remembered, that
during the storm, they had been driven rapidly to
the south; and that he had supposed, that they had
drifted into the vicinity of New Holland, or New
Britain. He remembered to have read, that these
volcanic islands had been but partially explored;
that some of them were scarcely known, except by
a casual notice in the journal of a ship's course; and
that most of them were considered uninhabited.
They were also situated remote from the track of
any but exploring ships, and his prospect, on the
face of it, was, that he was the only one of the
ship's company that survived, and that he was
destined to spend his days, and perish alone on the
island.
How bitterly he remembered the truth of the
common adage, that we know the value of
nothing
,
until we want it. As the sun began to
decline
,
and the gloom of evening advanced from the
east, he remembered, how often he had slighted
the advances of others to his intimacy; how often
he had indulged notions of superiority; how much
importance he had been taught to attach to the
point, of not associating with persons below him.
He had now at his leisure, an opportunity to
consider
the moral character of that pride, that had
made such calculations, and to understand the true
value of a companion. The most despised being
in his native village would have here been sought,
as the highest earthly boon. His feelings would
have been consulted with the most careful delicacy.
Could he have had even his father's house dog for
a companion, he would have felt comparatively
happy.
He had wandered, perhaps, two leagues from the
point where he was cast ashore. He had seen in
all the distance, no animals of any size, but
kangaroos
;
and the timid manner in which they
avoided him, evidenced that he had nothing to
apprehend
from them. But he was not sufficiently
acquainted with the natural history of this region
to judge, whether there might not still be beasts of
prey. His fears would naturally suggest, that there
were. He had seen serpents, but they seemed
rather of the harmless class, than those deadly ones,
that generally inhabit tropical regions. The place
might be inhabited, though he no where saw the
trace of human footstep. The dews of the night
were like rains; and he well understood, how
adverse
they were to life in such climates. He made
his way to the foot of the mountains, and employed
the fading twilight in searching along their bases
for some cavern of retirement and shelter. But he
sought in vain. The first bench of ascent was, for
the most part, a smooth, shining and perpendicular
wall of three hundred feet in height, without fissure,
or interstice. He found a somewhat thicker shade
where a number of small trees interlaced their
branches, and wove together a thickness of foliage,
which looked as if it would exclude the dew, and
partially even the rain. He pulled up, and spread
a bed of dry grass, and laid himself down under the
dark canopy, to find such repose as he might, in
communion with his heart and with God. His
repose
was that of innocence, and his sleep as that
of the grave. The stars rolled their courses, and
the night birds and beasts cried unheeded. No
dreams even of home mocked him, and when he
sprang up from his grass couch in the morning,
wakened by the chattering and the songs of birds
in the branches over his head, the last moment of
remembrance at night, and the first consciousness
of morning, were only two successive moments
without an interval.
When he went forth from his covert, the
cheerfulness
of nature and morning was in his heart, and
he joined the birds, and the joyous morning cry of
every living thing, in a hymn of praise to the
Divinity
,
as the sun was springing up from the depths
of the sea. His devotions finished, he travelled
with the speed excited by a keen appetite, to the
point where he had secured his cask of bread. He
saw no place, that promised so good and safe a
shelter, as that which he had occupied that night.
Thither he determined to remove his stock of bread.
He found, to his terror, that the bread, damaged
by the sea water, would soon be so completely
spoiled by the heat, as to become incapable of
serving him for food. This was another reason
why this all-important treasure should be removed,
separated, spread, and parched in the sun. To have
spread it on the cliff, would have been to have
exposed it to be devoured by the hundred birds of
prey.
Little as he had been used to dainties, or to
consult his appetite, this bread, mouldy and salt,
was but an unsavoury repast. Not an oyster, not
even a shrimp, or the smallest shell-fish, was to be
found on the shore. Not the slightest indication of
any thing, that looked like fruit, or that promised
to serve for sustenance, had been seen in his long
walk of the preceding day. The thought of the
terrible death of hunger, struck upon his heart,
like an ice-bolt. He remembered the precious
words, that
not a sparrow falleth to the ground without
our heavenly Father
, and the thought dispelled his
fears, and renewed his courage. He examined the
shore anew, in search of oysters. From a large
flat surface of rocks beyond the cliff, that bounded
one extremity of the cove, he observed that the
wave retired at times, and left it bare. When the
wave returned, it was again covered deep with
water. As he contemplated the surface, when bare,
it seemed rough, as if with the slightly jagged
surface
of an oyster-bed. In the hope of making such
an invaluable discovery, he hastily undressed, and
plunged into the water. He had learned
to
be
an expert swimmer in the waters of his native
lake. The coolness and purity of the sea waters
refreshed him. Watching the proper moment of
the receding wave, he sprang past the point of the
cliff, and stood erect on the ooze of the naked,
table-surface. His joy may be imagined, when
his conjectures were fully realized. For a great
distance along the base of the cliff, and as far under
the water as he could see, all was a rich and
extensive
oyster-bed. He took as many as he could
hold in his hands; and found that he could
conveniently
throw them on shore. He watched the
return
of the refluent wave, and by a dexterous dive,
rose upon its surface, suspending himself until it
receded again. In this way, he had soon thrown
on shore an ample supply, and found them of the
finest kind. He returned to complete his morning
meal, thankfully looking up to the Giver of all
good for a supply of food at once nutritive, and
apparently inexhaustible. Henceforward to have
distrusted Providence, would have seemed to him
as a crime.
How easily, and rapidly the mind passes from
despondence to joy. Abundantly refreshed with
food, and braced by sea bathing, he ascended the
verdant lawn with an alert step, and a heart filled
with tranquillity, if not with joy. He almost
forgot
his loneliness, as he walked amidst a nature, as
fresh and brilliant as the creation on its first
morning
.
The birds, large and small, with their gaudy
plumage, and their wild and chattering songs, seemed
so tame, and so little aware that man was their
natural enemy, that they scarcely cleared away
from his path. In the yearning of his heart for
society, he meditated, as he passed on, that he
would imprison some of these beautiful birds, and
domesticate them, in whatever place he should
select
as his residence. To find that place, was now
his first object of pursuit. There were various
objections
to the place where he had passed the last
night. Though it might exclude the dew, he could
not promise himself, that it would afford a perfect
shelter from the rain. Besides, he could not spread
his bread to dry there, unless he watched it
continually
,
to drive away the birds. A spring was
near, over which, as is invariably the case in such
circumstances, rose a thicket of trees, filled with
these gay tenants of the woods, as though it were
an aviary. The open covert of trees could afford
no security from these plunderers, from wild beasts,
from savages, or the more certain assaults of the
elements. Another day elapsed in unavailing
researches
after a place of shelter; and the youthful
solitary returned once more to his bed of grass in
the shade.
This night was passed in wearying dreams of
imagining himself at home, and seeing the dear
faces, and hearing the loved accents of his parents.
So vivid and distinct were these images of his sleep,
that he awoke in the effort to embrace these illusions.
He arose, and went abroad. He heard the dismal
cries of the kangaroo, and the hooting of a
hundred
owls, in a language as different from those of
his own country, as that place was distant from
home. Flashes of lightning glared in the direction
of the sea. The deep murmur of the waves
indicated
,
that the sea felt the premonition of an
VOL. I.8
approaching storm. The forest blazed in every
direction with countless myriads of fire flies. He
returned to his bed of grass, and slept quietly until
morning.
When he arose, he found himself stiff and
feverish
from the damp of the night dews, and clearly
instructed by his feelings, that a repetition of such
exposure, must soon subject him to sickness. He
had hitherto confined his surveys of the country to
the region east of the point where he had been cast
ashore. He determined this morning, to take a
western range. Accordingly, he repaired to the
shore, and enjoyed sea-bathing at the same time
that he gathered his morning sustenance from the
treasures
hid in the sand
. He was painfully aware,
from inspecting his bread, that in a short time it
would be entirely spoiled. The loss of this
invaluable
possession was an apprehended disaster, the
nature
of which can be fully comprehended only by a
person placed precisely in his situation. With the
leaves of a low and shrubby tree, at once of
immense
size and exceedingly tough and stringy, and
fastened with filaments of bark, the whole wrought
with a pen-knife, the only implement of civilization
that remained in his possession, he made a coarse
but convenient kind of verdant sack, which, by the
same filaments, he suspended from his shoulders.
He took as much of the bread as he could
conveniently
carry, in order to commence the process of
endeavouring to save it, by separating and drying
it, and enough oysters to serve as animal food, and
commenced an early morning survey of the country
to the west.
He reached the perpendicular and volcanic wall
at the base of the mountains, without making any
new discoveries. He walked leisurely at the base,
carefully scrutinizing the smooth and shining
surface
,
to discover if there could be found in no part a
ragged and retreating face, or chasms in the rock,
which might serve as flights of steps, by which to
ascend to the second terrace. He proceeded more
than a mile in this direction, finding the side of
the wall every where alike smooth, lofty, and
inaccessible
.
At length, to his inexpressible joy,
appeared
a huge chasm in the wall, to which there
was an ascent by a flight of natural steps. The
chasm seemed to retreat from a small grass-covered
terrace, dotted with shrubs, herbage, and long
wreaths of creeping vines, tufted with flowers. The
terrace was elevated from the base, about fifty feet.
He mounted the steps, his heart throbbing with the
anxiety of suspense. Ten paces from the front of
the terrace, was a circular opening to a cave,
which his eye could easily penetrate, but scarcely
of sufficient size to admit his body. Beneath the
cavity, fissures in the rock evidenced, that with the
aid of a crowbar and his single strength, he could
have disengaged these pieces, and have created a
chasm sufficiently large to give an entrance into a
chamber, which seemed to promise to his eye all
that he could desire. Immediately he spread his
bread to dry on the surface of the terrace, and
descended
to search for something in the form of a
lever, which might serve him in lieu of an
instrument
of iron, to enable him to detach the fragments
from the orifice of the cavern, so as to enlarge it
for entrance. After a long and ineffectual search,
in which the advantages of civilization, and the
necessity of its means, union and strength, were
painfully forced upon his mind by his present
forlorn
and feeble condition, he came at length upon
a tree which had been splintered by lightning. A
fragment of the solid trunk had been disengaged.
It was of a convenient length, form, and size, to
answer
as a substitute for an iron crowbar. It was
heavy, firm, and inflexible. He eagerly ascended
to the entrance of the cave. It was a work of
hours to make the enlargement, and disengage the
fragments of the rock that impeded the entrance.
But the work was a length performed. The
fragments
were reduced to such a size, as that they
might be rolled away. Too eager to allow himself
rest from his exhausting toil, and drenched as he
was with perspiration, he entered through the
chasm created by his own labour, a grotto, which
might have served as a retreat for Calypso and her
nymphs. An immense vaulted chamber, whose
roof towered a hundred feet aloft, spread before
him; huge pillars supported it in various points.
Here were projections, and there were recesses. As
the external surface was black, the feeble light
admitted
to this chamber showed columns of basalt,
some of purple, some green, and some compounded
of all the colours. The floor was of living stone.
Blocks of basalt, strewed around in various
directions
,
might have served as seats for multitudes of
visitants. This apartment received its chief light
from the aperture by which he had entered.
Beyond
it spread another, and another. On one side
of the last, a chasm of an hundred feet in length
obliquely opened to the west, showing a kind of
beautiful skylight, which admitted only the oblique
rays of the setting sun, the air, and sufficient light
to shed a dim and pleasing lustre upon the sides of
an apartment of immense extent, and whose pillars,
recesses, and seats, exhibited a variety of striking
and brilliant aspects. The air within was dry. It
was safe. It admitted light and air, excluded the heat
and the elements, and a little labour of defence at
the entrance would barricade it impregnably against
a host of savages. The skylight was of a slope
too steep and smooth for admittance of an enemy,
even had not the elevation, to which it opened, been
inaccessible. A small spring of pure water, yet
sufficient for all purposes of supply, slowly trickled
along the stone floor, fell into a natural fountain at
the angle of the apartment, overflowed it, and
disappeared
through a fissure of the rock.
The joy of the heart of the youthful solitary may
be imagined. Here was not only a retreat, but a
spacious and a splendid one. It was a place in
which nymphs might have resorted for residence.
Its solitary splendour and magnificence would have
been agreeable circumstances, had there been a
8*
single human being to share it with him. As it was,
to look round upon this kind of subterranean
palace
,
and see, that with its commodiousness it
possessed
beauty and grandeur, could not but add to
the pleasure of finding such a desirable shelter.
Here, where the evening sun fell on the floor, he
could spread, dry, and preserve his bread. Here,
in another place, should he ever obtain fire, he could
arrange his apparatus for cooking. In another
point he could spread his bed of grass. From the
terrace he could survey the first rays of morning
purpling the ocean, the beautiful belt of grass and
shade, and an immeasurable extent of sea. He could
make his bed where the last sunbeams rested. He
could drink unmolested, even in case of a siege by
savages, from a pure fountain, which his own
apartment
commanded. When his cask of bread, could
it be preserved, was stored there, he would have a
supply of food for any length of time, which it
might be calculated that savages would besiege
him. There was there every thing that a solitary
could desire but society. In this respect there was
still an aching void. For a young man, in the
earnest vigour of youthful impulses and sentiments,
to lie down alone in a vast, vaulted, volcanic cave,
with a superincumbent mountain above his head;
to consider himself in this strange place, in an
uninhabited
island, in the wastes of the South Sea,
were, after all, circumstances sufficiently chilling.
Courage, said he to himself, as he looked round
the strange and splendid grotto palace, Courage;
for deprived of all other friends, thou wilt have
none but God with whom to commune, and thou
wilt have no alternative, but intercourse with the
greatest and best of beings. He fell on his knees,
and consecrated his future life with earnest prayers,
and with eyes streaming with tears, as he implored
God for cheerfulness, patience, and hope, to sustain
him in his lonely sojourn.
The distance from his grotto to the cove where
he was cast ashore, where was his bread, and where
was the only chasm in the iron-bound shore, through
the rampart of cliffs, for a considerable extent to
the right and left, was something more than half
a league. It was a morning and evening walk
only of sufficient extent for exercise. His first
business
was to bring all his bread to his grotto. This
he brought in four trips, which occupied the day.
Before night, all his bread, broken into small
fragments
,
was thoroughly dried in the sun, and so
hardened as to be in a state of preservation, to
receive
no further injury from keeping. At his last
trip, he bathed as usual, took his evening repast
from the treasures hid in the sand, and returned to
his grotto for sleep, which the great and exhausting
labours of the day now rendered so pressing a
want, that he could hardly keep his eyelids from
closing, until he had carried to his resting place a
sufficiency of grass to shield his body from the
hardness of his couch of stone. He threw himself
at his length, at a point of the grotto whence the
skylight admitted a view of a portion of the western
hemisphere. The moon was distinctly visible, as
she sloped amidst her throne of clouds, towards the
western sea. He prayed on his bended knees, laid
himself down, thought of his lonely position, and
his eyes swam, as he contemplated the queen of
night, now stooping through clouds, and now
wending
along the blue. The hoarse murmur of the
sea died on his ear; and his slumbers were as
profound
,
as those of the monarch sleeping on purple
and down, and surrounded by battalions and guards.
After his morning thanksgivings for shelter, and
sound and refreshing sleep, and his customary
resort
to the cove, which contained his magazine of
food, whence he took enough not only for his
morning
repast, but to serve him, along with his bread,
through the day; he determined to devote the day
to discovery, with a purpose, meanwhile, not to
stray so far, as not to be able to return to his grotto
to spend the night. It might happen, that he
might discover that he was already on the continent
of New Holland, or an island that was inhabited,
and that by the aid of the natives he might escape
to some civilized settlements. Having taken a
hearty breakfast, therefore, he commenced his
morning journey, cheered, as he proceeded, with
the beauty of nature, the verdure and the music of
the groves, through which he passed.
He traversed the belt of grass nearly a league to
the west, without seeing any thing worthy of
remark
.
Here he came to the margin of a brook of
considerable size, which carried much more water
than any he had yet seen. Its waters were pure
and transparent, and skirted with a compact margin
of shrubbery and trees, containing varieties and
kinds which he had not yet seen. Some were
loaded with berries, which promised, that they
might serve as fruit, or food. The fear that they
might be poisonous, prevented his tasting them.
The stream meandered from the mountains to the
sea. He followed its windings at a distance; for
the tangle of shrubs and vines prevented his
proceeding
on the banks. At no great distance
towards
the mountains, he came upon a most
beautiful
lake, or pond, with a margin of white sand,
without tree or shrub on its borders. The eye
looked down its pellucid depthsfor it seemed
bottomlesswith delight. Myriads of fishes of
every form and size were sporting in the waters,
slumbering in the sunbeams, or darting to the
surface
to catch the insect, or fly, as they fell exhausted
in the water. He sat down to admire the beauty
of one of the loveliest landscapes that imagination
can conceive. Near this beautiful lake were
congregated
innumerable birds, some singing among
the branches, some pursuing their rival loves, some
building their nests, and some resting with matronly
patience on their nests. The most whimsical and
splendid variety of water fowls swam in the lake.
Pidgeons of a splendour of plumage, unlike any
thing he had yet seen, rested on the branches in
flocks. A number of kangaroos seemed to have
been allured to contemplate the beauty of the
spectacle
.
They stood erect on the shore at no great
distance, almost mocking his eyes for a moment
with the aspect of his fellow beings. As he walked
towards them, they slowly retired from his path,
occasionally taking one of their prodigious leaps,
and then turning to contemplate the new and strange
guest, that had thus intruded upon their solitude.
He rested a moment in the shade on the shore,
beholding with delight this solitary scene of beauty,
this congregated bustle, this movement and joy of
animal life. With a gun and a hook and line, what
supplies of food might not this place furnish? But
he wanted not food. He had no implement for
ensnaring
and destruction. Who could meditate such
a purpose in such a place? The lake was formed
by the stream, and that appeared to issue from the
mountains. He followed it to the bases. It came
rushing down in a sheet, leaping from cliff to cliff;
and here, to his surprise and joy, he discovered a
break in the continuous regularity of the wall that
fronted the mountains. It seemed as though nature
had rent a passage between them, to furnish a
channel for this little stream. The ascent here
was steep, but easily accessible. He paused, and
took food and a draught of water from the
mountain
stream, and began to ascend.
It required both labour and danger to mount the
cliffs. Sometimes he crawled on his hands and
knees along sharp declivities of stones, not daring
to look down the dizzying eminence which he had
gained. At other times, he held fast to small bushes,
rooted in a tender soil, threatening to yield from
their roots, and precipitate him down the sides of
the mountain. As he ascended, the prospect opened
before him. Distances diminished. The chasm
in the cliffs at the cove, seemed directly at the foot
of the mountain, and it appeared as if, by a few
paces, one could step from the foot of the mountains
to the sea. The rounding of the shore now more
distinctly indicated, that he was cast on an island,
and that of no great extent. On every side, in the
direction of the sea, nothing could be seen, but the
quivering, blue surface, wave beyond wave,
scintillating
with the splendours of a sun, now almost
culminating from the zenith. At a distance, which
seemed reduced to nothing, but which by
comparison
,
he judged might be four or five miles from
the cove where he was cast ashore, was another
chasm in the cliffs, which gave promise of being a
larger and better harbour, than the former.
At an elevation, as he judged, of two thousand
feet, he sat down under the shade of some stinted
shrubs, which were rooted in a little area, covered
with a thin surface of soil. From this soil oozed a
small spring of water, deliciously cool. He took
food, quenched his thirst, and looked round him.
The mountain air was pure, fresh, and exhilarating.
The grandeur and loneliness of his position thrilled
him with a feeling of inexpressible sublimity. He
felt as though he were alone in the universe, and
engaged in an attempt almost impious, to ascend in
the flesh to the empyrean regions. Grandeur,
immensity
,
and solitude were spread upon every side
of him. The fleecy clouds, as they sailed through
the air, hovered but just above his head. New
wonders opened upon him at every ascending step.
He continued to clamber from height to height,
until he reached a table eminence. His eye glanced
over the summit almost fearfully. On the side of
the mountain, opposite that which he had ascended,
was the smoking crater of a volcano, from which
rose vast bursts of ruddy smoke in spiral columns.
The conical and bottomless crater seemed to open
a passage to the central depths; and the crater
surmounted
a distinct, cone-shaped eminence, that rose
from a basis a thousand feet below him. The island
was elliptical in shape, and in its remotest diameter
the eye could just catch the indistinct blue beyond
the termination of land. The prospect, as he
looked off in that direction, was enchanting: a
beautiful and basin-shaped vale opened in the
interior
of the island, accurately and strangely defined
on three sides by the black and undulating summits
of these mountains. On the fourth side was a
narrow
chasm cut through these hills, as it appeared,
by the hand of nature for the escape of the waters
of the valley. Beyond that opening, a dim, blue
mixture of the horizon with the level surface
indicated
,
that there commenced the same trackless
waste of waters, as on the opposite side of the
mountains
.
All doubt was thus removed. His eye traced
the whole outline of an island, and without a
harbour
,
as was probable; a mere volcanic shell, which
had arisen, in the ages of the past, from the depths
of the ocean, with a narrow sloping belt round its
edge, and inscribed with an elliptical line of
mountains
.
It was not only an islandbut a mere
unsheltered
rock in the sea, detached, unexplored,
unvisited
,
affording scarce a gleam of probability of
escape, and leaving him the sad prospect of having
here to finish his journey alone. Such were the
sad convictions, that rushed upon his mind at the
moment that his eye traced an entire outline of sea
on every side. He called in aid all his fortitude.
He cast his eye from summit to summit, along the
line of mountains, many of which threw up
immense
columns of smoke towards the sky. He
looked towards the point of the sky, where he
supposed
his native country was situated; and exerted
an effort to stretch his thoughts over the
immeasurable
wastes of sea, between it and himself. All was
dreary, vast, and out of relation with him and his
thoughts. There was something terrific in the eternal
fires, that steamed up their columns of smoke into
the upper regions of the air, showing him the nature
of the power that was operating these irresistible
energies of nature in her great work-shop in the
depths beneath. Lonely, feeble insect, said he,
even nature herself is too vast, too infinite, too
intent upon her own grand works to commune with
thee. It is one of thy kind, an insect, like thyself,
speaking thine own words, and sharing thy little
joys, wants and sorrows, that would be infinitely
VOL. I.9
more to thee, than all this grandeur and vastness.
With God and with man art thou formed to
commune
;
and far from man thou must here finish thy
solitary pilgrimage.
He raised his eye from the smokes, the
mountains
,
and the sea, to the Invisible, whose throne
and whose habitation are on high, and a sense of his
feebleness, littleness, desertion, and an earnest
longing
for society, filled his eyes with tears.
The sun was now declining, and cast a radiance
of inexpressible softness and beauty upon the
sloping
declivities of the mountains, on the side
opposite
that which he had ascended. Unlike that side,
it descended in shelving benches, covered with trees
of every form and size, height and shade of foliage.
The configuration of their tops, and the bluntness
of their stems, gave promise that they were
fruit-bearing
trees. At intervals there were small, open
grass plains, of the most charming smoothness,
amenity and verdure, as seen from his elevation.
It was, indeed, impossible for him to form precise
ideas of the landscape; for enough only was
manifest
to the eye, to give impulse to the
imagination
.
It seemed the land of fairies and nymphs.
There was such an infinite variety of slopes; such
diversified beauty in the general configuration of
the descending shelves; such tufted splendour in
the circular eminences, that bore on their summits
parterres of verdure; there was such freshness and
vividness in the colouring, indicating the effect of
copious irrigation, purifying mountain air, a rich
soil, and a tropical sun; as caused the beauty of
the scenery almost to be felt on the eye.
The thought of his grotto and his grassy couch,
so far below him, came upon him with something
of the feeling of home; and there was a chill in
the idea of spending the night on this sublime
elevation, in the midst of these smoking mountain
summits. He felt himself weary and exhausted.
His food was spent. There was no water. The
mind, that had been looking abroad upon this
elevating spectacle, felt that it was in a frail and
feeble tenement, that required the sight of its kind,
and food and rest. He began to descend,
contemplating
from time to time the effect of the
shadows
of evening falling upon the mountains. It
was already dark when he passed the beautiful
lake, so animated with life the preceding
morning
.
Owls now hooted from their hollow trees.
Amphibious reptiles screamed and crooked with
discordant and appalling cries. The dismal and
plaintive lament of the kangaroo rung through the
woods, and echoed from the mountains. Fire flies
of every size, from a brilliant electric point, to the
size of a shooting star, kindled an ever-varying
blaze upon the trees and shrubs. The young
solitary
held on his course, warned of his direction by
keeping near the base of the mountains, bewildered
with the strange spectacle before him. Well might
his imagination present to his thoughtsin the midst
of these forests, these strange fires, these thousand
cries of reptiles and unknown animalsbeasts ready
to devour, serpents hissing under his feet to sting,
and unknown and terrific beings peopling the
darkness
.
His heart throbbed, as he passed fearfully
along amidst a darkness illumined only by a few
faint stars, and the glaring brilliance of the fire
flies. His heart arose to Him
who maketh darkness
his pavilion
, and he reached his grotto in safety.
But there was no friend, no human being, no
candle
,
or torch, no ray of light, not even a dog to find
his master by his instinct of smell, and to fondle on
him in the darkness. But he felt his way to his
grassy couch, threw himself on it, repeated the
cheering and affectionate words, which he had so
often uttered after his mother as she had stood over
his nocturnal couch, Our Father, who art in
heaven
,and
his sleep was sweet, and dreamless.
When he went forth from his grotto the next
morning, the sun was high in the heavens, and the
matin song of nature had been sung while he slept.
He gazed round him for a moment; and although
the irrational tribes had finished their morning
devotions, he determined to sing his hymn of praise,
though unaccompanied. He sang to his favourite
air the beautiful words, When all thy mercies, O
my God, &c. Who can tell the feelings of his
heart, as the closing words of these sweet stanzas
came back in the plaintive note of echo, again and
again, melting away in the distance. It seemed as
if these black and frowning mountains sympathized
with him in his loneliness, devotion and songs.
Two lines of a well remembered sacramental hymn
sounded more sweetly in the voice of echo, than
any other.
For strangers into life we come,
And dying is but going home.
It was thenceforward his practice, invariably to
close his morning and evening devotions with these
words; and they soon became so familiar to his
ear, as they came back softened from the woods
and the cliffs, Going home! Going home! that he
took comfort in the idea of personifying echo, until
he thought at least of one shadowy but
sympathizing
being, that pitied and answered, and encouraged
him to wait patiently for that last home.
His first want was fire. Siliceous stones were no
where seen. He remembered the expedients of Juan
Fernandez. He rubbed sticks, but his strength
failed before he could even produce smoke. A
thousand and a thousand projects were examined,
and rejected. He understood the principle of
kindling
fire by percussion. The thought gave him
courage. I can surely find, said he,
somewhere
a reed, a rod and a sponge, and I can kindle
fire by percussion. I will watch the thunder cloud,
and where the lightning falls I will find fire from
heaven. An association brought to his thoughts
the volcanic fires, from one of which, long columns
of ruddy smoke, as if mixed with fires, streamed
off in horizontal pillars over the sea. I will
ascend
,
said he, to their summits. I will kindle
a fire to cheer my solitary nights, from the central
9*
fires. Such thoughts animated him, as he walked
to his sea-bathing and to his treasures hid in the
sand.
Having bathed, and breakfasted, and recovered
from the fatigues of the former day, a feeling like
cheerfulness and joy sprung up in his bosom. I
will imprison some of these beautiful birds, said
he. I will learn them to love me, and to be my
companions from choice. Hares, of a large size,
and variegated and beautiful colours, playing in
the grass, scarcely seemed disposed to get out of
his way as he passed along. Flamingos, and
purple
pidgeons, and gray parrots, and parroquets of
green and gold, and cardinals with their high
crimson
tufts, and an astonishing kind of bustards,
almost
of the size of a sheep, with hair instead of
feathers
,
and wings not unlike those of a bat, were
visible on all sides in his walks; water fowls, of
exquisite form and beauty, sailed in the little fresh
water lake that he had discovered. Kangaroos,
though not so common as the other animals, were
often seen. He never wearied, in viewing their
singular forms, intermediate between the baboon
race and man. They walked erect. Their strange
cry was almost human. Their prodigious activity
in leaping, surpassed his conceptions. I will take
of each a pair, said he, I will learn them to love
me, and to be satisfied with my grotto, and basin
within it, and the little area in front of it.
But he found in the experiment, how much easier
it was to form a picture in the imagination, than to
consummate his project. The birds and the animals
had appeared so tame, that by their chattering and
congregating about him, he deemed it only
necessary
to make an effort, to imprison as many of them
as he would. The rabbits would skip away a half
a dozen paces from him, stop, and prick up their
ears, and gaze at him, until his hand was within a
few feet of them, when they would lightly trip
away, and sit at the same distance again. The
birds fluttered at a fathom's distance, chattered,
and nodded their heads, and still kept the same
distance
from his hand. The kangaroos allowed him
even to touch thembut his touch, as an electric
shock caused them to bound away almost a rood
at a single spring. He repaired to the lake,
undressed
,
and plunged in, thinking to take some of
the beautiful varieties of the water fowls, that had
seemed tamer than even the other animals. But they
pattered their broad bills in the water, plied their
webbed feet once or twice in the yielding element,
and just preserved their customary distance from
him. When he was still, so also were they; and
they rested in the water, nodded their heads, and
gazed upon him. They seemed to be discussing
the point, with most annoying volubility, what new
and strange monster of nature had intruded
himself
into their society; and he could not forbear
thinking, that their chattering and strange
movements
were their modes of ridiculing the uncouth
animal who manifested dispositions to make too
free with them.
Wearied, and discouraged with the useless effort
to take even a single bird, or quadruped, he was
returning in disappointment towards his grotto,
when a pair of those huge birds, with hair for
feathers
,
stalked past him in the grass with a flock of
their young between. Monsters as they were, he
determined to seize some of the young. He sprang
into the midst of the flock, and seized one of the
young in either hand. The dams raised a loud and
appalling whistle, and flew upon him with their bat
wings extended, dealing him such blows as almost
stunned him; at the same time they pounced their
beaks into his forehead. Glad to escape from this
warfare with his eyes, he released his prey, and
the parents of the young moved slowly away,
croaking
defiance as they went, and leaving him
scratched and bleeding. Such was the issue of his
first half days experiment at making companions of
these free tenants of the solitude.
Ah! said he, as he returned in the sorrow of
disappointment, and in the bitterness of his spirit,
they know by instinct, that man is a cruel tyrant
to their kind. He has always found the necessity
of fraud, and snares, and traps, and gins. The
idea of their distrust and hostility removed the pain
of the thought of depriving them of their liberty.
I will take time, he reflected, and attain my end
by more certain means. I will make snares, and
pit-falls, and I will imprison them without
compunction
,
since they fear and fly me.
Three or four successive days passed without any
particular incidents, to vary them. Every moment,
except when he slept, was spent in preparing such
implements as could be furnished by sea shells, the
ligaments of the shrubs, or plants, the arrangement
of his couch, and a chimney, in which to cook,
when he should obtain fire from the volcano. His
arrangements had a particular reference to the
journey, which he meditated for that purpose. His
knapsack of palm leaves and filaments from the
tall hemp-grass, was neatly preapred. Nooses and
springs for the taking of animals and birds were
prepared. With a scollop-shell, firmly fixed to a
strong reed, he made a convenient spade, with
which he purposed to dig a pit-fall, in which he
hoped to take a pair of kangaroos. He had
prepared
oysters and bread for his intended journey
of the following morning, when he intended, before
the rising of the sun, to be on his way over the
mountains to the volcano.
But at midnight he awoke in a burning fever.
He arose from his couch, and it was the extent of
his strength, to be able to reach his grotto fountain
and quench his raging thirst. He crawled back to
his couch, feebly articulating a line of his favourite
stanza, And dying is but going home. That
mystery in our nature is inexplicable, which causes,
that the death which, perhaps, in health we courted,
brings dismay and horror when it comes in the
form of sickness and gradual approach to
dissolution
.
To die in unalleviated sickness, and to lie
in this strange sepulchre, was at first an abhorrent
and afflicting thought, from which his heart
recoiled
.
But he said to himself,
Thy will, O God,
be done;
and the agitation of his thoughts subsided
and he laid himself calmly down, to live, or die, as
God should ordain. It were useless to trace his
thoughts or feelings through his three days of fever,
in which his weakness was so great, that, although
he agonized with thirst, and could hear the cool
spring falling into the fountain basin near him, he
could not rise and reach it. On the fourth day,
his apprehensions, pains, and thirst, were alike
quietted in utter insensibility.
From this long sleep he at length awoke, calm,
feeble and perfectly free from sickness and pain.
He felt that God had other trials for him yet to
endure
;
and he humbly blessed
Him that had
ransomed
his life from destruction
. Having refreshed
his thirst, and taking a little of his unsavory bread
to relieve the exhaustion of hunger and disease, he
retired to his couch, and passed the day in
self-examination
,
prayer, and communion with God.
The next day, before the sun arose from the sea,
he dragged his feeble steps to the cove, and took
his customary sea-bathing and repast. He felt
himself not yet sufficiently strong to scale the
mountains
to obtain the volcanic fire. He determined,
therefore, to make a circuit of the shore, as far as
he thought his strength would allow, in order to
enable him to reach his grotto again that night.
He passed the small stream below the lake, and at
the distance of half a mile from the shore. The
sun came up in his glory from the ocean. The
dew drops glittered on the trees. Every thing that
had life hailed the glad morning. Never had a
more beautiful day dawned upon the earth. Never
were verdure, and flowers more fresh and
ambrosial
.
The solitary, just restored from a violent
paroxism of fever, felt the calm, elevated, and
delightful
consciousness of renovated existence, so
natural, and so joyous a feeling in similar cases.
The creation smiled upon him in a freshness and
novelty, as though he had now seen it for the first
time. He went slowly on his way rejoicing. These
are thy works, said he, Parent of good.
Devotion
cheered his thoughts; and gave him the
presentiment of happy discoveries.
In crossing the stream which has been described,
he was compelled to make his way with difficulty
through the tangle of shrubs, and vines, and briars,
that fringed its borders. A considerable tree
before
him bent its branches over the stream, and he
remarked, that they were charged with a fruit of
the most inviting appearance and of great size. He
remembered to have read, that birds never prey
upon poisonous fruits. He remarked, that this tree
was covered with birds, the larger classes driving
away the smaller with incessant chattering, as they
preyed upon it themselves. Some of the lower
branches were within his reach. He gathered two
or three of the fruits. He remarked with joy and
triumph, that they exactly resembled the engravings
of the bread fruit. With this double ground of
assurance in its favour, he brought it to the test of
his taste. It had the luscious flavour of the fresh
fig, and created the satisfying sensation from eating
bread. What a treasure to a man, whose appetite
had returned with devouring force after sickness,
and whose only food had hitherto been uncooked
shellfish, and bread that had been moulded by heat,
and wet with sea water! Never had epicure such a
repast. He feasted thankfully, and blessed the
Giver with eyes moistened with tears of gratitude.
He looked round on all sides to see if there was no
other tree of the kind in sight. This was all that
appeared; and it seemed as if the birds would soon
rob this of all it bore. The birds were driven off
only to return to the charge, and settle on the fruits
again. He had satisfied his morbid appetite with
the delicious food. But he felt the pangs of a
miser, at being robbed of his gold, in seeing the
birds plunder his future treasures. There was no
resource, except to remain constantly under the
tree; and even then, it was only by unremitted
exertion
that he could drive away the flights of
plunderers
.
At length he reflected, that though he had
seen but this single tree, in a climate congenial to
the fruit there must certainly be more, and that
time and future search must discover them.
Cheering
himself with this thought, he took two or three
fruits to serve him on his way, and he continued
his journey of discovery.
He determined to visit the cove, which he had
discovered from the top of the mountains. He
reached it by ten in the morning. The first object
that struck him, was a large box, lying partly in
the water and partly on the sand. It required the
exertion of all his strength, to give it two or three
turns, so as to raise it above the danger of being
carried away by the waves. As he was searching
for the fragment of a rock, with which to beat it
open and examine its contents, he discovered on
the beach detached planks, and shivered timbers,
which left not a doubt that here were the shattered
remnants of the skeleton of the Australasia. He
stumbled a moment after upon another box, smaller
than the former, which he also removed up the
beach. He still advanced with eager curiosity,
until his senses informed him, that he was near still
more melancholy marks of the wreck. He sickened
at the thought of seeing the bodies of his ill fated
companions. The next step, he started back with
horror; for by the form and dress, rather than by
the horribly disfigured countenance, he recognized
the body of the lately beautiful Katharine Olney,
the victim of lawless passions. Could it be, that
this object of loathing and horror could have been
the pursuit of illicit love, so beautiful, so
interesting
,
even after her fall! Could it be, that what was
now before him, had trilled the song, Farewell,
ye green fields, but a few days before, with such
exquisite melody and effect? He hastened away,
faint and recoiling, only to encounter another, and
another spectacle of the same kind. He sickened,
and retreated from the beach, and traversed the
VOL. I.10
curve of the cove, at a distance from the shore,
to avoid the chances of these appalling spectacles.
At the upper extremity of the beach, he ascended
a cliff, which surmounted it fifty feet above the
level of the sea. Here he saw a considerable
section
of the hulk of the ship, wedged between two
projecting rocks, and raised so high above the
waves, as to be barely dashed by the brine. His
senses warned him, that here was the mass of the
bodies of his shipwrecked companions.
The whole scene created such a faintness, that
he hurried from the cliff to a grove at no great
distance
from the shore. The burning thirst of his
fever came upon him; and as he dragged his steps
to the shade, he envied the repose of those, whose
toils and sorrows were thus ended. The shade was
surrounded by a clean white sand, in which the
slightest mark would be distinctly visible. Every
nerve of his frame thrilled, as he saw the manifest
impress of a human footstep in the sand. It was a
small, and apparently a female footmark. His
agitation was such, that the alternate shivers and
throbbings threatened to renew his fever. The
person had evidently walked backward and
forward
,
and the footsteps were fresh and recent. He
raised his voice to its utmost pitch, and cried,
Friend! friend! He held in his breath, until the
distant echoes from the mountains had died away,
and repeated the cry, and again waited for the
response
of echo.
The next thought, was to trace the direction of
the footsteps. They soon failed on the firm green
sward. No savage of the American forest, ever
more eagerly applied all his powers to discern, if
possible, the slightest trace of the imprint of human
foot on the grass, than he did on this occasion.
More than once he entirely lost the clue, and
returned
with a sinking despondence, to retrace the
direction again. After the search of an hour, he
found the same footstep beyond the open glade,
marked in the soft black ooze, which indicated the
vicinity of a spring. Through this ooze the
person
had evidently passed and repassed frequently.
Here he again raised his cries, in hopes that this
forlorn being might hear and answer, and in
breathless
suspense awaited a reply. The footsteps were
searched again, and traced to a spring. From the
spring the trace was marked towards the mountains.
It then traversed a patch of sward again. Beyond
that, it was again recognised in a spot of wet and
black earth, destitute of herbage. Every moment
added to the eagerness of his search, and the
frequency
of his cries, and the terror of his
apprehensions
,
lest the desolate and unprotected being, who
had passed there, had perished in utter destitution
and misery. His anxiety at times almost amounted
to distraction. The sun was at the zenith, and he
was still ineffectually striving to find among the
trees and grass, the ultimate course which the
wanderer had taken.
At length he came on the footsteps again, and
they appeared to lead towards a single detached
tree with a huge trunk, and but a moderate height,
and which, in the distance, exactly resembled an
American live oak, except that the immense size of
the foliage made it more like the palm in that
respect
.
This tree stood alone in an open area. Its
branches curved downwards, in the form of an open
umbrella, and in creating an impervious shade,
seemed almost to have formed a roof, that
promised
to shed the rain. An involuntary tremor
seized him, as he approached this tree. Near it
was high grass, through which such a course had
been trampled, as by a body that had been dragged
through it, to the shelter of this tree. The limbs
formed a curve so near the ground, that he was
obliged to lift them up, and then to stoop, in order
to enter. The reader may imagine his sensations,
when the first object which he discovered by the
dim light of the dark brown shade was a female
figure, apparently lifeless, lying at the trunk of the
tree, and who seemed to have sought this covert,
that maidenly modesty might here find the nearest
covering to the decency of the sepulchre that could
be found above the soil.
Terrified and trembling, he approached the figure,
and instantly recognised the once proud and
beautiful
Augusta Wellman. It would be folly to attempt
to depict his sensations. Her countenance wore
the paleness of death. Her eyes were sunken and
hollow. Her form was emaciated to a skeleton;
but there was no mistaking the dress, the
countenance
,
and contour. He grasped her chill hand,
which had not at least the coldness of death; and
as he felt her wrist, a slight tremulousness of the
artery gave him unquestionable evidence, that,
however
near the vital spark was to extinction, she still
lived. As he bent over her, he gently pronounced
her name. The sounds awaked consciousness, and
she half opened her eyes. The tumultuous
throbbings
of his own heart may be imagined, as he
ejeculated, Thank God, she lives! she lives! She
gave a kind of convulsive sob, and raised her hand
to her face, but neither opened her eyes, nor
appeared
to have the least distinct consciousness;
though she murmured some low and incoherent
words, the purport of which seemed to be, to ask
for drink. She moved her lips, as if between
sleeping
and waking, or in the low insanity that
precedes
death in the last stage of fever. From the
dryness of her parched lips, and from her frequent
mention of water, it was manifest that she suffered
extreme thirst. Various circumstances obviously
showed, that, until recently, she had made her way
to the adjacent spring for water; and that she had
recently become incapable of that effort, either
from sickness or inanition.
He sprang to the spring, scooped up water in his
hands, and kneeling over her, opened her parched
lips, to enable her to swallow the water. As soon
as she was conscious of the presence of the needed
element, nature asserted her rights. She manifested
extreme thirst, and repeatedly swallowed all that
he could bring in his hands. He was aware of the
10*
danger of allowing her too much at once; and when
he withheld the supply, she called distinctly, in a
low and complaining murmur, for more water. She
appeared to have considered herself addressing her
maid. He bent over her, and in a gentle and
affectionate
tone of voice, told her that she was not well,
and that the physician forbade her having more
water. She turned her face, and murmured
inaudibly
in reply, and seemed disposed to sleep. In a
moment he had gathered soft and dry grass and
leaves, and made a comparatively comfortable
couch. He raised her in his arms from her
uncomfortable
position on the damp hard earth, and placed
her on the bed of grass.
At this emergency, what would he have given
for wine, or the proper nutriment for such a person,
apparently reduced to this forlorn condition by
exhaustion
!
He had bread, but it was wretchedly
unpalatable. He had bread-fruit, and the pulp, he
judged, would be at once nutritive and proper for
her case. The thought flashed upon him, who
knows what may be in those boxes? He left her,
and ran to the boxes on the shore, distant from the
tree less than half a mile. It may be imagined he
did not count his steps. He eagerly knocked open
the first and largest one with the first stone he
could find. It was chiefly filled with clothes, and
other multifarious contents, but nothing to meet
the present emergency. He flew to the smaller box,
and knocked off the upper cover. It contained
wine and cordials, the very articles he would have
selected from a million! He blessed God in his
heart, and received it as an omen that the poor
sufferer
would be raised. Marine shells, of convenient
and beautiful forms, were easily found on the shore,
for vessels. He was soon beside his patient, his
heart palpitating at once from haste and anxiety,
lest she might have expired in his absence.
To his gentle calls she now opened her eyes;
but her thoughts evidently wandered, as to her
place and condition. He bruised the pulp of a
bread-fruit, poured wine upon it, and macerated the
pulp, until the wine had imbibed the juice and the
nutrition. He applied the liquid to her lips, and, as
before, she eagerly swallowed it, apparently as
considering
it water. He felt that his duties of nurse
and physician in the case were responsible, and no
motive can be imagined, which did not operate in
all its force, to inspire him with the utmost caution,
and to excite him to call up all his recollections of
nursing and medicine.
He ventured to administer, in the first instance,
nearly a glass of wine so prepared. Although she
complainingly ordered more, he paused to witness
the effect of what he had already administered.
He had the satisfaction to perceive, directly, that
the wine and nutriment had taken effect. An
evanescent hue of the rose revisited her pallid
cheek. She became more energetic in her
remonstrances
as she called for more water. After an
interval of a few minutes, he mixed some of the
pulp of the breadfruit with some of his bread, and
mixed the paste with wine. He administered this,
and she swallowed it readily. In this way he gave
her as much food and wine as he dared administer
in the case, and then felt, that, as a judicious nurse,
though a thousand other expedients to hasten her
restoration forced themselves upon his thoughts, it
was necessary to wait a while, and leave nature to
her course; he meanwhile diligently watched her
indications.
He made the most sage and judicious
determinations
;
but, as happens in cases of such anxious
suspense, with no measure of time but the extreme
earnestness of hope and the bitter alternations of
fear, he probably measured a quarter of an hour
for an hour. Her eager calls for drink increased
his impatience. He gave her wine so much and so
frequently, that he began to perceive a feverish
flush in her cheek, and to feel it in her hand.
Taxing
himself bitterly with childish impatience and
inconsideration, he came to a resolute pause. The
mother, who is sitting at midnight and alone over
her sick first-born, suspended between life and
death, may enter into the agony of his suspense
during this interval.
At this anxious moment, a new cause of terror
manifested itself. It was drawing towards evening.
The patient could not be removed. The weather,
which had been calm, and the sky cloudless, since
he had been on the island, now began to change.
The murky atmosphere promised a stormy night.
The lightning flashed from all quarters of the sky,
and thunder rumbled among the mountains. In
the present state of the patient, whatever had been
the cause of her present debility, there could be no
doubt, that a drenching rain would completely
extinguish
the almost expiring lamp of life. It was
obviously necessary, that he should use prompt and
energetic measures to shelter her, if possible, from
the rain. He recollected, that the first package
which he had opened on the shore contained pieces
of linen, laces, and female dresses, enveloped in
canvass. He brought the canvass and linen, broke
down small bamboos, and in less than an hour, had
raised over her a tent impervious to the rain.
Scarcely had he completed these important
arrangements
,
and sheltered his patient under a tent
of sufficient dimensions, also, to cover himself, before
the lightning glared through the trees, and the
thunder burst in deafening echoes in the mountains.
The winds roared. The trees bent their heads.
The ocean-surges lashed the rock-bound shore.
The hollow sounds of torrents, formed in the
mountains
,
rushed precipitously down the perpendicular
sides, and the rain continued to come down in
torrents
.
The thick foliage of the tree completely
excluded
the fury of the wind, and almost formed a
roof against the rain. The drops that sifted through
the leaves were completely arrested by the tent, and
no other result followed, but a delicious coolness in
the atmosphere. As the thunder burst, and the rain
poured, how humbly did he thank the Almighty,
that he had been enabled thus to shelter his forlorn
patient. It seemed, as if Providence had thus given
warrant, that the gracious Being, who had thus
marvellously interposed for her, would complete
the begun graciousness, and would restore her to
health. How did he long for fire and light, that
he might watch the variations of her countenance?
But this might not be. The darkness, except when
the lightning glared through the gloom, was total.
Who can tell the colour of his thoughts, as he
contemplated
her countenance by the gleams of
lightning
?
He held her burning hand in his, and was
painfully aware, that whatever were the original
causes of her feebleness, she was now labouring
under distinctly formed fever. It had, probably,
failed to manifest its symptoms, in consequence of
her extreme weakness, and of having no aliment,
on which to feed. Sustenance and wine had called
it into external action. She murmured continually,
in that half intelligible strain, which indicated low
but fixed insanity.
Scarcely had he indulged the hope that her
complaint was no more than that of exhaustion,
when this new source of terror, apprehension that
she would die of fever, opened upon him. During
this long night of thunder, tempest, and darkness,
that passed over these desolate beings, alone, as it
were, in the universe, the human heart can be
supposed
capable of few emotions of hope, fear, anxiety,
and suspense, that did not successively agitate his
bosom. The red and dismal glare of lightning,
shed upon her pallid and deathlike countenance all
the light by which to confirm the one emotion or
the other. Often, when her quick and laborious
respiration no longer caught his ear, did he give
himself up to the agonizing thought, that she had
ceased to breathe.
But even this night, which seemed an age, at
length wore away. The clouds vanished. The
mountain-tops were rolled in mist. The broad
disk of the sun was seen rising from the sea. A
thousand animals uttered their morning cry of joy.
The birds sang, and the rain-drops pattered from
the leaves. The air was pure, bland, and balsamic;
and the steaming fragrance of every tropical leaf,
plant, and flower, was mingled with the atmosphere.
But the light of this beautiful day confirmed his
worst apprehensions touching his patient. The
paleness of death sat on her countenance. Her
strength was sunk to such infantine weakness, that
she was scarcely able to move her hand. She lay
still and motionless, and from her low and short
respiration alone, it was manifest that she yet
lived. But every symptom and every appearance
indicated, that this could be the case but a little
longer. It was in vain, that every moment he
applied
wine to her lips. She no longer swallowed,
or appeared conscious that it was there.
He felt that nothing remained for him, but to
watch by her side in such submission and patience
as he might obtain, until the fearful suspense was
terminated. The idea of seeing this fair and frail
flower cut down under his eye, and from such
expectations as finding her alive had raised, to be
left thus doubly desolate and alone, was indeed a
terrible one. His only resource was to besiege the
throne of the divine mercy, in earnest and
importunate
prayer. The day passed without bringing
change or hope. The dark and dreary night
closed over them again, and again his spirits sank
with the light, and he gave himself up to complete
despondency. But
He who never slumbers
watched over her sleep. She slept deep, tranquil,
and motionless. The short and feeble respiration
of an infant alone manifested that she still held to
life.
In the morning, hope dawned again in his breast;
for although from her countenance it might have
been supposed that she slept the sleep of innocence
and the tomb, an occasional smile passed over her
lovely face, which did not seem the precursor of
death. But the day passed, like the former,
without
bringing one visible change. All that long day
he watched beside her in the same agonizing
suspense
,
every moment expecting to see her suffer a
short spasm, and yield her last breath. The sun
was descending, and his oblique beams penetrated
beneath the deep verdure, and threw a religious
light upon the scene; and he was on his knees
wrestling with Him who only could help, that
sparing mercy might be extended to his patient.
As he raised from his posture of prayer, she opened
her eyes and awoke. In a voice feeble but
articulate
,
she asked, How came I here?
With a face almost as pale as her own, he bent
over her, and answered gently, that if she would be
calm, he would soon explain all the circumstances
of her case to her; but that she was now too weak
to hear them; and he begged her to compose
herself
,
and be perfectly still. Only tell me, she
feebly rejoined, where I am, and call my maid,
and I will be quiet. To this he answered, that she
was safe, and under the care of a friend, and he
begged her again to compose herself, with a voice
so earnest and affectionate, as appeared to inspire
her with confidence and submission. She drew her
hand across her forehead, and tears filled her eyes.
I understand it all, said she; I have not been
used to the attendance of men in sickness. But I
remember your countenance, and I feel safe in your
care. I begin to comprehend my situation, and
will endeavour to submit to it. As if exhausted
with this feeble effort, she turned and slept again.
Through this night she was feverish and delirious,
but manifested increasing strength.
The morning dawned, and with its light all his
hopes revived. She awoke, and spoke calmly.
She asked him if he were not the ship's steward.
I am, was the reply. She held her hand to her
forehead, and the distress of her countenance
evidenced
that she was retracing the most afflicting
recollections. The tears trickled down her cheeks,
as she said, Dear, dear father! why should I
mourn thee? How gladly would I have shared thy
lot! We are alone, steward, in this desolate place,
Vol. I.11
are we not? I have been sick. I was perishing
with hunger and terror, and you found me, and
have saved me. Is it not so? He answered her,
that some of her conjectures were right; but that
many of the ship's company had escaped in the
boats; that her father, in all probability, was among
them; that when she was more able to hear the
ground of his hopes, he should be able to convince
her of the probability that he had been saved. He
implored her to be tranquil, assuring her that she
was yet in extreme weakness and danger; and that
the slightest agitation would bring back her fever
and danger. He assured her, that there was no
sacrifice that he would not make to serve her, and
that if she would be composed, and allow him to
use means for her complete restoration, he would
find some way in which to convey her to New
Holland, or perish in the attempt. In reply, she
thanked him for the kindness of his efforts already,
and for his generous offers for the future. Oh!
steward, she added, clasping her hands, is not
this what I used to hear from the pulpit? Is not this
terrible reverse and humiliation a just punishment
imposed upon my pride! Oh, how art thou fallen!
Was ever condition so forlorn! But I remember
you well. I am sure of your principles and your
honour. How kind you must have been! and
what exertions you must have made to save me! I
remember being tossed about upon the sea. I
remember
holding to a plank as the waves rolled
over me. I remember seeing dead bodies on the
shore. I remember the dreary feelings at my heart
as I saw myself wholly alone, and dead bodies
around me on the shore. I remember being faint
and hungry, as I wandered about in search of water.
I remember calling for help; but there was none to
answer. A suffocating burst of tears here came to
her relief.
He was alarmed, lest this paroxysm should bring
back her disease; and earnestly begged her to
compose herself. When she had regained her
strength, he assured her, that he should then request
her to relate all. She replied, Allow me to tell
you what a dreadful feeling it was, when I found
myself thus desolate and alone. I wished earnestly
to die. I wandered about seeking for death: But
it fled from me; and I continued to live against my
will. In what a condition you must have found
me! and how kindly you must have nursed me
through my long and painful dream, and my longer
state of insensibility! I feel that I am again
returning
to life. You are right. My head feels
confused and swimming. Be kind enough to tell
me about my condition, after I was insensible, and
how you found and relieved me.
Seeing her painful and eager curiosity, he
deemed
that it would be most likely to tranquillize her
mind, to relate to her plainly, all that he knew
about her case. He gave her a clear and succinct
account of the wreck, of his own escape, of his
finding
food and a place of residence, and in what
manner he afterwards discovered her. He dwelt
upon his own anxiety and her extremity. He
enlarged
upon the probability of her father's escape,
particularly dwelling on the circumstance, that his
body was not among those cast on the shore. He
mentioned, that a part of the wreck was still near,
and the chance that offered from that circumstance,
that he would yet be able to construct a boat, by
which he might convey her to New Holland, and
enable her to rejoin her friends.
Her tears flowed freely at the recital, and they
seemed tears of relief. Dear father, she said,
thou art happy, even if buried in the ocean; a
thousand times happier to have been buried in the
abysses of the ocean, than to be thus thrown upon
this desert shore, and placed in a situation like
mine. The agony of her thoughts and
recollections
here became so intense, that an access of fever
and delirium returned upon her, and continued for
the greater portion of the day. Towards evening
a distinct remission of the fever ensued again. She
was again exhausted. He persuaded her to take
wine and food, in the best form in which he was
able to prepare it; and she slept soundly until
morning. During this period of her sleep, he
performed
all his necessary duties, such as preparing
food, examining the contents of the boxes, and
spreading the damp articles to dry, procuring
shellfish
and bread-fruit, and making all the
arrangements
requisite to enable him to be constantly
ready to attend her, when she awoke.
It was nearly meridian before she awoke; but
she was calm, collected, free from fever, and
complained
of hunger. He immediately placed before
her bread, bread-fruit, and wine, regretting that he
had not fire, and that his means of affording
nourishment
,
proper for her case, were so limited.
What is your name, steward? asked she. He
informed her. Shall I then constantly call you
Arthur? said she. Call me Arthur, or by what
name you choose, he replied; or why not by the
more affectionate name of brother? Providence
has levelled the barriers between us, only to enable
me to offer the devoted and affectionate services of
a humble brother, who will be ready to serve you,
even unto death. She smiled at his energetic
proffers
,
and held out her hand to him. I will always,
then, said she, call you Arthur, or brother; and
I will believe you kind and considerate; and I will
trust implicitly in your honour. Saying this, she
eagerly partook of the bread-fruit, which was
indeed
delicious. He was obliged to caution her
against the immoderate indulgence of her appetite,
which was ravenous. She drank claret mixed with
water. The flush of convalescence suffused her pale
cheek, and began to beam again in her languid eye.
No words will be necessary, to explain the
mutual embarrassment of the novel position in
which these young people, so different in condition,
but so alike in the nobleness of their natures, were
thrown thus together, and their destinies, at least
for a time, so identified by the mysterious decree
of Providence. Each was reluctant to commence
11 *
the explanations that were so indispensably
necessary
.
One day and another elapsed; and still,
while she slept, he made all the necessary
arrangements
,
touching their mutual wants. She,
meanwhile
,
convalesced rapidly. The blood revisited
her cheek, and strength and agility her frame.
Nor could the assiduous and tender attentions, and
the considerate and guarded delicacy of her nurse,
fail to excite her gratitude; nor to call up strongly
the associated feelings.
The extreme inconveniences of their mutual
position under the covert of a tree, and confined to
a narrow awning, hastily and rudely constructed,
was apparent to both. The air was damp; and
nothing but the continuance of a clear sky, and
pleasant weather, could have ensured her
convalescence
in that place at all. The aspect of the
sky became threatening. An explanation was
necessary
.
It began with the young lady. It was
long and confidential. Gratitude, pride of birth,
maidenly modesty, and the union and opposition of
various feelings, that may be much more easily
conceived than explained, were freely avowed in
her case. Her preserver was instructed, that he
must never for a moment forget, that the barriers,
which had formerly interposed between them, still
existed. He was to believe, that she viewed him
with sentiments of inexpressible gratitude; that she
had an entire reliance upon his honour and good
principles; that she felt herself charged upon him,
as a helpless being, who would increase his burdens,
without being able to share his labours; who must
be under daily and hourly obligations, in addition
to the preservation of her life, and yet who saw no
prospect of ever being able to make any adequate
return; who must cling to him, as she smilingly
said, like an evil conscience, through helplessness
and timidity; through not only the grounded
terrors
of savages and wild beasts, but even the ideal
terrors of loneliness and darkness, and a defective
education; and yet, as a young man, he was never,
with the reasoning appropriate to vanity as such,
to view this unwillingness to be left alone, this
desire
to share even his walks and his labours, with
any other interpretation, than that she was a
useless
,
timid, proud, and spoiled woman. Moreover,
he was to precede her, and fit up the inner apartment
of the grotto for her residence; and he was charged
and pledged, by whatever is sacred or honourable,
to keep guard in the exterior apartment.
Such were the injunctions of this beautiful young
girl, who felt all the delicacy and difficulty of
imposing
such severe laws upon one, to whom she
felt, that she had been already indebted for life, and
whose whole future residence there, whether longer
or shorter, must be a continual and hourly
recurrence
of obligations. The contract on the other
part was prompt, explicit, and complete. He
assured
her, that she should be convinced, that the
most scrupulous and gentlemanly honour could
exist in conditions, where she had not dreamed
that it was ever found. He begged her to measure
the respectable young men, in the middle conditions,
in his country, by his honour, tact, and delicacy in
fulfilling all the stipulations which she had
imposed
;
and to think better of the middle walks of
life, and of human nature, as he proved himself
intelligent
to comprehend, and faithful to discharge,
all the duties of this relation so strangely imposed.
It was engaged, then, that on the fourth day of
her convalescence, that is to say, the morning
subsequent
to this conversation, he should start
immediately
after their morning meal, to prepare the
grotto for her reception. The distance was nearly
five miles. He was to return in season to enable
her, in the cool of the declining afternoon, to
accompany
him to her new habitation. The
morning
came. The breakfast was prepared before the
rising of the sun. Her eye filled with tears, and
the paleness of apprehension was on her
countenance
,
as she held out her hand to him and wished
him a pleasant day, and above all, to return early
in the afternoon to his lonely charge.
It may be imagined that, to a timid and helpless
maiden, her prospects were sufficiently sad, in
reference
to spending this day thus by herself. He,
on his part, hurried away to duties, which, he felt,
required a week, instead of a part of a single day.
From the larger box, he carried linen and other
articles, as much as his strength would enable him
to bear. He came a second time, for a second
load of the same articles. He gathered long moss
from trees, near the grotto. He spread a couch,
not only comfortable, but, remembering the
occupant
,
it was even splendid; for the moss was
covered with linen of the whiteness of snow, and
the whole was overspread with damask, intended
for the furniture of a mansion at New Holland.
Palm branches, in all the freshness and splendour
of their verdure, were hung round the variegated
and lofty walls of the grotto; and wreaths of flowers
were suspended, wherever the eye could turn. The
floor was strown with flowers; and even the basalt
pillars, of living stone, that were to serve as chairs
and tables, were covered and cushioned with
flowers. There are few, who cannot readily enter
into the motive, which caused him thus to task his
invention, and apply all his industry and powers,
to render this magnificent grotto a pleasing abode
to the ill fated maiden, whose pride had been so
strangely humbled, and who had so little ground to
hope, in that desert island, to find an abode, not
only commodious, but fitted up with reference even
to magnificence and beauty.
At the assigned hour he returned to his charge,
who appeared to make efforts to disguise the
manifest
pleasure which overspread her countenance at
his return. The day had been sultry, and it was
obvious, from his countenance, that he had laboured
severely. While she complimented him for his
punctuality in the observance of the hour, she found
occasion to blame him for his appearance of being
fatigued, and having evidently tasked his exertions
too far. They partook of their rustic fare together.
She praised the delicious flavour of the bread-fruit,
while he spoke cheeringly of the comforts of their
table, and of their evenings, when fire should add
the varieties of flesh, fish, and fowl to their food,
and light to their grotto. She spake, in turn, with
admiration of the charming tropical landscape
spread around, and her heart manifestly opened to
joy, with the feelings natural to the sunguine
character
of youth, the elastic freshness of a happy
consciousness of existence, and the increased
susceptibility
of pleasure, which ordinarily accompanies
the first day of convalescence from acute disease.
He admonished her that it was time they were on
their way. While he struck the tent, and laid the
canvass, and all the articles which he did not now
take to the grotto, carefully by for future use, she
had wandered to the spring, and all those well
remembered
places, where, in the first desolation of
her being cast on shore, she had travelled about in
faintness, terror, and despair. When she returned,
her glistening eyes had evidently been filled with
the tears of remembrance and thankfulness.
Her guide carefully led her away from the shore,
where she could only encounter sights of horror.
The day had been sultry; but fleecy clouds now
tempered the glow of the declining sun, and a
fresh and balmy breeze whispered from the east.
Birds, and animals, and refreshed nature, all gave
sign that they felt the change and the deliciousness
of the hour. Hares of variegated colours every
moment moved from their path. Scarlet pigeons
fluttered on the trees. Paroquets flew from palm
to palm, in the splendour of their green and gold.
Flamingos sailed away through the air, leaving
the appearance of a long gleam of flame behind
them. The prodigious hairy bustards were
conducting
their flocks of young through the grass.
Squirrels of surprising beauty and variety sported
among the branches. Here and there a solitary
kangaroo, stalking erect, and uttering its plaintive
cry, at first alarmed her, until she was apprised of its
timid and harmless character, when its prodigious
springs and its uncouth form afforded sufficient
scope to her curiosity. She was in admiration at
the freshness and grandeur of the scene. Never had
she conceived before the richness and magnificence
of nature in these regions of the south. She had
hitherto lived amidst factitious luxury, and the forced
and unnatural creations of art. Pride, plied with
indulgence, and pampered by wealth, had perverted,
but not destroyed, the feelings of a rich and noble
mind. All the peculiar circumstances of her case
contributed to develope a new nature; and amidst
this creation of genuine natural grandeur and
beauty, to place her in the very bowers of
imagination
and poesy. Her delight was pictured on her
countenance. Her admiration was too deep and
genuine to waste itself in words.
From the box he loaded himself with such articles
as were yet requisite to complete the new
establishment
.
Wine was deemed necessary for the
convalescent
.
She, on her part, seeing him overloading
himself, and already fatigued, gaily insisted upon
sharing the burdens. To all his anxiety lest the
walk should fatigue her and renew her sickness, and
to all his remonstrances against her charging
herself
with carrying any part, she answered, that she
never felt herself in more perfect health, and that
she hoped ere long to prove to him, preposterously
as she had been reared for such expectations, that
she did not intend to be entirely a useless burden on
his hands.
They passed the bread-fruit tree. He explained
to her its value. Both saw, with regret, that the
supply was almost exhausted; and, as usual, that
birds were preying upon the remainder. As much
of this fruit as they could carry was added to their
burden, and to alleviate the pain of seeing the
failure of this supply so near, he reminded her of
the inexhaustible store of food in their treasures
hid in the sand. He assured her that he would
soon have fire, and then that their future fare would
be various and abundant, and that, in probability,
more trees of the same kind would be discovered.
The little lake, as usual, teemed with
waterfowls
,
of a number, variety, and gaudiness of
plumage
,
to mock all description. All the customary
varieties of animals played round its margin, as if
admiring its pellucid waters, and the freshness of
its shore. Both gazed with unsated delight upon
the myriads of fishes, of all sizes, forms, and tinges
of brilliant colouring, that were sporting in its
transparent depths. Every succeeding step opened
new views of freshness and beauty, and the fair
convalescent felt and expressed the admiration of a
poet amidst these primeval scenes of novelty and
enchantment. Oh! said she, one thing is yet
wanting. Were my dear father here, and could he
content himself with this bland air, and this
beautiful
nature, I should want nothing more to spend
the remainder of my days in this charming retreat.
When they reached the grotto, the sun had
almost
disappeared behind the trees. She was
fatigued
,
and rejoiced to have reached the end of her
walk by the light of the sun. Her guide aided her
up the steps, to the flowering terrace. She paused
a moment, in admiration of the mixed views of
mountains, woods, verdure, sky and sea, and
entered
the magnificent grotto, holding to the hand
of her guide. Here was new cause for admiration
and astonishment. It needed, she said, but torch
light, to be a magnificent saloon, and she gaily
chided him for having selected the most beautiful
apartment for himself, being convinced, as she
said, that he could not show her another division
of the grotto, equally commodious and magnificent.
But when she followed him through the narrow
division, removing from the passage palm branches
wreathed with flowers composing a door of
fragrace
and verdure, into the interior compartment,
now gilded with the last rays of the sun, pouring
their oblique effulgence from the summits of the
trees; when she looked round upon the polished
sides of the grotto, hung with beautiful branches
VOL. I.12
and flowers; upon the huge green and purple basalt
columns, springing up to the arched roof; when
she saw a couch spread for her, covered with
damask; when she saw the basin of cool waters,
and heard the gentle murmur of the fall of their
overflow in a corner; when she sat down upon a
seat, spread over a prostrate pillar with moss and
flowers, and saw her evening repast spread before
her on a basalt table, whose shining surface and
peach-blow hue were gilded with the last rays of
the sun, she held up her hands in astonishment.
My brother, said she, you have indeed brought
me to the halls of the genii. Why, kings have no
grandeur like this! All this looks like magic, and
the effect of supernatural aid. And, while she
thanked him for his kindness, and his care of her,
and congratulated him on his good fortune in
finding
this astonishing retreat, and his labour and
taste in fitting it up, she assured him, that she was
not the insensible, or ungrateful character, not to
wish to aid him, not to strive to be cheerful, and to
enliven the solitude with all the patience, and
resignation
to her lot, which her stinted discipline and
philosophy would allow her to command.
They took their repast together. The eyes of
both were heavy with weariness. With a look
that reminded her of his remembrance of their
pledged covenant, he wished her a good night,
removed
the palm branches, and retired to the exterior
division of the grotto.
CHAPTER III.
This had she learn'd in cots, where poor men lie;
Her constant teachers had been woods and rills;
The silence, that is in the starry sky;
The sleep, that is among the lonely hills.
Whoever
has read the delightful romance of
Robinson Crusoe, can more readily imagine the
thoughts, and occupations, and pursuits of this
young and solitary pair, a kind of Adam and Eve,
in these charming solitudes. What was so
delightfully
imagined in that book, was here carried into
practical operation. Innumerable arrangements
for comfort and convenience were dictated by their
daily wants. To get home every thing of value
from the boxes, was the work of three or four days.
This was deemed an employment of more
importance
,
than even the journey over the mountains for
fire. The dead cast on the shore, he felt to be a
solemn, though a painful duty, to sink in the water.
The clothes, necessary for his own apparel, and for
hers, hard necessity compelled him to lay by for
emergency and for future use. Much, which the
habits of his fair companion would have required
in another society, and another order of things
such as laces, splendid dresses, and female
ornaments
was
found in the larger box, and delivered
over to her. It was a painful privation, when their
bread-fruit entirely failed. Its delicious flavour and
nutritive qualities, rendered it pleasant to the one,
and almost necessary to the other. Actual
necessity
is a powerful teacher. To her this breakfast
of uncooked oysters, and spoiled and pulverized
bread, was hard and unsavoury fare. But, though
her countenance evinced that she felt the
unpleasantness
of the necessity, this food would sustain
life. After a few trials, it even became a matter
of jesting between them, which should partake of
this unpalatable bread with the least repugnance;
the young man, always accustomed to plain and
humble fare, or the spoiled beauty, used to all the
luxuries and indulgences of wealth. But the more
gaily she sustained these privations, the more
anxious
was he to obtain fire, and with it light for the
evening in the grotto, and the means of using animal
food. A thousand comforts could be had from
that source, which could come from no other. Of
course the journey over the mountains, with a view
to obtain the volcanic fire, was a project set for the
experiment of an early day.
Prior, however, in order of importance even to
that project, he deemed the necessity of examining
the hulk of the Australasia, which, when he left
the tent where he found and saved his companion,
was still remaining wedged in between the rocks.
To swim through the breakers to the wreck, the
only means of arriving there, was an arduous task,
and not without danger. There were, probably, a
mass of bodies of the drowned; and he thought it
not unlikely, that of the father of his companion.
But there were a thousand things, which he hoped
to obtain, of prime and indispensible importance
to his comfort and security. Then, he expected he
might obtain guns and gunpowder, and the means
of furnishing that fire, which was so much sought,
and so necessary to their comfort and sustenance.
But his fair companion soon taught him, that
we may change our climate and our sky, and
experience
the most complete reverses, and be placed
in the most humiliating positions, without changing
the mind, the habits, and dispositions. For a few
of the first days of their residence together, the
beauties of the scenery, the novelty of their
situation
,
and the variety of their occupations filled her
desires, and rendered her cheerful and happy. She
accompanied him on his necessary excursions,
chatted cheerfully of the past, related all that she
had seen in the gay circles in which she had
formerly
acted so important a part, and evidently
manifested chagrin, that her companion could relate
her no corresponding narratives of interest in kind.
The grandeur of the scenery soon palled upon her
eye. She wearied of their unsavoury food, and
repined most of all at the Egyptian darkness of
their nights. Night had long been to her the scene
of show, splendour, and all the artificial excitement
of the high circles in which she had mixed. The
enjoyment had passed, but the craving of habit
remained. Though enjoined to leave her part of
12*
the grotto, immediately upon the departure of the
sun, she apparently felt not sufficiently thankful,
that he was punctual to his part of the contract, to
the very letter. She explained to him, not without
blushing and tears, that she could not endure the
hopeless and silent gloom of the long evenings, and
that she saw no reason of decorum or duty, that
forbade
their passing the hours, until the time of their
retirement, together. When he gaily remarked, that
this was an evil of easy and certain remedy, she
seemed to suffer, on the other hand, from the
apprehension
,
that he would consider this complaint
the result of rudeness, or undue condescension.
As the day after this conversation was assigned
for the projeet of going on board the wreck, and
as she had questioned him on the subject, until he
had confessed, that he considered the effort not
without hazard; with the authority of her former
days, she positively forbade the attempt, and told
him, that she would cheerfully accompany him on
his expedition up the mountain for fire. To this he
objected the extreme fatigue, and the difficulty
which she would experience, in clambering up such
steep and dangerous precipices, as composed the
ascent of those precipitous elevations. In reply
to this she objected to his frequent and long
absences
,
under the name and pretence of business,
declaring, that any conceivable danger and toil
were preferable to the heart-wearing dreariness of
her condition, when left alone. The conversation
ended in chiding complaints and tears. She
requested
him, in marked vexationalthough the
customary
hour of his retirement had not cometo
leave her division of the grotto.
The next morning he determined to make the
experiment of a visit to the hulk of the ship.
Accordingly
,
having left her breakfast in readiness,
he departed by early dawn for the western cove.
He judged the rocks, on which the wreck was cast,
to be three hundred paces from the shore. He left
his coat and hat on the shore, bound his head with
a handkerchief, and committed himself fearlessly to
the water. It was a calm morning, and the sea
was as a mirror. He found no difficulty in
reaching
the wreck. He clambered up the rocks, upon
which it was raised many feet above the level of
the calm sea, and entered it with shuddering. The
hulk of the ship was almost entire. After it had
capsized, as has been related, appearances were,
that it drifted on the mountainous sea to these
rocks, near which it must have been, when that
event took place. It must have been borne on the
mountain-billows between the two rocks, which held
it fast. The storm subsided soon afterwards, and
left it raised high above the ordinary level of the
sea. When the surface of the sea became calm,
the water drained from the ship, leaving it perfectly
dry. It seemed to have been washed a second time
by the spray on the night of the thunder storm,
which has been described. A few bodies only were
found in the hulk. The cattle and sheep, he
remembered
,
had been cast adrift at the
commencement
of the storm. Most of the people, that had
not taken to the boats, appeared to have perished
in the surf, in attempting to reach the shore. The
spectacle, as it was, affected him with sickness and
horror. Every thing, that had not been washed
away by the waves, remained, as it had been left.
There was every thing on board, that he could
have desired,furniture, beds, clothing; articles of
show and luxury for the opulent colonists, among
which articles were the whole of the very expensive
preparations of Mr. Wellman, for a residence in
New Holland. There was merchandize for the
merchants at Port Jackson; and there were
implements
of every sort, for commencing forming
establishments
,
which he valued highest of all. Most
of these articles were packed in water-proof
enclosures
.
The hulk had so soon parted with its water,
through the fissures, made when the ship struck on
the rocks, that none of the articles were much
damaged
by the sea.
The first reflection was an obvious one. How
valueless was all this wealth and luxury to those
unfortunates, whose bodies were stretched before
him! How invaluable would they be to him, if he
were destined to spend his days on the island! The
unpleasant reflection immediately followed, that
the hulk was distant five miles from his grotto
that between it and the shore was a surf, in times of
the slightest commotion of the sea, impassable
and even were the articles all landed, it would be
the work of a year, to convey such of them as he
needed, by hand to his grotto. Another unpleasant
reflection, naturally associated with this, and it was,
that the first severe storm would probably carry
away the hulk, and bury all these invaluable
treasures
in the deep.
His first duty was, to commit all the bodies to
the waves. His next, to imagine some expedient,
by which he could convey to the shore two or three
muskets, a quantity of gun powder, flints and steels,
and all the necessary apparatus for kindling, and
renewing fire. To construct a skiff, would be a
work of time. To remain on board over night,
would be to inflict the most cruel apprehensions
upon the companion of his solitude. A raft, large,
strong and convenient, such as he could manage
with a sail, and of materials to live upon the water
by their own buoyancy, this was his first and most
obvious thought. No time was to be lost. He
was strong, active, and expert in the use of tools.
There was every thing at hand, requisite for the
construction which he meditated. He let down by
levers four spare spars, spiked them strongly
together
,
and overlaid them with plank. This was
accomplished by noon. A number of muskets, a
small but complete assortment of farmer's tools, a
set of carpenter's implements, two boxes of clothing,
cloths, and articles of luxury, intended for his
companion
;
a box of books and stationary, a barrel of
gunpowder, and two or three barrels of the ship's
stores, let down on to the platform by a tackle, formed
the first load. A thousand things were suggested
to his memory, as necessary or useful. But he
reflected, that the more he loaded his raft, the
deeper it would sink, and the more unmanageable
it would become, and the less probability there
would be of his reaching the eastern cove, distant
five miles, by the light of the sun. The whole was
ready by two in the afternoon. He erected a sail
in the centre, and prepared a sweep, in the form of
a rudder, behind; took advantage of a whispering
western breeze; looked up to the sky for success;
unloosed the fast, by which his raft was connected
to the hulk; and sped away before the wind. He
was at once assured, that his rudder commanded
the direction of his frail craft; but to him, whose
anxiety for her whom he had left behind, caused
him to wish for the wings of the wind, the
progress
was vexatiously slow. He was well aware,
too, that the slightest storm would instantly shake
his raft in sunder. It may be supposed, therefore,
that he watched the clouds with trembling
apprehension
,
and that an hour seemed to him, in the
measure of time, as a day. Providence had
destined
him a safe arrival. The sun, indeed, was
behind the western mountains, just as he neared the
two projecting cliffs, between which was the cove.
The wind and the current were both in his favour.
He happily calculated the medial distance, and
entered safely; and in a few minutes, with a heart
palpitating with joy and triumph, completed his
hazardous experiment, by laying his raft beside the
shore. To fasten his raft, and to place all his
treasures
on the shore, were but labours of a moment.
Such was his impatience to reach the grotto, that,
fatigued as he was, by such great exertions through
the day, he sprang away with only implements for
kindling fire, and food of the ship's stores, together
with coffee and sugar, to prepare a supper of such
a comparatively sumptuous kind, as his new
resources
allowed; and with quick step, he eagerly
pressed on with his load for the grotto.
The dusk of twilight, enabled him to discover
his companion standing on the terrace. Courage,
he cried, my sister. I have brought you fire,
food, comforts, light for your evenings, and books
for your solitude. It was with difficulty, that he
laboured up the steps with his heavy load. She
held out her hand to him, and said, I suppose I
must welcome you, though you have manifested
the cruelty to leave me unwarned, and with only
grounds to suppose, that you had found means to
escape from the island, and leave me to perish
alone. As she said this, the resentment which she
seemed to have striven to keep up, in aid of pride
and firmness, failed her, and she burst into an
agony of tears.
This, it is true, was a damping reception after
an absence of so much hazard, and an adventure
of such complete success. He felt, that he had
been in fault, for allowing a momentary
resentment
of the preceding evening to sway him to
venture on this absence, without forewarning her
of his purpose. He confessed his fault, and asked
her pardon, assuring her at the same time, that one
inducement to attempt the adventure without
forewarning
her, was, that she had absolutely forbidden
it; and that he was reluctant to enter on a project,
however indispensable, which she not only
disavowed
,
but forbade. But I have accomplished
it, said he, and with the most complete success.
Hence forward, he continued, my sister, if you
will allow your humble friend to use that
affectionate
title, you can have all the comforts of
civilization. You can concentrate your thoughts
in reading and study, and have every thing but
society. The Almighty is my witness, that you
shall never be reminded by me, that you are not
skreened by the sanctity of a mother's protection.
All I ask of you is, to trust me. I have convinced
myself, that your father is not among those who
perished. When the boats were taken in the last
extremity, the shore was near. It is possible, it is
even probable, that your father may be on this
island. Or, more probably, they landed here,
waited until the storm abated, and then departed in
the long boat for New Holland, which cannot be
far distant. Courage, then, my fair and unhappy
sister. I have been reared both modestly and
religiously
.
You shall find me a chevalier Bayard,
without reproach at least, if not without fear. All
I desire, is your entire confidence. That I can
hope to win only by time; and I will so conduct,
with such scrupulous regard to honour and duty,
that I will compel you to grant me that in the end.
To this speech, if such it may be called, the first
he had made, and which was now extorted from
him in the joy of his success in the hazardous
adventure
of the day, she replied by drawing herself
up, and assuming the indignant air of a proud and
injured belle. This is fine, Mr. Steward, said
she, very fine. You have been among the Houri
to-day, I should suppose, and possibly you have
made free with nectar on ship board. I have no
fears on the score, to which you have with so much
gallantry, alluded. I have already given you full
credit, either for honour or insensibility. But, I
put it to your humanity, sir, to inform me, how,
with all your capacity for making such a speech
as you have just done me the honour of addressing
to me, and proffering such a show of exceeding
sentimentality, I ask, how you could reconcile it to
your humanity, to go off this morning, without
giving me notice of your intended purpose? What,
think you, must have been the colour of my
thoughts, through this long day? I do not doubt,
sir, that you carry courage to the point of rashness.
You are the first person, whom I have ever known
before, uniting courage with cruelty. You found
me, you will say, and saved my life. I grant you
so. But a thousand times would I rather have
perished with you on your raft, than have been left
in this great and splendid sepulchre, to die a long
and living death. I have only one more remark,
sir. If you mean to leave me alone again,
unwarned
,
kill me, sir, before you depart. I can but
VOL. I.13
add the homely, but strong adage, `poor company
is better than none.'
He could not fail to remark, amidst this apparent
irony, anger, and seeming grief and resentment,
that kind feelings, forgiveness, and even triumph
and joy, were in her countenance. Such language,
too, it must be admitted, came with a better grace
from a young and beautiful woman, in the
conscious
charms of loveliness of form and countenance,
and graceful indignation, and in the grief and
helplessness
of her peculiar condition, than it would
have had in different circumstances. He received it
with apparent complacence; and gaily replied, that
he would hope that happier hours would bring
happier dispositions, and that he was exhausted
with fatigue and hunger, and must prepare supper
for himself. He hoped, however, that she would
manifest her magnanimity and forgiveness, by
sharing it with him.
So saying, he descended, and soon returned
with fuel, which he placed in his hearth. Next
candles and candlesticks were produced. The fire
flickered and blazed brightly on the hearth.
Candles
were lighted, and placed in both divisions of
the grotto. The gorgeousness and splendour of
these grand basaltic apartments, when thus
brilliantly
illuminated, creating in a moment an
enchanted
palace, may be imagined, but cannot be
described. The brilliance, the inspiring
cheerfulness
,
the imposing effect of the spectacle, was
irresistible
.
It reminded her of the fetes of London.
Nothing but the society and the music were
wanting
.
The revulsion, the transition, in inspiring
joy and cheerfulness, banished gloom, and chagrin,
and ill-feeling, if any remained. She held out her
hand. You have behaved badly, my brother,
she said; but I must forgive you, in consequence
of the benefits you have procured us. Promise me
only that you will never undertake another
enterprise
without forewarning me, and allowing me to
share it with you, if I choose, and I will
immediately
show you that I am not altogether a useless
being in existence. I am not much used, you must
suppose, to the duties of the kitchen; but I will be
your housekeeper. You shall see how comfortably
I will arrange every thing that belongs to the
interior
of your establishment. Indeed, she added,
looking up to the lofty vaulted summit of the grotto,
which was kindled with all the colours of the bow,
we want nothing but two or three fine young
ladies and gentlemen to have a party.
Rejoiced to see her more cheerful than he had
yet seen her, and glad to remark the departure of
gloom and resentment from her countenance, he
admonished her, that provisions and coffee might
be prepared, and that it was only necessary to
bring the requisite vessels from the shore. They
descended together to the shore. The necessary
vessels were selected and carried to the grotto. He
was amused and delighted with the grace and
promptness with which, for the first time probably
in her life, she put herself to the duties of the kitchen.
It was cause for mutual jest and mirth between
them, to compare their comparative cleverness in
this new occupation to both.
But cheerfulness and mutual emulation were
successful. The coffee was parched and ground.
Pickled tongues and fresh oysters were produced.
Sweet and undamaged bread and butter were found
among the stores. Claret and water were at hand.
They were seated at a table, which would have
been comfortable under any circumstances; and it
needed little effect of imagination and contrast to
render it delicious here. He remarked, that he
had now the means of taking and domesticating
whatsoever animals or birds they should choose,
either for use or beauty; and that with a musquet,
and with hooks and lines, there could be
henceforward
no want of food. She added, in a tone of
cheerful sincerity, that it would now be delightful
to explore the charming country about them for
the delicious bread-fruit. She concluded by saying,
that all she required, in reference to future visits to
the wreck was, that she might be allowed to
accompany
him on the raft. This, she remarked, would
hinder him from attempting the voyage when the
weather was not safe; or, if danger occurred, would
expose them, as she earnestly desired it might be,
to perish together. Assured on this point, they
conversed long and cheerfully together, on a
thousand
points of discussion, as interesting and
pleasant
to them as they would be useless and tedious
in the detail to any but them.
A couple of days ensued, in which the wind was
adverse to sailing the raft to the wreck, and in these
days they made excursions in the beautiful solitudes
that surrounded the grotto. Nature every where
speaks one language to the young, innocent, and
happy. She forgot her pride in the midst of these
flowering lawns, and gave up her heart to the joy
of health, and the beauty of nature and the animal
creation about her. It was evident, indeed, that
the pride which had been fostered by long habits
of luxury and indulgence, was only humbled, not
crushed nor subdued. It was evident, that amidst
these solitudes, feelings and thoughts natural in the
regions where they were inspired, but preposterous
here, arose every moment in her bosom. But,
during these days, in the first indulgence of
comfortable
food, books, and the cheerfulness of fire,
and lighted apartments in the long tropical
evenings
,
she was all animation, gaiety, kindness, and
good will. She tripped by his side, with the fresh
vivacity, and in the splendour of beauty of the gay
birds that flitted about her. She gathered the flowers,
and admired their novelty, hues, and fragrance. She
never tired, in watching the beauty of the skipping
animals, that frolicked in their view. She admired
the verdure and prodigious foliage of the grand
palms. Every new tree, bush, or flowering shrub,
was an object either of curiosity or pleasure. Her
eye kindle with the genuine poetic fire, in view of
the black mountains, pouring their columns of
volcanic
smoke from their cloud-enveloped summits,
13*
in spiral columns. The lovely lake, which they
visited, drew from her again exclamations of
delight
;
and she remarked, that its shores must be
the home of dryads and nymphs. While she was
thus happy, nature took the form and colouring of
her own thoughts and feelings; and every thing
was seen invested with the hues of the rainbow, and
showed as good and fair as she felt joyful.
It was not the least of his trials, to be thus placed
in relation to a woman so lovely, so graceful, so
highly educated, so capable of all that interests
the susceptible heart, or fills the youthful eye. The
peculiar duties of a relation, so without parallel,
was neither misunderstood or forgotten for a
moment
.
But to observe those duties scrupulously,
in thought, in word, in look, in action, and never
for an instant to overlook them, was not rendered
less difficult or trying, by remarking, what even
humility itself could not overlook, that
consideration
,
deference, and almost attentive kindness,
marked her deportment towards him, during the
happy rambles of these two days. The groves of
Eden, before sin had saddened them, were scarcely
more fresh. The seftness of the air, and the aspect
of the delightful scenery, were inspiring. The
young solitary felt, that these delicious hours might
end in disappointment. On the second day, they
had wandered so far, that she complained of fatigue,
and expressed a desire to repose in the shade. It
appeared that they were nearly opposite the chief
volcanic crater; for prodigious masses of smoke,
like the burst from a whole park of artillery, fired
at once, arose from the summit. From the shade
where they sat, they mutually admired the
magnificence
and sublimity of the prospect that was spread
before them, which commanded extensive portions
of the lawn upon either hand, fine views of the
peaks of the mountains, and a boundless prospect
of the broad sea, in some points of view rippling
in blue, and in others purpled with the richness of
the radiance of the declining sun. Here they
reposed
,
in silent admiration, for half an hour. They
then resumed their way home. In approaching it,
by a new route, they walked near the margin of
one of those prodigious basins, known by the name
sink holes. It appeared to include an extent of
a couple of acres, was as regular in its concavity
as a basin, with a depth, perhaps, of eighty feet.
At the bottom, as generally happens in these
singular
cavities, gurgled a spring, which was encircled
with palmettos, and the tropical shrubs that
delight
in a wet soil. His companion admired it
from above, and fancied that she discerned
bread-fruit
.
He instantly scrambled down its steep
declivity
,
and to his unspeakable satisfaction,
discovered
not only one, but a cluster of bread-fruit
trees, loaded with fruit, and in a situation so
peculiar
and secluded, or looking so suspicious to the
birds that prey on it, that not a fruit seemed to
have been touched. The supply was ample, and it
was situated but a moderate distance from the grotto.
As he came up with his hands loaded, and gave
her the fruit, and related the chances of an easy
and constant supply, it seemed a circumstance of
peculiar gratification to her, that she had made the
discovery, and had proved that she was not wholly
useless, and that she sometimes brought good
fortune
.
Feeding upon this fruit had raised her from
her sickness. Her fondness for it, was probably
increased by association. My dear brother,
said she, this is fortunate indeed. You know not
how much I admire this delicious fruit. What a
delightful abode would this island be, if my father
were only here! This naturally led him to
renewed
assurances of the means that he should now
possess, to build a boat that might carry them from
the island, and that he purposed to make that one
of his earliest efforts, in which he would either
succeed
,
or perish.
They returned, refreshed and delighted, to the
grotto. The cheerful fire blazed. The coffee was
prepared, and she seemed to manifest no offence,
when he compared her bustling round, in preparing
the arrangements for supper, to Eucharis in the cave
of Calypso. After this supper, prepared by
themselves
,
and for themselves, and which circumstances
rendered so exhilarating, a long and interesting
conversation
ensued. The full and unrestrained
disclosure
of the powers of her mind, showed it to be
of great vigour, compass, and richness; with
dispositions
naturally good and amiable, and a heart
formed to admire, and practise excellence; but
spoiled by mismanagement, pride, and indulgence.
This she confessed, and lamented with great
frankness
.
She entered into the history of her past life,
and ran through the names, as of a muster-roll, of
those who had composed the splendid circles, where
she had so recently shone preeminent. The want
of keeping of such remembrances, with all that now
belonged to her condition, struck her in its proper
light. At the same time, she confessed, that she
constantly resisted the inclination to converse
about these gone by scenes. She lamented the
influence
of the views and habits of her former career;
admitted that she had been reared without energy,
or capacity for any useful pursuit or employment;
and that she had been trained only to dazzle others,
and gratify her own pride and vanity. She
continued
,
in a healthy, and virtuous, and educated
woman of your own condition, and your own
country, you would have, Oh! what a treasure!
What have you, she added, blushing deeply,
what have you in me? A proud, spoiled, useless,
vain, capricious, and flattered thing, once called a
beauty. But, indeed, she continued, I will
attempt
to reform. I will remember, that I am here
in the furnace. Aid me, my dear brother; for in
whatever condition you have been born, I well
understand
,
that you are both wiser and better than
myself; aid me, that I may come forth, as gold.
To suppose, that after such a conversation, held
under such circumstances, he would not reply in a
manner somewhat corresponding, would be to
suppose
him more or less than man. Indeed, he was
proceeding in a strain, which reason and conscience,
and his rules, so rigidly prescribed by and for
himself
,
interdicted. He felt his danger and came to a
firm pause.
While they were engaged in this conversation,
which he felt ought not to be continued, they were
interrupted
by the alarming and terrible phenomenon
of a volcanic eruption. The craters, as has been
remarked, were on the other side of the mountains;
and they could see the volume of ignited and
flaming lava, projected with the inconceivable
omnipotence of that Power, that we absurdly
denominate
nature, into the higher regions. Feeble
efforts to paint the awfulness and sublimity of this
scene by words, would be thrown away. The
island rocked to its centre. Vivid lightning,
followed
by tremendous peals of thunder, darted from
the dark crimson column of ascending lava. The
island, and the illimitable extent of the surrounding
sea, and the dark bosom of night received a lurid
and portentous crimson colouring, from the
immense
mass of flaming matter, thrown up by this
incalculable force. The crimson column produced
an awful shadowing in the sea, as the scorching
volume rolled into its depths, the effect of which,
no pencil or words could reach. They both fled
to the open area in front of the grotto; and she,
with the paleness of death in her countenance, held
fast to his arm. In a few minutes the eruption
ceased; but the hollow roar of the ocean, continued
to evince, that the action of these central fires
deeply agitated its heaving bosom. It was not
until the eruption had ceased for half an hour, that
she became assured, that the final catastrophe of
nature had not come.
The solemn train of thoughts, that ensued on
their return to the grotto, naturally introduced a
conversation upon the subject of religion. Her
heart was manifestly softened and penitent. It was
deep and affecting on both sides. Each expressed
the hope, that the peculiar discipline, trials, and
burdens, which Providence had imposed on them,
might prove salutary; and that, isolated, and
lonely, as they were, they might hold communion
with God, and endure all that was before them, as
they ought. The Bible was produced, from which
he read the beautiful hundred and fourth psalm;
and from the Episcopal service, which was that in
which she had been reared, he read a prayer and a
collect, suitable to the occasion. She joined her
sweet voice to his in an evening hymn; and
whenever
the day terminated happily, and in good and
cheerful feelings on her part, this was his invariable
custom, before he retired to rest. The night passed
without any renewal of the terrific phenomena of
renewed eruption, though she shrieked at midnight
from ideal terrors in a dream, that the eruption was
renewed. Her cries instantly brought him to her
side. She became calm and assured, as she realized,
that she had only been dreaming.
In the morning, the wind was fair to sail again
to the wreck. Much that was there, would be
essential to their mutual comfort on the island. To
save the planks, the iron, the cordage, the tools
and implements, would be necessary for the
construction
of the boat, which he contemplated. The
beds were important for their mutual necessities.
The cloth would be required for a thousand uses,
that time would develope. A dispute ensued,
managed on her part not without bitterness. She
insisted, that they had already all that was
necessary
for comfort and subsistence; that life, as it
was, had too many enjoyments to put at hazard,
on such a dangerous voyage; that if he had had
the fortune to perform it once in safety, there was
no sure ground to calculate thence, that it would
always be so, and that at any rate, existence there
alone, would be absolutely insupportable; and she
concluded by insisting upon sharing the voyage, if
he persisted in attempting it. When the question
bade fair to become too animated, at least on one
part, it was finally terminated by his postponing
the attempt, until he had built a skiff of the planks
already brought to land. He thought it scarcely
probable, that so sudden a gale could arise, as that
he might not be able to detach a skiff from the raft,
and row safely through the little distance that
interposed
between the course of the raft and the
shore.
The next morning, then, saw him on the shore,
employed as a ship carpenter, and her under a
contiguous
shade, with her paper and writing materials
spread before her, on a plank, which he had
prepared
as a table. She occupied herself in reading,
or writing, or embroidering; and he was earnestly
and intently engaged in building a firm and safe
skiff. On the third day the skiff was completed.
The wind was still favourable; and, according to
the compact, they both took passage together in
the skiff, attached to the raft, which moved slowly
out of the little cove, and was soon speeding to the
wreck before the breeze. They reached it in safety.
It was of course a melancholy spectacle to her to
revisit the scene of her misfortunes. But, having
overcome the first shock, she was not only cheerful,
but useful; for while he was intently engaged in
labours, she was occupied in judging and selecting
the most important articles for removal. Enough
planks for the contemplated boat was by him
considered
as lading of the most essential importance,
and he determined that the half of that and each
succeeding cargo should be planks. The loading
was completed. Beds, clothing, books, and articles
of use for his purposes, or of convenience or
ornament
for her, were selected. The wind, which
blew from the west in the morning, regularly shifted
to the east in the evening. When this breeze had
risen, they hoisted their sail, the parties occupying
the attending skiff, and sailed pleasantly and safely
into the cove. The cargo was landed as before.
It would require the succeeding day to bestow the
cargo of that day in the grotto. They had now
the comfort of beds, and tables, and chairs, and
ottomans
,
and sofas, and various articles of the kind,
VOL. I.14
which often drew sighs from their fair present
possessor
,
as she meditated for what different places and
uses they were intended. With propensities, which
circumstances may modify, but not obliterate from
the female mind, her apartment, as it may be called,
was fitted up in a style of luxury and splendour, in
keeping with her former habits and tastes, and its
natural magnificence. He aided her with delight
in suspending her crimson curtains, in looping her
festoons, and arranging the splendid drapery of her
bed; for the costly hanging ornaments and
furniture
which were intended for a number of the most
opulent families in New Holland, had all been
ordered
and freighted in this ill-fated ship; and the
parties remarked, that their apartments were of a
size to require furniture and fittings sufficient for
the supply of a colony.
When it came his turn to have his apartment
furnished, her taste was to bestow upon it a
magnificence
similar to her own. He smiled, and
resisted
so firmly, that it received no other additions
than the plain and simple arrangements required
by comfort, and in keeping with the light of the
place, and his condition and circumstances. But
when by the light of evening he contemplated the
taste, the splendour, and drapery of hers, he could
not but experience the dazzling and imposing effect.
To render it still more striking, she presided at
their supper in a dress of taste and richness. While
she sat in this huge apartment, brilliantly lighted,
in all the pride of youthful beauty, heightened in
its effect by one of those rich dresses which had
been intended to grace her first entrance into society
in Port Jackson, she seemed to have felt the
illusion
of her own contrivance, and to be looking
round for the entrance of the numerous circle and
the brilliant party that was to grace her saloon.
But a single companion sat with her at a table.
He was modest and humble; but he was in the
pride of high principles, of manly beauty, of
guarded decorum and respect, where all laws but
those of honour and principle were unavailing. He
had saved her life. On all occasions, she saw him
constraining his will, sacrificing his wishes, and
lavish of exertions, and of every exposure, for her
sake. It will not be strange to suppose, that the
arbitrary distinctions and modes of thinking in
society may have given place, for a time, to kinder
and more natural emotions towards him, than she
had yet avowed to him, or to herself.
All that need be added to the history of their
successive
voyages to the wreck is, that the uniform land
and sea breeze favoured the morning and the return
trip; that they continued to repeat them, until every
thing of the wreck was brought to the landing of the
grotto, that the remotest prospective views of their
future wants could indicate, as necessary for any
of his projected purposes. Most of the plank, and
articles of value or use, that were within his power
to remove, had been brought safely to the landing,
when, as they were making their customary
entrance
to the harbour, a sudden storm arose, which
immediately separated the raft, merged its contents
in the deep, and compelled them to detach
themselves
from it, and to reach the shore, as they might,
in their skiff. The succeeding night they heard
the storm pour, and the torrents roll from the
mountains
,
and the thunders burst, and the winds howl,
and the seas dash upon the shore, while their cheerful
fire gleamed within, and their coffee issued its grateful
fragrance; and they contrasted the security and
shelter
of their mountain with their own chances, had
that storm arrested them by day; and their sympathy
was excited, as they thought of the poor desponding
mariners struggling with the brute and terrific force
of that devouring and uncontrolled element.
When the morning sun again shone upon the
ocean, the trees, and the sky, the storm had past,
and nothing remained of it but the balmy freshness
of the air, and the countless pearls that glittered on
the foliage and the grass. They travelled together to
the region of the wreck, and, as they had supposed,
it was all swept away. He could only congratulate
himself, that he had made the most diligent use of
his time, and had saved from it all that present
appearances
indicated could ever come in use.
Henceforward he determined to allot his time,
and to bend his efforts to three distinct purposes.
First, to build a boat of sufficient size to authorize
an attempt to navigate the distance between this
island and New Holland, and thus enter upon his
pledged purpose, to convey her, if possible, to the
British settlements in those regions; and in the
second place, to prepare his residence for the utmost
degree of defence and resistance, in case they should
be assailed by savages, either inhabitants of the
island, or such as might casually land there; to
domesticate animals and birds, at once for use and
convenience, and to add the cheerfulness of
domesticated
life around their habitation; and lastly, to
explore the island by crossing the mountains, as he
would have preferred, but aiding her to scale them,
if she would not consent to his making the
expedition
without her company.
The first, as the most important, occupied the
first place in their plans. A canopy was prepared
under a tent, pitched beneath a spacious palm, near
the proposed ship yard. Her writing desk, and
table, and chair were placed there. And she
occupied
herself, as she might, in reading, in writing,
in walking under the palms, in dreaming upon the
past, or possibly in thinking about new ornaments
of dress; for she seemed to be as studious upon those
points, and as particular in that respect as she had
been in the days of her triumph in London.
Occasionally
she observed her companion in solitude,
busily employed, from hour to hour, and from day
to day, in his wearying and protracted employment.
More than once, when she remarked him perplexed
and embarrassed, or weary, and covered with
perspiration
,
would she repair to him, wipe away the
sweat from his brow, and request him to desist from
his toil, assuring him that she was content and
happy as she was, and was not at all sure that she
14*
should ever consent to allow the voyage to be
undertaken
,
even should he succeed in the vexatious
business. When she saw no other way of
detaching
him from a labour that evidently wore upon
him, she would take him away, by insisting that
he should join her in a walk in the shade.
For variety and amusement, they sometimes
angled
in the beautiful little lake, or took short
excursions
on the water in their skiff, and drew up the
different species of fish from the sea. The varieties
that were found to be of the highest flavour only
were selected, and the rest returned to their native
element. With the advantage of traps and
cordage
,
and with pit-falls, and in other methods, they
soon had, as prisoners on the terrace, pairs of all
the animals and birds, that either for beauty, or
utility, or singularity of form, or habit, they
desired
to domesticate. It was a study, equally
pleasant
to both, to observe their various instincts and
habits, to hear their different songs and cries, to
remark the effects of kindness and gentle treatment
upon each, according to its nature. It was an
instructive
spectacle, to mark the effect of training
and example, and the tendency, which so many
birds and animals together felt, to wear off the
strong points of their characters, and to assimilate
to each other. Every animal and bird manifested
something of the propensities of the mocking bird,
to lay some part of its own habits aside, and assume
something of what appertained to the rest. It was
equally amusing and interesting to mark, that pride
and vanity has a place in the irrational creation, as
well as in man. Another important axiom was
drawn from this interesting study, and that was,
that there is nothing that has life and sensation, so
wild and brutal, as not to be susceptible of the
influence
of kindly treatment. It was a menagerie
and an aviary, that for variety of form, and
splendour
of plumage, and wildness of note, and
amusing
singularity of habit and action, could hardly
find a parallel in the collections of wealth and
power.
The fair Augusta was almoner to these prisoners,
and the spectacle was equally amusing and
ludicrous
,
to see how soon they recognised her power,
and felt her kindness, and manifested a visible and
marked partiality for her over him. As soon as
she came forth, they croaked, or flapped their
wings, or nodded, or bounded, or in some way
uttered their peculiar demonstrations of affection
and joy. She, too, began to designate her
favourites
,
among which were a pair of kangaroos,
remarkable for their docility, a pair of scarlet
pigeons, and a hare distinguished for its brilliant
mottled spots. One inconvenience attended this
collection of animals. Their various notes and
cries, commencing after midnight, were at first
exceedingly
annoying to the parties, and often
disturbed
their morning slumbers.
These various pursuits, most of them of a
cheerful
character, completely occupied their time, and
left them not to the endurance of ennui and a
burdensome
existence. The hours flew in their
appropriate
duties, and the day seemed only too short
for their labours.
In the meantime, Augusta Wellman had not only
recovered completely from the effects of her
sickness
,
but pure air, healthful and nutritive food,
constant exercise, and the continual view of nature
in her repose and beauty, had given her a health,
and elasticity, and freshness, that she had never felt
before. No midnight vigils, and jealousies, and
revelries, and heart-burnings at the ball, or
masquerade
,
or opera, among the proud, and the
opulent
,
and the licentious, planted feelings in the heart,
that soon, or late, notwithstanding all that art, and
dress, and decoration can cover, or prevent, mark
the brow with ill temper, wrinkles, and care. The
re-action of returning health, a tranquillity and
repose
of heart, corresponding to that of nature,
imparted
to her a buoyancy and cheerfulness that she
had never known before. In such, the heart every
where speaks one language. The same inspiration
of nature, which makes the lamb skip among the
first flowers of spring, and the wild fawn bound on
the green slopes of its sylvan domains, filled her
young heart not only with joy, but unhappily with
those vague desires after more, with those
remembrances
of the past, with those incompatible and
illimitable expectations and desires, that,
manifested
in a thousand ways, began to be a never ending
source of vexation to the better regulated mind of
her companion. Calm, laborious, disciplined in his
thoughts and tempers, and satisfied with a little,
their abundance, and range, and opulence, and
repose
were to him all that he wished or desired. To
him this residence was not only peace and repose,
but it was happiness. He had thoughts and trials,
indeed, peculiarly his own, and which he hardly
dared to pass in review before his own mind. But
he was too generous, too much above the selfish
meanness of personal gratification, to wish
enjoyments
purchased at the expense of the happiness of
another. He was not only aware that the
companion
of his solitude was formed to grace, adorn,
and enjoy society, but that she belonged to it. He
felt, too, the strong teachings of reason and
conscience
,
that life was given to him for other
purposes
,
than to dream away existence in those
charming
solitudes, though they were shared of necessity
by a woman, every way so fascinating and
attractive
.
Hence his invariable language to himself,
whenever his imagination tempted his thoughts and
purposes astray, was, Thou owest escape from this
island to her, to thyself, to duty, and to God. Thou
must persevere in thy purpose, or lose the applause
of conscience.
To have looked upon this singular pair, as an
invisible
spectator, one would have thought, that
nothing could have been wanting to the happiness
of either. There was shelter, and comfort, and
beauty, and all that the imagination or the heart
could ask, save the single gratification of calling
other and foreign eyes to contemplate their
enjoyments
with them. Yet that eternal ingredient of
bitterness, that in the same way mingles in every
human cup, was there.
Months had elapsed in this tranquil order of
things. Every day added to their stock of comforts
or conveniences. The climate was generally mild,
and delightfully refreshed with the alternations of
the land and sea breeze. When the terrors of a
tropical storm came, the awful change in the sky,
and in the elements, only gave them a deeper and
more home-felt sense of the security of their shelter
under the strength and unchangeable munition of
the superincumbent hills over their heads, whence
they contemplated the fury of the passing storm.
A volcanic eruption only added sublimity to the
monotonous amenity and repose of the ordinary
state of things. Added to this, he was making
rapid progress in completing a decked boat, which
promised to be able to be managed by one person,
and yet to be capable of sustaining the ordinary
chances of the sea. To finish this great work was
his first and most earnest purpose, and he laboured
incessantly towards that point. He had motives to
stimulate him to exertion, which he disclosed only
to his conscience.
His companion, meanwhile, to his astonishment,
instead of manifesting the pleasure so naturally to
have been expected in her case, at the prospect of
a speedy chance of escape from the island, appeared
rather to view the progress of the work with an eye
of dissatisfaction and chagrin. When he was most
intent upon the adjustment and completion of some
difficult constituent part, she would come to him
with a command, sometimes sportive, sometimes
apparently in chagrin, to call him away to walk
with her, to visit some favourite grove, to angle in
the lake, or to share in some of their customary
amusements. She seemed to have a system of
studied arrangements, to prevent the progress of
the work. When they spake of the proposed
voyage
,
she magnified the dangers, and diminished the
chances of escape in the estimation. Sometimes
she denied consent that the voyage should be
undertaken, and that she would accompany him.
Sometimes she sportively talked of remaining
behind, as a hermitess, to live and die alone.
Always
she treated the project as rash and chimerical,
and founded upon too little knowledge of their
position, and the course they ought to take for the
chances of reaching New Holland.
Sometimes she manifested wishes to be alone,
and an inclination to avoid his society. He often
discovered her to have been shedding tears. Her
spirits fluctuated from the extreme of vivacity to
that of silence, dejection and gloom. Sometimes
her deportment towards him was of manifest and
delicate kindness. At other times, had he been
sufficiently acquainted with the modes of acting in
her walk of life, he would have phrased her
conduct
coquetry; but more generally, it seemed a
disposition to rally and ridicule him; the
simplicity
and rustic manners of his country; and his
misfortune in wanting the tastes and habits, only
to be learned in the walks of distinction and fashion.
All this opened upon him a series of petty trials,
of daily and hourly vexations, the more harassing
from his inexperience in the modes, fashions, and
aspects of female manners. He had heard one of
the Latin saws in the school of his native village,
semper varium et mutabile
, and bitterly he reflected
upon the meaning and truth of the adage. He
reasoned, and he sighed within himself. The more
he attempted to penetrate the mystery, and the
secret motives of this conduct, the more perplexing
and inexplicable it seemed. At one moment he
felt sure, that he had seized upon the thread of the
clue. A new aspect of the deportment of his
beautiful
companion, scattered his profound theory to the
winds. There were even times, when his patience
was exhausted; and he had come to the internal
resolution, to break with her, and to give her clearly
to understand, that he would be the victim of her
caprices and changeable temper no longer. When
this purpose had ripened, and honour and manhood
had been invoked to hold him to firmness in his
purpose, she would come upon him in all the
splendour
of studied dress, her fair hair bound with
wreaths of flowers, and her lovely face adorned
with smiles; her scarlet favourites fluttering upon
one arm, and holding him the other, while she
invited
him to a walk in the groves. It was
impossible
,
that his angry purposes should not melt away
at the sight. What was most inexplicable of all
was, that she seemed intuitively to comprehend
these mental storms, to know the secret of their
origin, and to understand exactly the hour, in which
to arrest their progress and developement. She
had lectured in the midst of her domesticated
family
more than once, when she perceived these
thoughts burning within him. She manifested
peculiar pleasure and exultation in showing her
complete ascendency over the instincts of her
animals
and birds. She called, and they came. She
commanded, and they showed a docile obedience.
See, she said, I can tame and civilize a
kangaroo
.
I can learn docility and graces to a water
fowl of the south seas. Man is a monster, that
nothing can tame, and Americans most monstrous
of all. Indeed, you are of all my subjects most
hopeless. The final result of his cogitations upon
the motive and origin of this fluctuation of temper
and caprice of deportment in his fair companion,
was resolved by him into her disappointment and
chagrin in the loss of society, and all operated only
to redouble his exertions to finish his boat, and his
deep purpose to succeed or perish in the attempt to
convey her from the prison of the island.
An incident occurred at this time, which, while
it served to vary the monotony of his thoughts,
added largely to his anxieties and apprehensions.
It was one of her days of gloom and seeming
dissatisfaction
and purpose to be alone. She kept her
apartment, apparently occupied intently in reading.
He was pursuing his customary labours upon his
VOL. I.15
boat. His horror may be imagined, when he saw
two large proas or periogues full of the most ugly
and inhuman looking savages, rowing past the cove.
He dropped behind the shelving covert of the rocks,
rejoicing that he was at the same time undiscovered,
and could mark all their movements. A chill
perspiration
started upon him, at the apprehension that
they purposed to land in the cove. They seemed
stout, athletic people, and apparently warriors, as
they were armed with spears and slings. A few
women on board appeared to manage the sails and
oars. They were woolly headed, with broad faces,
high cheek bones, and seemingly of the most
disgusting
and ferocious character. They paused
upon their oars in the midway distance between the
points of the cove, as it seemed, to remark upon the
novel aspect of the hulk of his boat. More than
once, they seemed disposed to turn their proas in,
and to land. A consultation was evidently held;
at the close of which they flourished their spears
over their heads, gave a terrible shout, as if in
defiance
of their enemies, and turned their boats in
the direction to pass the cove. A few strokes of
their oars carried them behind the cliffs, and he
once more breathed at ease. When he deemed
them at such a distance, as not to discover him,
he mounted the cliff, and had the satisfaction of
seeing their boats gliding away in the distance.
It may readily be supposed, that this discovery,
and all the thoughts and reasonings consequent
upon it, were carefully concealed from his
companion
.
He instantly perceived the necessity of
putting the grotto in the best possible state of
defence
.
Some of the requisite precautions could not
be taken, without exciting her curiosity and
questioning
.
Her sagacity and penetration easily
apprehended
,
as she saw him working a swivel by
tackles and ropes, from tree to tree, to the foot of
the cliff, and thence raising it with infinite labour
to the terrace, that this new kind of precaution was
not without some new cause of apprehension. She
discovered, that his magazines of gunpowder were
carefully dried, that cartridge boxes, with well
prepared
cartridges, were distributed, and suspended,
as if for use, in his apartment; that many muskets
were carefully cleaned, and loaded, as if for action.
It was in vain that he assured her, that these were
precautions which common prudence dictated. The
question incessantly recurredwhy not before?
The very secrecy and concealment, dictated by the
most benevolent regard to her happiness, became,
in consequence, a renewed cause for chagrin,
dissatisfaction
,
and complaint. She regarded this as
the unkindest cut of all, as she declared; and to
show her marked sense of the injustice of this
apparent
want of confidence, she affected loneliness
more than ever. She not only declined her
customary
occupancy of her tent near the boat, where
she used to stay while he was occupied in his
labours
,
but she strolled away at a distance in the
groves, and was sometimes absent the greater
portion
of the day. The more he remonstrated, the
more frequently she took these long absences. He
trembled with the apprehension, that the savages
might come upon her, seize her and carry her
away, or perhaps sacrifice her to their horrible
appetites
.
This dreadful supposition fixed his purpose, to
inform ner what he had seen. Augusta, said he,
I am sorry to see, that you regard me with
aversion
and distrust. I was reluctant to mar the little
tranquillity and comfort you might find in this dull
prison, by filling your mind with apprehensions.
I have seen savages, horrible savages, in great
numbers, and cannibals, I doubt not. Why will
you stray away so far from the protection of your
only friend, who, it is no profession, nor idle
compliment
to say, would sacrifice a thousand lives in
succession, if he could possess them, to serve you?
This is the secret, and the sole one, for fortifying
the grotto. You may now conjecture, why I did
not divulge it before. But I had rather terrify, and
afflict you, than have you fall into the hands of
these horrible savages, by straying so far away
from my protection.
He expected to see her become pale with
apprehension
at this intelligence. But he was not
prepared
for the great agitation, which it appeared to
produce in her. Her countenance rapidly fluctuated
between a feverish flush, and the paleness of death.
But kindness and good feeling towards him, seemed
to preponderate. She held out her hand to him.
I confess my faults, she said; I have been
perverse
and froward. You need not remind me of
what you have done, by proffering what you are
ready to do. I know, and understand it all. I feel
all the kindness of your motives. I will follow you
as closely as your shadow; and, if the savages
come, I have the spirit of noble ancestors in me. I
will aid you to repel them. But, my dear
brother
,
she continued, looking him steadily in the
face, this is genuine gallantry. This proffering a
thousand lives, is the language of Hyde Park. I
shall train you, too, my dear brother, in time, to be
as docile as a kangaroo.
Her manner and countenance on this occasion,
presented her in a new light. This voice and tone,
thought he, is more inexplicable than all I have yet
seen. I shall be able, it may be, in the end, to
sound these depths of female nature. He found the
renewed witchery of her smiles, and the returning
countenance of unrestrained benignity, and
unbounded
confidence bringing a still severer trial,
than any he had yet experienced. To withhold
admiration
from her, who, in all the loveliness of her
beauty, was the constant companion of his solitude,
was impossible. He felt, too, what sages, and men
who were no sages, have felt, that such a form and
such a countenance as hers, informed by such a
mind, was a dangerous object of contemplation
any where; and much more in the strange position,
in which he was constantly placed with her. If he
was obliged, against himself, to see her lovely in
her caprices, in her unreasonable sullenness and
ill-humour
,
15*
he much more strongly felt, that she would
be irresistible in her confidence and her kind
feelings
.
Then he communed with honour, with
conscience
,
and a high sense of duty. She may
escape, said he, to himself. I would not win her
kind thoughts, even if I might. The only remedy
is for us both to fly.
The remainder of the day in which this
conversation
occurred, was passed in preparing a
barricade
,
in front of the entrance to the grotto, and
other defences, to be guarded by the swivel. He
felt assured, on a review of the whole ground, that
there could be no danger in a place, rendered
almost impregnable by nature against a host of
unarmed savages; and after an evening passed in
unwonted mutual tenderness of manner, it was
agreed, that the next day should be devoted to a
journey over the mountains, to satisfy themselves, if
they might, whether the island was inhabited or not.
She insisted so earnestly to accompany him, that
he felt it would be cruel to think of leaving her
behind. She had, indeed, made him more than
once aware, that in point of agility, and power to
travel and sustain fatigue, she had by practice and
perfect health, become no mean competitor with
him.
Accordingly, having provided every requisite
refreshment for passing the night from home, if
necessary, he clad with a soldier's knapsack, and
stored with wine, and a musket slung over his
shoulder, and she, dressed like Diana in the
engravings
,
started together at the early dawn. An
ample supply of food was left for her numerous
domesticated animals, most of which no longer
required
confinement to retain them at the grotto.
Before the sun began to burnish the boundless
wastes of sea, and the dark sides of the mountains,
they commenced their attempt to scale them. The
song of a thousand birds, and the balmy freshness of
morning, cheered their first efforts of ascent. His
fair companion seemed to have imbibed the general
hilarity of nature; and she bounded gaily from
cliff to cliff, with an alacrity which bade fair to
out-strip
his efforts, burdened as he was with a
considerable
weight. She mounted the table-rocks
before him, saying, this is the way the ladies
climb in England, and held down her hand, to
help her wearied brother, as she called him,
advance
to her level. The glow of this exercise, the
inspiring scenery, every moment beautifying and
broadening in their eye, the mountain air, and all
the united circumstances of the excursion, kindled
in her cheek a radiance of beauty, which he had
never seen before. Her spirits were exuberant, and
her delight in gazing at the grand scene below,
above, and around them, unsated. They still
clambered
on, mounting hill above hill, and still
contemplating
the black and frowning precipices,
towering
still higher above them, until they seemed to
prop the sky. When they had reached half the
elevation of the mountain, they came upon a small
table-plain, where was a shade and a spring, and
where he had rested on his first ascent. They there
stopped for shade and repose; and he, with a look
which possibly said more than he intended, and
more than the strictness of his mental
determinations
allowed, reminded her, how differently he had
felt on a former ascent, when he had supposed
himself
the only human being on the island. He was
repaid by unalloyed kindness.
It was nearly mid-day, before they sat down on
a seat of stone on the most elevated pinnacle of the
ridge. It is difficult to imagine, and still more
difficult
to describe, the feeblest outline of that view,
which opened in its immensity under their eye. In
front, and all around, was the boundless sea. At
the foot, the forest showed only as slight
inequalities
on a ground of verdure. Just below them, on
the other side, was the smoking and bottomless
crater of the volcano. They could look down its
dark and pitchy depths, as though it were down the
funnel of some immense chimney. Beyond the
base of the volcano was the beautiful vale, which
had the appearance of an enchanted garden under
their feet. Little meadows dotted with wood,
cascades
,
whose falling sheets seemed white ribbands
suspended from the rocks, and all the varieties of
light and shade, as clouds flitted over the sun were
interspersed on its surface. The chasm through
the elliptical lines of mountains, by which the vale
discharged its waters to the sea, was distinctly
visible
.
The atmosphere was still more transparent
than when he had contemplated the scene before,
and the blue outline of ocean beyond the island was
still more clearly perceptible.
It was natural for them to reflect, in this strange
spot, upon the cast of fortune which had there
seated
a young man from the shores of lake
Champlaine
,
and a lady from the highest circles of
London
,
on the pinnacle of volcanic mountains, in a
lonely and undescribed isle, in the depths of the
south seas. They were, probably, the first mortals
that had contemplated this grand and impressive
scenery, since its creation. His inward respect for
his fair companion was not diminished by
discovering
,
that their position, and what they saw,
produced
sensations and thoughts in her,
corresponding
to his own. He saw, that she entered with her
whole heart into the sublime of the scene. He
noted her entranced look, as her eye kindled. It
was not expressed in the voluble phrase and the
hackneyed technics of the tourist, nor in the
common
exclamations of an ordinary mind; but in
silence, and an expression of thrilling awe and rapt
admiration. Her eye occasionally turned towards
the soft and delicious blue of the sky, canopied
here and there, with fleecy clouds, which seemed
almost floating within touch of their heads. After
a long and expressive silence, she inquired, if he
had ever read Gessner's Deucalion and Pyrrha?
Are we not, she asked, Deucalion and Pyrrha?
To break off the dangerous train of feeling,
inspired by this singular question, he proposed
leaving her there, while he descended to a lower
point of another eminence, not far distant, where
he judged a more perfect view of the vale might be
had. But she declared herself not at all fatigued,
and insisted on sharing all the fatigues and dangers,
as well as honours and pleasures of the journey
of discovery. When they reached that point, as
he had apprehended, a panorama of the vale was
spread before them; and the great point of
investigation
,
for which the journey had been chiefly
undertaken
,
was settled in a moment. The island was
inhabited! An exclamation, arising from a variety
of feelings, burst from each at the same moment.
We are not alone! Smokes arose from human
habitations in various points. The vale seemed
even populous. God be thanked, said he!
This opens surer prospects of escape for us. I
have now a double chance. We will first take a
voyage of discovery, cruising the island, and still
keeping in view the chances of return to it. If
such a voyage open no prospect of escape, I will
fortify our castle, and leave you there, and sojourn
among these islanders, and conciliate them, and
learn the position of adjacent islands, or procure
them to transport us to New Holland in their
proas. My brother, she replied, you never
thaw from your wanted stoicism, and say a thing
that seems like the language of others, but you
immediately spoil all, by propositions like these.
Who seems so constantly anxious to escape from
this island? Is it I? Do I complain of solitude?
It is true, we have not the attractions of a London
circle. But we have many good things even here;
a charming residence, an abundance of all that our
wants require; beautiful birds, a fine country and
climate, docile kangaroos, and who knows to what
accomplishments my brother may yet be trained,
under my forming hands?
Having discovered, that the island was actually
inhabited, and having laid a sure foundation for
all the reasonings and calculations, that could be
based upon that discovery, they commenced their
return. The descent was accomplished without
incident, and they reached the grotto, just as the
sun left the sky. Every thing was, as when they
departed in the morning. No savages, as they
feared, had visited it. Their animals and birds
crowded about them, and received them with so
many demonstrations of joy and welcome, that they
might almost imagine themselves returning to the
bosom of a family.
CHAPTER IV.
If haply from their guarded breast
Should steal the unsuspecting sigh,
And memory, an unbidden guest,
Bid former passions fill their eye;
Then pious hope and duty prais'd
The wisdom of the unerring sway;
And, while their eye to heaven they rais'd,
Its silent waters sank away.
The
human heart is an unfathomable fountain;
and though but few of its deeper secrets have ever
been understood by any but the Omniscient, yet
the history of its more visible movements, is one of
exhaustless interest. A volume would not explain
the motives, thoughts, and purposes, that passed
beneath their bosoms every day. But, as mortals
are able to narrate history, a whole year of this
sort of existence, passed unmarked by any of those
incidents, which make up the ordinary details of
narratives of this kind. The days came, and went
in noiseless tranquillity. The calmness of nature,
and the whispers of the breeze, were sometimes
alternated with the terrible tropical storms; and
sometimes a volcanic explosion, bleached for a few
moments the fair face of Augusta. The number
of the entire domestication of their family of birds
and animals, had become a spectacle of unfailing
interest, to minds that could be pleased with the
simple pleasures of nature. Their table was
regularly
spread with eggs, and fish, and flesh, and fruit,
and was not only abundant, but luxurious.
The fair solitary was for the most part cheerful,
and sometimes even gay; and had in some measure
worn off the evidently painful influence, of taking
her share in the duties of the kitchen. However
she felt this burden, she always took it in good
part; and so far from complaining, often regretted
that she could not aid her brother more. But there
were times, and they recurred with a heart-wearing
frequency for the companion of her solitude, when
the remembrance of the past, and the society from
which she was banished, seemed to come over her
mind with an insupportable gloom. Still, in the
manifestation of these feelings, and in her general
deportment, there often appeared a caprice, a kind
of sullenness, and occasional humours of shutting
herself up in her apartment, which always involved
her motives in a mystery, which he attempted in
vain to solve. Often, where he saw no cause for it,
she received him with a frankness of kindness, that
went direct to his heart; and at another time, when
by earnest assiduity of attention, and by unusual
efforts to anticipate her desires, he felt as if
kindness
would have been the only return, she was cold,
reserved, and distant. He always said to himself,
I shall learn, as I live. I shall finally reach the
mystery.
VOL. I.16
The unhappy young man began to be painfully
convinced, that gracious or gloomy, consistently
kind or capricious, in all her aspects and
movements
,
she had become all the world to him. It
was a humiliating discovery to him, that she had
equally bound him in her chains, when she was
morally unlovely, as when she had shown herself
all that he could have asked. He struggled long
and manfully with himself, when, by his gloom and
incapacity for enjoyment in her absence, and the
strange palpitations in his bosom, when she returned
to him, he found how necessary she was to his
happiness
.
I will shake off this unmanly bondage,
said he; I have determined to restore her to
society. Conscience and honour call me to do it;
and what do I propose to myself from allowing
such feelings to gain the ascendency over me? In
the midst of resolutely formed purposes to imitate
her caprice, and her coldness and distance, and to
make her feel the value of his society, by
withholding
it, she came upon him in her loveliness and
her smiles, adorned in all the graces of youth and
beauty, and like men before him, as wise as
himself
,
his purposes of resentment all melted away,
and the chains were retained from choice.
Sometimes
,
when all the sternness of his thoughts had
not vanished, she would gaily observe, American,
remark, I know what has been passing within you.
You are a bad subject. But remember, I have not
understood to no purpose, how to tame the wild
animals on our terrace. This, too, thought he,
is mysterious. Is she then gifted to be a discerner
of thoughts?
But though such feelings against himself had
found a place in his bosom, the strength of his
original purpose was still unsubdued. He felt,
even were it in his power, how unworthy it would
be to blight her prospects, by thinking to unite his
fate finally to hers, because Providence, by bringing
them so strangely together, had given him chances
to meditate such thoughts. He still determined, if
possible, to restore her to her friends, leaving her
prospects for the future as he had found them. A
chance to test the sincerity of his purposes occurred.
A ship, with all her sails spread to the breeze,
passed near the island. He kindled fires. He fired
his swivel, and his small arms, and hoisted a flag
high above the grotto on the precipices. Every
moment he expected to see the ship lay to, and put
out her boat. The excruciating agony of his
thoughts and feelings, convinced him how dear
she was to him, and that the happiness of his life
was involved in the issue. But his resolution was
confirmed by remarking, that she watched the
movements of the ship with an intenseness of
solicitude
,
still greater than his own. Nothing could
have so fully opened his eyes to the fact, that his
society, and the pure and simple pleasures of nature
in that island, were utterly insufficient to her
happiness
.
When the ship had finally passed on,
without noticing their signals, he remarked this to
his companion, and uttered all the cheering and
consoling words that came to his thoughts, to
encourage her, that they would soon be able to
leave the island in their own boat, which was now
well nigh completed. To his amazement, he saw
her countenance gradually brightening, and
regaining
its cheerfulness. It is true, she was silent; but
the succeeding evening was one, in which she
displayed
uncommon kindness and gaiety.
When he had slept upon the dreams inspired by
this manner in the evening, the next day all was
reversed. Her countenance had never worn such a
deep and unalterable gloom. It was natural for
him to interpret the kindness of the evening to a
benevolent effort over herself, to soften the
disappointment
of not being noticed by the ship. Her
present feeling was the irresistible influence of her
own chagrin and sorrow, returned upon her,
notwithstanding
all her efforts. They walked together,
as usual, and he offered her his arm. She refused
it, as if he were infected with some malignant
disease
,
which she wished to avoid. At another time,
she put him to a laborious task of enclosing her
menagerie. It took him a couple of days from his
labour on the boat. When at length it was
completed
with great toil, she laughed heartily at the
whole, and told him, that she had put him to the
work as the test of his obedience. The only
method of reasoning by which he preserved
self-respect
was, that no other eye saw the extent and
caprice of her tyranny, on the one hand, and of the
folly of his docility and submission on the other.
But for this time the firmness of his purpose
served him. He preserved a stern silence and
distance of two days, in which he wrought with
redoubled assiduity on the boat. The manifest
impress of overplied exertion on his countenance
vanquished her. Towards evening of the second
day, arrayed in her most studied dress, she walked
down to the shore. Throw away those wretched
tools, said she, I command you. You seem
fatigued
to death. My dear brother, you must
refresh
yourself. Why should you kill yourself to
finish that vile boat, in order to get away from this
sweet place? It is a hundred to one that I refuse
to accompany you when it is finished. Come with
me. Every grove is green. The birds sing.
Nature is in good temper, and so am I. He
resisted the fascination, and ceased not to ply
the saw and the axe, and sternly answered, that his
business pressed him, and he must deny himself
the pleasure of walking with her. She came still
closer to him, smiling through the tears that started
into her eyes at this unwonted severity of manner.
My dear brother, said she, this will never do.
I have neither beast nor bird so refractory as this
American. Saying this, she compelled him to
suspend his blows by coming in the way of his axe,
and taking him by the hand, and leading him away.
Let them who would smile at him for the too easy
good nature of yielding in the case, have seen her,
as she was at times, too, manifesting a heart of the
tenderest sensibility and of the most considerate
16 *
kindness; let them imagine the pity always arising
in his mind at the view of this fascinating woman,
obliged by the severity of her fate to pine in this
soltude; let them remember, that with the earnest
tenderness of a mother over a sick infant, he had
nursed her up from the borders of the grave; let
them contemplate him, considering her with the
feelings of father, and brother, and protector, and
friend, and lover; for that tie bound him with the
rest, and so constituting his only society in the
world, and possibly they, in the trial, would have
been no more inflexible than he proved in the issue.
At this point of the annals of their sojourn in the
island, would be the place to make extracts from a
daily journal of the incidents of nearly a year,
which he kept, and in which he marked, with
minuteness, the events of their solitary lives. It
was found too uniform and monotonous to be
transcribed. They who are hourly cast in the
hard and selfish scramble, and encountering the
heartless conflicts of the busy world, would turn
away from these records of the movements of the
heart, elicited by this singular kind of
companionship
.
Besides, a journal of the incidents of a day
would serve, with little variation, as a sample of
those of a year. It will be sufficient to relate, that
it sometimes records kindness, and sometimes
caprice
,
on the part of his companion; sometimes
courage, and sometimes dejection, on his own part.
It notes the failure or success of his plans and
projects. It marks the unequivocal progress of
affection for the companion of his solitude,
notwithstanding
all that he suffered from the
ever-varying
tone of her conduct towards him.
In other places it notes the severe mental
struggles
of conscience; remarks that he felt himself
exposed to numberless and continual trials to depart
from that settled plan of deportment towards her,
which he had prescribed to himself, as the measure
of honour and duty. Sometimes a purpose to
abandon all thoughts of leaving the island, and to
win her, if he might, to unite her destiny
indissolubly
with his, seems almost to have gained the
ascendency. At those points are manifested the
deep feelings of piety; and that he had often, in the
solitude of midnight or of retirement in the groves,
communed with his own heart and with God, and
had earnestly invoked divine strength, and aid from
on high, that his honour and integrity might not
be found wanting in this extreme temptation. It
every where notes the most entire devotion to all
the wishes and desires of his companion, and that
the sunshine of his thoughts and his mind never
ceased to vary with the prevalent mood of her
feelings and behaviour.
In one place he has recorded earnest wishes, that
she had been born in his condition in life, that no
impediment might have existed in the way of their
union. Beside this wish, is recorded an eloquent
rhapsody upon the folly and absurdity of human
distinctions. He finds himself her equal in nature
and character, and perhaps, with the customary
leaning of self pride, her superior in good temper
and self control; and then he declaims upon the
emptiness of the sounds,
distinction and birth
, as
repeated from the echo of the mountains of a savage
island in the south seas.
It sometimes appears, that with the usual
propensity
to see things as they are wished to appear,
he half satisfies himself, that her caprices did in fact
result from tenderness towards him. While under
this conviction, his thoughts are altogether too
sanguine and soaring to be transcribed. At other
times he is in the depths, and finds the only key
to unlock the mystery of her conduct, in being
persuaded, that all her seeming kindness is a
benevolent
effort over herself, for his peace; and that
all her caprice and gloom are the real manifestation
of her chagrin and suffering in a state of hopeless
solitude. Again and again, he takes to himself the
flattering unction, that he never had yet disclosed,
and that he never would disclose the secret of his
heart in word or action.
In one place it records their mutual alarm and
horror, as they were walking together, at seeing a
troop of savages landed at the cove from two proas
lying on the shore. They were at too great a
distance
to be distinctly observed. But their loud
cries were heard, as they observed them, in
trembling
apprehension, from the concealment of a copse.
The great point of terror was, lest the savages
should trace their path to the grotto, and take
possession
of it in their absence. They seemed to be
holding some horrid jubilee, as they danced round
a fire. The two concealed spectators witnessed
this spectacle in agonizing suspense of more than
an hour. They then rose, and raised a long and
terrible shout, which echoed to the remotest depths
of the woods and mountains, and took to their boats,
and departed. The journal notes their horror,
after the savages were gone, in examining the place
where they had held their orgies. No remains of
a human victim were left, as they feared, to prove
that the savages had here partaken of the feast of
cannibals.
The journal records, that in the months of
November
and December, continual tempests of rain,
thunder, and lightning occurred. It was the rainy
season of the country. Torrents were continually
pouring from the hills. Bread-fruit entirely failed.
The bread and stores from the wreck had ceased
long since. An ample supply of coffee, sugar and
wines still remained. But it proved a bitter
privation
to be obliged to subsist on oysters, and animal
food alone. In obtaining even that, he was
invariably
drenched in rain, before he had succeeded.
The kangaroos raised their dismal cries, and ranged
far away in the forests for food. Their beautiful
hares fled, and some of them never returned. On
the death of a favourite bird, that perished with
others at this time, his companion poured a long
lament in verse. From his extravagant praises on
reading it, the judgment, and taste, and partiality
of love, seem to have been passed upon it, and the
verses were found so much resembling a thousand
others, written on similar occasions, that they were
not deemed worthy of being transcribed into these
pages.
They were now compelled to pass their time
together, and the pages of his journal, record
stronger, and more frequent manifestations of trials,
from the same sources which have been so often
mentioned. Sometimes he almost flatters himself,
that he is beloved; and then he is not only
convinced
to the contrary, but that he is an object of
positive dislike and aversion; and he records, as
the result of all his efforts to sound the mystery of
her sentiments, that the heart and conduct of a
young and beautiful woman, are the most
inscrutable
of all the wonders of the creation. Many
long conversations between them are recorded,
sometimes affectionate, and even tender, and
sometimes
cheerful. But it should seem, that their
thoughts had caught something of the gloom of
nature and the sky; for much oftener these
dialogues
of the long day and evening of confinement
together, were of that racy and spiced character,
which are known in the ordinary annals of domestic
life, by the name of
curtain lectures
.
On the last day of the year an incident occurred,
which gave an agreeable diversity to the gloomy
current of events for some time past. He had
retreated
from a conversation unusually annoying to
his feelings, from the temper in which she had
sustained
her part in it. The rain intermitted for a
moment, and he walked abroad. The sky was
gloomy. Thunder muttered in the distance. The
hills smoked, and the sea was involved in a thick
mist. The earth was wet and plashy. Not a note
of song, or animal life was heard. Even the trees
were almost bared of their foliage by a succession
of storms. His mind partook of the gloom of nature.
He happened to wander in a new direction. Near
the margin of a small water course, he observed a
thick mat of vines, which arrested his attention.
He examined them, and found, to his joy, a supply,
and it seemed a copious one, of sweet potatoes.
Both he and his companion found their health
suffering from the constant use of animal food.
What a discovery, in this rich and nutricious
vegetable
,
the best substitute, not only for all other
vegetables
,
but even bread. He marked the spot, and
hurried home with his discovered treasure.
The supper of that evening was delicious. They
heard the thunder burst, and the tempest pour
again, in cheerfulness and joy. Never had he seen
his companion show such undeniable tokens of
kindness
.
For that night his dreams were all of
happiness
.
The customary narrative commences with the
first day of January of the new year. The rainy
season ceased, and fleecy clouds again sailed over
the clear azure of the sky. The rainy season had
been the winter of that climate. A poet only, and
one of the highest powers, would be adequate to
paint the delightfulness of the transition. They
walked far from their confinement, hand in hand.
They felt the change of nature in their own bosoms.
They spoke of the strong and affecting picture of
Noah coming out of the ark, as that memorable
event is recorded in the few striking words of the
Bible. The earth sent up the same smell of
fragrance
.
The diminishing sound of the falling
torrents
in the mountains showed that the waters from
heaven were stayed. A thousand trees in blossom
charged the fresh breeze with fragrance. There
was a delightful freshness in the verdure of the
springing grass and shrubs. The birds sang the
renovation of nature in their sweetest'songs. They,
too, as they once more walked on the flowering
turf, and breathed the fragrance of the air, uttered
silent hymns of thanksgiving in their hearts.
While in the fulness of his joy he wished her
a
happy new year
, the glistening of her eye, and the
kindness of her countenance, seemed to be
incapable
of more than one interpretation. She appeared
to declare, that she reciprocated the wish, rather in
manner than in words, and regretted the
impediments
that arose from unchangeable circumstances.
There was that in her manner which could not be
mistaken, which seemed to declare, that all the
happiness
which she could bestow should be his. He
even thought, that she expected him to go farther in
the expression of his feelings. His heart palpitated.
Words, which he had vowed before God never to
whisper in her ear, were upon his tongue, and ready
to be uttered. His higher purpose triumphed, and the
day that commenced so joyfully, terminated in
sorrow
and gloom. As they returned from their
evening
walk, she refused his arm, as formerly, and
shrunk from his offered aid as they crossed a
mountain
torrent. The kindness of the morning seemed
changed to aversion; and he saw, with the keenest
regret, that her eye was often filled with tears. As
the day closed, they seated themselves in silence on
the terrace at the entrance of the grotto. The sun,
throned in the pillary clouds that came after the
rain, was setting in his glory. The prolonged and
foreign notes of the evening songsters of the groves,
trilled out their parting salutation. The surface of
the sea rippled in gold and purple. The fire flies
darted their mimic lightning among the trees. The
rolling mists formed a sublime canopy on the
summits
of the mountains, through which streamed into
mid air the smokes of the volcanos. The deep
murmurs of the mountain streams formed a grand
accompaniment to the gentle dashing of the waves
on the shore. It was an evening to inspire
solemn
thought
and
heavenly musing
. Both had commenced
a new year in this strange association of solitude.
It must be naturally a period for retrospection,
anticipation, and resolve. That the colouring of
her thoughts was dark was evident; for she sat in
silence and sadness, and frequent tears rolled down
her cheeks.
For the first time, he took her hand, as he drew
his chair near to hers. She started at this unwonted
freedom, and the paleness of her cheek glowed.
VOL. I.17
My sister, he said, I cannot endure the sight of
your sadness. It is the bitterest part of my lot to
see you in sorrow, and to know that I have no
means of relief. I have laboured for months in the
completion of the boat. The return of the pleasant
season will enable me to resume the work. In one
week it will be finished; and then we will depart,
and I will weary heaven with prayers to bind up
every wind, but such as will waft us to your friends.
How gladly would I resign my life to serve you,
and render you happy! Her tears flowed again,
and she answered nothing; but they were clearly
no longer tears of sorrow. Another conversation
ensued, of a character which may be imagined, but
which it were useless to relate. It is sufficient to
say, that his thoughts and hopes assumed a new
form, and presented her in a new light for
investigation
.
When he retired to his bed, it was not to
begin the first night of the year with refreshing
slumbers, but to shift from side to side, and to
agitate
a thousand views of his condition. Oh! he
thought, could I be sure that she could love me,
and be willing to share this solitude, it would
become
to me as paradise to the first pair. Why not
unfold to her all that is passing in my heart? Why
have reserves for her whose life I have saved, whose
days and months are passed by my side? Who
could have been with her, as I have, and not have
loved? What are the differences of wealth, birth,
and condition in these solitudes? Shall I fear to
declare it to the echoes, that I am the son of an
independent farmer of America, and that she is high
born, and an heiress? Have we not all that nature
and the heart require? Who can ever love her as
I love her? Who can ever serve her as I have
served her? Who can render her happy beside me?
Suppose I restore her to society. From that
moment
the artificial barriers of society raise an
adamantine
wall, an impassable gulf between us.
All hope of ever meeting her again, as an equal,
will be extinguished for ever. All that I have done
will be put to the common impulses of humanity,
and perhaps my guarded decorum will be estimated
no more than the result of insensibility.
Then again other views of the subject presented.
His purposes had been formed in a state of
comparative
coolness of calculation. That was no
longer the case; and these were the prejudiced
colourings of passion. Would he forego all his
boasted promises to restore her to society, or perish?
Suppose one of them should die. What would be
the lot of the miserable survivor? Providence had
cast them together on a desert island. What then?
Would he basely take advantage of her misfortune,
to bind her to a state of inglorious and useless
voluptuousness
,
in a desert isle? Suppose she were
to consent to unite her destinies with his, and they
were to escape from the island, would not society
mourn over her, as one degraded and humbled?
Would it not pity her and execrate him for basely
availing himself of the advantages of his condition?
Such were some of the views that passed over his
troubled thoughts that night. The result of his
resolves was, that he would immediately resume
the work of his boat, complete it, and embark with
the pleasant season for New Holland.
The next morning, after an early breakfast, the
tent was replaced, and the writing desk, as
formerly
,
and his companion awaited in tranquil
silence the completion of the boat. The
succeeding
day was devoted to arrangements and
preparations
.
Bread-fruit was not yet ripe. But a cask
of sweet potatoes, and dried flesh, and fishing
tackle, and two muskets, and powder, and oysters
suspended under the boat, to be preserved in their
freshness, and meats, fresh and salted, were placed
in the boat over night. It was launched, and made
fast to the shore. The mast was erected. The
sail was clewed, and every arrangement made for
the voyage of the succeeding day. The charts,
and a compass brought from the wreck, were put
on board.
They took their supper in profound silence.
Have you, he asked, made your selection of
the birds and animals, that you would choose to
take with you? They will be affecting memorials
of your residence here, when you shall once more
be in the bosom of society. Yonder lies New
Holland. The morning breeze, will put us within
the reach of the steady western winds, that cannot
fail to waft us to the shores of that country. I will
restore you to your country, to your fatherand I
will And what will you? my dear brother,
said she, as tears started in her eyes. All this is
sufficiently gallant and complimentary, and might
be urged with better show of reason, if there were
any chance of success. You are a brave man, and
rather uncommonly a philosopher for your years.
But pardon me, my brother, if I say, that you
seem to me little more of a mariner than I am.
No. You know nothing, whether New Holland
is to the east, or the west. We shall be blown out
to sea. We shall encounter the waste and angry
billows, that swallowed up my father. The thought
makes me shudder. You reason in vain, to
persuade
me that my father lives. Besides, she
continued
,
with a countenance alternately flashing, and
as pale as death, there is another element in the
calculation, that you seem wholly to have omitted.
I have hitherto foreborne to speak. But it would
be guilt in me, to omit on this solemn occasion to
declare all. Must I say it? Who will believe the
romance of our existence here? Who will
understand
and believe you and me, such as we are?
No. This solitude shields me from reproach. It
furnishes all that nature wants. These humble
animals have learned to love me. I can be no
where so happy as here. Should fate first call for
you, I will go with you. Should I depart first, I
am sure that you will give tears to the only human
companion of your solitude. And if my brother
sheds tears on my grave, it will not want the tribute
of a brave and high minded man. I have showed
ennui, you will sayI will show it no more. I
17*
have shed tears of chagrinI will be a perpetual
smiler for the days to come. I have talked of the
society which I once enjoyedI will henceforward
speak of no joys, but those of peace, privacy, and
friendship with a dear brother, in a solitary island.
Let us burn this miserable boat, that has so wearied
and vexed you, and grow old in the midst of these
affectionate animals. Be your resolves what they
may, I will not go to-morrow. But if you still
persist, I will make a pilgrimage alone to the place
where you found me. I will bid farewell to all my
happy walks in these groves; and then if you
continue
to cling to this strange purpose, to fly away
from me and this charming place, where we are so
happy, I will go with you on the following day;
and if you choose a death in the trackless brine, I
will share it with you. Saying this, she took her
candle, bade him good night, and retired.
The young man retired too, but it may be readily
supposed not to sleep. I have heard, he said to
himself, I have heard of the mysteries of science,
and the mysteries of philosophy, and nature, and
religion; but here is an undescribed mystery,
deeper than all the rest. One hour, she seems
ready to expire with the loneliness of this place,
and her desire for society; and then in turn her
eye shows tenderness for me, or she cruelly mocks
me with the semblance of it. The affection of
irrational animals is reciprocated: But she has
seen me labour, and suffer, to sustain the life which
I have saved, and yet I occupy less space in her
thoughts than a vile kangaroo, or a purple cardinal.
I am weary of conjectures. The voyage shall end
them.
Next day he remonstrated with her, touching the
hazard from savages on the lonely excursion, which
she proposed. She persisted in her purpose, and
he had so often found her inflexible, that he ceased
to remonstrate. Dressed in a style of simple
negligence
,
she departed after an early breakfast, taking
food with her to spend the day as she proposed, by
herself, leaving him to divine her manner of
passing
it, and the colour of her thoughts.
For him, he renewed his arrangements, and
tasked his thoughts to recollect every thing that
ought to be carried on board. Various
preparations
,
forgotten on the former day, were now
remembered
,
and having put every thing in readiness,
he awaited her return, as he cast his eyes anxiously
in the direction of her departure. Just as the sun
faded, her form was seen advancing from among
the trees, and her white robe fluttered in the breeze.
His heart, no longer filled with apprehensions,
bounded for joy. She walked slowly, and as one
taking a solemn farewell of nature, and of scenes
dear to her. In a moment he was by her side.
Her countenance was calm, but sorrowful, and she
had evidently passed a day of deep and painful
feeling. She put her arm within his, and looking
intently and kindly in his face, asked him, Have
you not yet given up the thought of this rash and
mad voyage? Other views of the question of the
former day ensued, and the former reply of his
part was repeated. To the objection, which seemed
to have most force, that her reputation and
standing
in society were unchangeably committed, even
were she restored to it, he answered: Yes, my
dear sister; we shall visit a society that will
separate
me from you, and no longer allow me to call
you by that endearing name. I shall no longer
darebut I will not explain farther. There is one
proof of devotion, that I can yet show you. Let
him that dares, in society, whisper the suspicion of
stain upon your good name, and he shall know that
there is one heart, and one arm to chastise and
avenge. But no miscreant will dare it. I implore
you, my sister, no longer to gainsay. Heaven and
earth call upon you to depart. Should you refuse,
you will learn me to hate and despise myself. The
call of Providence is plain. It is your duty to go,
and mine to conduct you.
In a moment her countenance changed to a calm,
but firm and complacent look of settled sorrow.
All pride and caprice were banished. You are
right, said she. It must be so. Say no more.
I will go. Let every thing be ready. She bowed,
and retired as under the influence of emotions too
deep for utterance.
The morning dawned, and a more beautiful one
never dawned. But few words passed between
them. The breakfast remained before them,
untasted
.
Every thing was in readiness. He
barricaded
the entrance of the grotto, as they came
out, purposing, if they should reach New Holland,
to have a vessel despatched to bring away the
valuable things that were stored there. If they
should not return to that place again, he expressed
a wish that some one, whose lot should be happier
than theirs, might enjoy that commodious retreat
after them.
There could be no mistaking the feelings of
either, as they looked round upon this tranquil,
pleasant, and secure residence. Farewell, said
she, in a voice almost inaudible. She could not
refrain from tears, as her hundred animals and
birds thronged round, uttering their morning notes
and cries of affection and joy. A pair of
kangaroos
,
and another of scarlet pigeons followed
them, the one fluttering from tree to tree, and the
other bounding behind, as was their daily wont,
when they left the grotto. He took her favourite
hare under one arm, and a Bible under the other.
She looked round, and upwards, and bade him
proceed. The beautiful nature around them never
had seemed so smiling, as at the moment, when
they were leaving it. A moment brought them to
the boat. She turned deadly pale, as they reached
it, and as the animals and birds followed him into
it. He held out his hand to her. Courage,
said he, my dear sister. One effort more, and
the struggle is over. Before she entered, she said,
Remember, sir, I remonstrated against this
proceeding
.
It is no project of mine. It is useless to
say, that I had rather remain. I do not the less
feel, and appreciate the disinterestedness and
heroism
of your conduct, and I can, and will imitate it.
Suppose this ill advised voyage should restore us
to society; man is neither so good, or true, as these
kind animals that I leave, nor can any thing of art
equal this grand and lonely nature. You are right.
Go forward. I follow you. You mistake my
wishes, and probably my interests. You wholly
misunderstand my heart and character. But it is
too late to explain. Saying this, she entered, and
sat down on a seat which he had prepared for her.
He, in turn, urged anew all his motives, and
stated again all his arguments. His words were
at once solemn and soothing; and the deep feelings
of his heart inspired him with eloquence. He talked
of the present, and the future, and of the life to
come; and read to her, from the Scriptures, of them
who see the mighty works of God upon the great
waters. He read prayers from the service of her
church, and they sang an hymn together. He then
took the fast on board, called the animals that were
bounding upon the sand. The scarlet pigeons
perched upon her arm. The hare nibbled upon
sweet potatoes, thrown to it to retain it on board,
and they slowly moved from the shore.
The morning breeze, as usual, whispered gently
from the land. His calculation was, that this breeze,
which generally lasted until eleven in the morning,
would serve them until they could reach a distance,
where they might come in view of some other land;
and that from that point, with a slight effort of oars,
with which the boat was provided, he could row it
beyond the influence of the land breeze; and that
if the land should appear, as he trusted it would,
in the direction of the tropical gale, they might
sail directly before it. The boat more than
answered
his expectations. It sailed well and steadily,
and he might hope it would prove secure in the
common chances of calm weather. He had taken
the precaution to spread an awning over her seat,
which sheltered her from the rays of the sun, which
arose from the waves as they had advanced half a
league from the shore. She sat with her face toward
the shore, contemplating it with a countenance pale
but firm. The lofty trees gradually lessened to the
size of shrubs. Soon there was nothing visible on the
shore but the white line of foam that burst on the
rocks, and nothing audible but the faint and low
murmurs of the surge, as it burst along the shore.
The green summits of the trees, surmounted by the
blue line of mountains, began to have the aspect of
clouds in the sky. By ten in the morning, nothing
was visible, but these dim clouds. As yet, not a
word had been uttered by either. His heart
palpitated
for a moment, when the pale but fixed
countenance
of his companion turned upon his, as if to
scrutinize his inmost thoughts. Is there land in
sight? she asked, for I can see nothing but the
sky and the sea. He stood erect, and strained his
vision in every direction; but he also saw nothing
but the sky and the sea. The boundless waste was
every where gently curved with calm rolling billows.
The pair of kangaroos were very clearly dissatisfied
with their novel position, which they manifested
by shifting their places, and raising a most piteous
cry. The hare nibbled its food unmoved. The
pigeons perched on the arm of his companion,
nodded repeatedly in the direction of the land, and,
before she was aware, they clapped their brilliant
wings, and soared away for the green retreats
which they had left. This unexpected desertion
by her favourite birds, and the dismal whinings of
the kangaroos, overcame the firmness of her
purpose
for a moment. But she soon wiped away the
silent tears from her eyes, and became calm again.
Both felt that it was neither the time nor place for
words, and preserved profound silence.
He continued to look anxiously in the direction
in which they were sailing, without discovering
any trace of land, until noon. He then felt it a
duty to lay the boat about, as the land breeze had
lulled, and wait for the sea breeze to waft them
back again. He so notified his companion; and
it was the first word that had been spoken. My
sister, said he, the Almighty has determined that
we should return for this time. But though I dare
not venture to sea at present, we have proved that
our boat is good, and sails well. We will cruise
the island another day, and sail round it to the
opposite shore. Let us submit with cheerfulness to
this disappointment, and hope better fortune
another
time. To his surprise, this intelligence was
received, not only without the appearance of regret,
but with undisguised delight and triumph. Thank
God! said she, clasping her hands, with exultation
in her eye, this mad voyage is like to terminate
as I wished. You have had your wish, and I am
happy. At the word she roused her favourite
hare, that was sleeping unconscious on the grass.
Poor puss! she said, smoothing down its glossy
back, you shall see your mates, and your green
island, and the dear grotto again.
The sun shone with dazzling brightness, and not
a breath of air fanned their faces. He sat to the
oars, and commenced pulling them in the direction
of the shore. The boat was too large to be moved
readily, not only without the aid of sail, but against
a slight current which set from the shore. The
perspiration fell in drops from his forehead, and
yet the boat scarcely moved towards the land. He
observed, too, with terror, that a few light clouds
flew across the disk of the sun, although a feather
would not have trembled on the mast.
At half past twelve, a slight breeze began to
spring up, but it was from the shore; alas! he saw
but too clearly, what it portended. In five minutes
the breeze was a gale. He comprehended in a
moment the utter inefficacy of his oars, and unfurled
his sail, and with hands, trembling with
apprehension
,
began to practise all his scanty stock of
sea-manship
;
that if he could not beat towards the
land, at least he might make as little direct way
from it as possible. In a few moments the increasing
commotion of the waves instructed him, that
attempts
VOL. I.18
to oblique them or encounter them, were
alike dangerous and ineffectual. He looked in the
pale, but composed face of his companion, from
which silent tears were falling. Thy will, O God,
be done, said he aloud; and he laid the boat before
the waves and wind. Then indeed, by the foam at
the bow, they easily saw that the boat cleft the waves,
and ploughed rapidly over the increasing swells.
The waves soon became ragged, white, foaming, and
irregular. It seemed impossible that such a small
and slender craft could resist them for a moment.
To struggle with oars, would have been the
madness
of an infant contending with a giant. She sat
calmly at the stern, with an eye occasionally
looking
up towards the fearful sky, either in prayer,
or in looking upward for some harbinger of hope.
He stood firmly at the helm. Observing that
some part of the lading was not stowed rightly to
balance the boat, he was compelled for a moment
to desert the helm, so to remove the burden as to
trim the boat. The boat lost its direction, exposed
its side to the wave, and received a mass of spray
on the deck. But a part of the boat was decked,
and a portion of the wave poured into the bottom.
The kangaroos, covered with water, uttered a long
and dismal cry of terror. They both thought that
the boat was lost. But she righted, and obeyed
the helm, and again moved before the wind, though
heavy with the water which she had received. His
companion, though with the immediate
apprehension
of death on her countenance, moved through
the water, and placed herself by his side, near the
helm. My brother, she said, we will sink
together. Oh, wicked pride of heart! Had I told
you all, this dreadful voyage had never been
undertaken
.
We die, because I was too proud to reveal
the secret of my heart. Wretch that I am,
Augusta Wellman, he replied; you are innocent,
and I am the guilty destroyer; and yet God is my
witness, that love, pure and disinterested as that of
the angels, was my motive. Forgive me, my dear
sister! The disclosures of that awful moment,
when all hearts speak aloud, revealed the ruling
motives of each to the other. On his part, pure
and heroic affection, hopeless of a return, sought
the good of its object by an effort of self denial,
such as strong and good minds only can make.
On her part, it was affection equally strong and
sincere, which had wholly misinterpreted the
character
and motive of its object. Pride had charged
him with insensibility and indifference; and she
had determined that sooner than be the first in the
humiliating avowal, her heart should break. Alas
for human nature! that such miserable reasonings
should have brought two such beings to quench
mutual love, so innocent and pure, in the abyss.
The expected approach of death extorted the
secret. They said, We understand each other, and
at least in death we will not be divided. What
words could be used to convey the feeblest
impression
of the sensations that thrilled through his
frame! Oh God! he prayed, as he looked towards
the angry elements, hear me for thy mercy's sake.
Hear me, and still thy winds, and let this cup pass
from us! But the Ruler of the tempests seemed not
to hear; for the winds continued to roar, and
thunders began to dart their explosions into the sea,
and all around was horror and darkness. But his
prayer, denied in one form, was answered in
another
.
He felt as if endowed with new powers.
New confidence sprung up in his mind. At the
same time, his companion, as if catching his spirit
and his confidence, began with energy and effect to
throw out the water, which the boat had taken in.
As if heaven had compassion on their hard lot,
the breeze lulled for a moment to a dead calm;
though the sky still looked fearfully black, and
the thunder continued to burst. Courage, he
cried, my dear sister; God has heard us, and we
shall be saved. In this moment of the suspended
fury of the tempest, by incredible efforts she had
already cleared the boat of its water.
Their hopes gave way to renewed despair: for
the unrelenting storm, with gathered fury from its
momentary slumber, howled again. The sun,
occasionally
visible between the chasms of masses of
clouds of terrible aspect, was descending with his
disk broadened, and as if of blood, and the lurid
and darkening sky indicated the approach of a
night of horror. The darkness soon closed over
them. Nothing was heard but the roar of wind,
and the crash of thunder; nothing visible but an
illimitable prospect of mountain-billows, illumined
for a moment by the glare of lightning. It was,
indeed, a night and a scene to sink the proudest
heart. Dear solitary island! cried she; green
shades, peaceful grotto, dear brother, farewell! We
will explore the mysteries of the deep, and of the
unknown world together. Proud, cruel woman,
thou hast undone thyself and him. My dear
sister, he replied, cease, I implore you, these
self-reproaches. You have opened before me
visions, which have inspired me with thoughts and
hopes, which are a presage that we shall escape.
I have a cheering presentiment, that we shall see
our green island again. Providence will sit at the
helm, and guide us through this fearful darkness.
She answered, I receive the omen as a voice from
heaven. Oh save us, merciful Providence! and
never shall love and gratitude be like mine.
The boat continued to plunge along over the
billows through the Egyptian darkness. The
lightning glared for a moment, to give them a view
of the waves, and of each other, and instantly the
darkness closed over them. Meanwhile every
moment was wafting them farther to sea, and
rendering
the chances of return more hopeless. Man
knows not the extent of his powers, except in
emergencies
like these. He felt as if endowed with
gigantic vigour, and a feeling of the effect of the
waves upon the boat was to him as sight. He still
held the course of the boat, directly before the
wind. She was equally diligent to clear the water
from the boat, whenever it received the spray. The
18*
evidence of their senses alone, could have assured
them, that their frail boat could have survived the
dangers of darkness, and the perpetual concussion,
reeling and pitching, on the mountain billows.
While they were thus balanced between hope and
despair, the wind again lulled to a dead calm.
The lightning flashed ahead, and discovered piles
of clouds like mountains of brass, heaped together
in the direction of the sky towards which they had
been sailing. He instantly spread the sail, and
laid the boat about in the direction of the island.
The sail began to swell. At first, as the storm
commenced, it was a breeze which soon swelled to
a gale. Shortly the storm was renewed in all its
fury; but unhappily, though they now flew towards
the island, the waves, torn in sunder by the counter
gale, became broken, irregular, and far more
dangerous than before. The rain poured in
torrents
,
which were sufficient alone to fill the boat in
a little time. The dizzying agitation created
sea-sickness
.
The boat often shipped water. The
repeated explosions of thunder were as bursts of
cannon. She was by no means able to throw the
water out as fast as it came in from the sky and the
sea. Inevitable and immediate destruction now
looked them in the face.
But at the moment when all hope was again
renounced
,
the moon sailed forth from under the
clouds, and threw her pale and portentous radiance
upon the confusion of the sky and the sea. The
gale gradually sunk away, and hope again sprung
up in their bosoms. Once more the boat was
cleared of its water, and made a steady progress
before the wind. An hour elapsed, in which each
almost suspended their breath, through fear that
they should hear the gale burst again. Sometimes
the moon disappeared, and left them in darkness;
and sometimes the gale lulled to a calm, and then
breezed again. In this way elapsed the anxious
hours, until the approach of morning dawn. By
its dim and uncertain light, they began to discover
the phosporic blaze of the mountain-surf upon the
rock-bound shore, and they saw themselves
hastening
from one species of danger to another. They
were nearing the breakers with fearful rapidity. To
reach them was inevitable destruction. He dropped
the sail, and laid the boat about, under extreme
peril from upsetting it. He seized the oars, and
struggled with the energy which was inspired by
hope and the near view of land. The
exertion
of a moment convinced him that he made
headway
from the rocks. The moon came forth, clear,
full, and cheering. The boat glided along near the
outer margin of the surf. The trees could now be
distinctly seen, with their green summits above, and
glittering in the pale lustre of twilight and the
moon. Providence had ordained, that they should
survive all the horrors of that dreadful night. They
began to discover the points of the cliffs that formed
the cove. A few strokes of the oar propelled the
boat from the swells to the gentle rippling of the
harbour. The kangaroos, weary of the
partnership
and the voyage, bounded into the water, and
swam ashore. The next moment the boat struck
the shore, and he, springing out, made it fast to its
former hold. He lifted her, drenched with water,
in his arms on shore. Gratitude to the Almighty
claimed their first thoughts. The rest may be
imagined.
He bore her, faint and exhausted with fatigue
and hunger, and contending emotions, to the grotto.
Unheeding the hundred cries of joy of their animals,
he laid her on her bed. The fire soon blazed.
Refreshments were prepared. She drank claret and
water, and while he prepared breakfast, changed
her dress. The blood revisited her pale cheek, and
they breakfasted in thankfulness and love. The
joy of that hour became a consecrated era in the
after remembrances of each. Before they mutually
retired to rest, of which each had such pressing
need, she exacted from him a promise that he
would never attempt that kind of navigation again.
How I wish, she said, that the winds would
bury that boat for ever in the waves! The promise
was as cheerfully made on his part. I will never
take the voyage again, my dear sister, unless you
precede me in the request. With opening before
me new views of duty, you have also inspired me
with other wishes and desires. Henceforward you
shall be the first to propose the abandonment of
this dear solitude. They understood each other,
and their sleep was that which is won by fatigue,
and the assurance of the sweetest hopes for the
future.
Towards evening they both arose, refreshed by
sleep, and recovered from their fatigue. It was one
of those evenings of that delicious climate, which
succeed such a storm as had passed over it. The
air, and the earth, and the vegetable creation, and
even the irrational tribes seemed to enjoy a
renovated
existence, and to feel the contrast of that
repose of nature, with that fury of the tempest
which preceded it. They walked, accompanied by
a full cortge of their irrational subjects, among
the groves. That enjoyment was too full and
home-felt
to clothe itself in words.
Here is purposely omitted a minute lover's account
of the appearance of Augusta Wellman on this
occasion. It is known that they were declared
lovers. The splendour of this full length picture was
given by a partial painter, and, perhaps, with
something
of the natural partiality of such a pencil. The
sentimentality of the conversations of this occasion
were, no doubt, delicious to the parties immediately
concerned. Enough of this sort of description
may be found in any modern novel. To transcribe
this would take from these annals that aspect of
verity which they ought to wear. Besides,
delightful
though it may have been to the parties, it admits
of question if it would be to persons less deeply
interested.
It is sufficient to say, in sum, that this was the
halcyon period of two youthful hearts; that hour,
to which the affections naturally run out from the
time they distinctly kindle in the bosom; that hour,
clad in all the colours of remembrance, to which
the heart always delights to recur, and look back;
that hour, which, like the periods of birth and
death, is passed through but once; and which
constitutes
the brightest era of memory in our transient
existence below; the hour of youthful confiding
love, and mutual, frank, and undisguised confession.
All the past was confessed and explained. The
one had forborne to declare what he felt, through
scruples of honour and conscience, and disinterested
regard; and because, with the true humility, and
the modest sensitiveness of real love, he had utterly
desponded of return; and had supposed it
impossible
,
that any thing but a return to society, could
render her happy; and because, inscrutable as the
general motive to her conduct had seemed, his
prevalent
view of it was, that it arose from weariness,
ennui, and the pining desire of society. She, on
her part, explained, that from every view of his
conduct that she had taken, she had supposed him
good, amiable, disinterested, heroic, and insensible,
and incapable of warm affection to any one, and
particularly so to her. Sometimes she had deemed
that he had penetrated her secret. She had dreaded
his project of the voyage in this hope. She had
almost purposed to make an explicit avowal of her
wishes and feelings. But a high sense of the
obligations
of female decorum and maidenly honour
had finally triumphed. She had resolved to
accompany
him, and if they escaped and made land in
New Holland, that as soon as she should have
returned
to society, she would then avow her
partiality
,
evincing that he had won a free affection,
uninfluenced by their peculiar relations together.
Much, if not all, that had seemed mysterious in
the deportment of each toward the other was thus
explained. He did not, however, with the humility
and apprensiveness natural to love, flatter himself
that he had yet sounded all the depths in the heart
of his fair and beloved companion.
The journal proceeds to narrate, how by
insensible
gradation the conversation had slidden to the
point of speaking of the where, the when, and the
how touching the bridal day. There were plenty
of birds billing within view, and both remembered
among their juvenile reading, the fortunate
marriage
of Cock Robin to Jenny Wren, by parson Rook.
Each admitted the insurmountable difficulties in
the way of solemnizing a more formal union. But
when two persons so situated, are wholly of one
mind, it is surprising to see how many difficulties
of that sort may be surmounted. They mutually
agreed to keep a fortnight of courtship, as there
seemed little chance of rivalry or jealousy. The
happy day after that period of mutual probation,
was designated. Until that time, he was enjoined
the most scrupulous observance. Even then, the
only evidences would be kangaroos, the only
bridemaids
cardinals and purple pigeons. The
temple
was to be the open area in front of the
mountains
,
in the midst of palms, and in the rear of the
widest sea on the globe. He was to read the
Episcopal
service, as priest, and obey his own
injunctions
,
as bridegroom. He was to vow aloud, and
on his bended knee, that should they ever be
restored
to society again, he would immediately, and
publicly, and after the rites of her church,
resolemnize
the marriage, and renew his vows.
These were important preliminaries to settle, and
when the ice was once broken, and these delicate
points had once found discussion in words, it
became
a theme of frequent review. It would be
difficult for disinterested persons to imagine how
many things remained to be said; and how little
tiresome the subject became by repetition. The
theme was renewed at morning and evening with
unsated interest. In short, these were the
charming
hours, where the duty of the biographer is
suspended
,
and of which the historian has nothing to
say, save that they were peaceful and happy. The
grand point of study with each, seemed to be in
some way to diversify this happy expected period,
with some circumstances of fete and surprise.
As the happy hour, to which it may be presumed
either party looked with equal impatience, drew
near, an event occurred, which, as it formed a new
era in their history, and materially changed the
character of their relations, it is necessary to relate.
It happened, that he had walked alone to the shore
of the sea, in the morning. He was passing along
the shore, in the hope of finding sea-turtle, for the
wedding supper. What was his astonishment and
horror, to observe three large proas drawn up on
the shore, and at a little distance a crowd of fifty
savages sitting round a fire. He trembled for
himself
,
and still more for his affianced bride, now the
single object of his thoughts and affections. A
feeling, like the supposed fascination of a charmed
bird, or, probably, the natural spell of a morbid
curiosity, the feeling that causes the person,
frightened
by imagined ghosts, to shut the eyes and rush
on the spectre, induced him, in a moment, to
determine
to inspect this horrid group, and their
business
,
more closely. It was an imprudent, and had
well high proved a fatal curiosity. There was a
thick-tufted mat of shrubbery and low trees, the
trunks of which were concealed by the compact
tangle of bushes and palmettos. He dropped on
his knees, and crawled in a direction to place this
copse between him and the savages. Under the
luxuriance of this verdure, he was completely
skreened from observation, until he was within
thirty paces of a young savage woman, lying on
the ground, bound hand and foot, as many paces
from the group of savages, and equidistant between
them and himself. She seemed of gigantic size,
with a countenance of dark olive, on which sat the
paleness of death. The savages, with black matted
hair, and their war clubs lying beside them, had
just those horrid and ferocious countenances, which
the imagination has assigned to Satan. They were
VOL. I.19
sitting round the fire, intently occupied, as it seemed,
in picking the bones of a victim; and that it was a
human victim, circumstances left little doubt. After
long and reiterated bursts of frenzied laughter, and
yells of frantic joy,-that echoed from the
mountains
in tones to chill the blood, they pointed to
the poor victim, lying between him and them. It
was easy for him to remark the spasmodic
struggles
,
and the shrinking horror of this forlorn being,
indicating most palpably her dread of death, and
the conviction, that she was soon to furnish a
renewal
of the horrid banquet. Her look of terror
and despair thrilled to his heart. His blood rushed
to his head, and he felt a purpose that he could
not control. His dear Augusta, his approaching
nuptials, and every selfish feeling, were absorbed
in the generous impulses of compassion. His
determination
was formed in a moment. He watched
the moment when the whole circle had their heads
bent towards their abominable repast. He crept
undiscovered to the verge of the palmettos, and
within three paces of the victim, before he was
discovered
either by her or them. His appearance,
as he raised himself erect over her, was equally as
supernatural to the whole party, as though he had
dropped from the clouds. He was aware how
deeply all savages are infected with superstition,
and calculated upon the effect of his sudden and
strange appearance upon this part of their natures.
For the first moment of his appearance, as he
expected
,
they regarded him with stupid astonishment;
and while they were gazing aghast upon him, he
cut the cords of the victim, and she was free. He
then held out his musket, and shouted with the
utmost power of his voice. The first result of all
this, was precisely what he had hoped. They
sprang from their posture by a simultaneous
impulse
,
and with yells of affright, fled in the direction
of their canoes. He made a signal for his delivered
prisoner to fly in the opposite direction of the
thicket. She comprehended him in a moment, and
evinced vigorous powers both of mind and limbs.
She even gained the thicket before him, although
he escaped with the utmost celerity. He overtook
her there, paused a moment for breath, and then
made signs, that she must follow him. They then
renewed their course for the grotto. The terrible
apprehension occurred to him, as he ran, that he
would in this way, draw the attention of the savages
in the direction of the grotto. The thought of
exposing
his beloved and affianced bride, to the
dangers
of an assault from them, was worse than death.
But his steps and hers, in every point, led to the
grotto. They would find it if they pursued, at any
rate. It was still more terrible to leave her to
these dread chances alone. He reflected, too, that
in such a place, and so armed, three persons
contending
for life, might have hopes of beating off
fifty savages in an open assault. It happened as
he feared. As soon as the savages recovered from
the first amazement and consternation of his
appearance
,
they became aware, that in cutting the
bands of their prisoner, he had manifested that he
was of their own race, and had human
propensities
;
and they determined to regain their prize,
and avenge the injury. He soon heard the
infuriated
yell of the whole body, evidently
approaching
upon the grotto. His steps were hurried by
love and terror. He trembled at the temerity,
which had brought this unnecessary attack upon
his beloved. When they were near enough to
observe
him and their victim in their flight, he thought
more than once, of scaling the mountains in a
direction opposite that of the grotto, and of
adopting
the stratagem of the bird, upon whose young
some enemy is advancing, which flies away in a
direction opposite that of its young, to put the
pursuer on a wrong track. But he discovered,
that they would be able to intercept him, before he
could reach the only point of the mountains, which
could be ascended. He had no alternative. No
time was to be lost, for their horrid yells
admonished
him, that they were advancing upon him with
fearful celerity, and with the fury of demons at
unequal distances. When the two reached the base
of the mountain, the captive seemed to hesitate a
moment, either through terror, that she had avoided
one danger only to run into another; or, more
probably, not exactly comprehending his wishes.
He pushed her on before him, with the energy of
command, and she sprang up the steps, like a coney
of the rocks. He followed her.
Augusta had seen a part, and had heard more.
The paleness of death was replaced with the flush
of confidence and hope, the moment she saw her
future husband, and was instructed in a word, what
was the present aspect of things. The swivel was
fortunately charged. He instantly brought forth
all the charged muskets, and Augusta, with the firm
look of a heroine, grasped one. The tall and
muscular captive savage comprehended the signs
that were made to her, and she also took her
musket
,
flourished it over her head, squared herself,
and took the attitude of a determined soldier.
These were the preparations of an instant, and the
savages were already at the foot of the rocks.
They paused a moment there, as if in doubt about
the mode of attack, and reconnoitering the
position
.
The moment after, with assured fury, they
began to scramble up the ascent. A discharge of
the swivel cleared away the first savages that
gained the area. They were now clearly excited
to infuriated and reckless revenge; for, although
three or four were slain, the survivors pushed on
behind them, and numbers had gained the area,
before the swivel could be reloaded. Three
muskets
discharged at the distance of a few yards,
destroyed
as many persons. The besieged continued
to fire loaded muskets upon them, with certain effect
from every shot. The numbers that fell about
them, produced a momentary recoil, and a retreat.
But, before the muskets could be reloaded, twenty
had gained the area. The besieged were obliged
to retreat with their muskets to the narrow passage
19*
by which the grotto was entered. Happily the
muskets were armed with bayonets. These were
plied with so much effect, as that all who advanced
to enter the passage, were slain. Their bodies
clogged the passage. Another and another fell,
as they attempted to leap over the bodies of their
fallen companions. The commander and his new
ally fought with desperation; but Augusta, at this
crisis was observed to disappear. She had returned,
however, in a moment. The boiling contents of a
caldron were discharged on their naked backs. If
any thing could have given this dreadful tragedy
any of the features of a farce, it would have been,
to have seen this fair and unpractised combatant,
discharging her new missiles with such hearty good
will to the cause, and to have remarked the
consequent
yelling, and involuntary dancing of these
infuriated beings. This agony seemed to be
better
understood by them, than the death of steel, or
lead; and they fled in howling confusion and
dismay
,
some of them pushing others down the steps.
At the foot of the cliffs, now reduced to half their
numbers, they appeared to pause over the dead
bodies of their companions. One huge and fierce
savage appeared to be haranguing them, and
urging them to renew the contest. Three well
aimed shots from above, settled their irresolution.
They slowly retreated towards their boats, carrying
off two or three wounded, and often turning round,
shaking their clubs, and raising a long and dismal
howl of defiance. They took to their proas, raised
their sails, and were soon out of sight.
When the savages were ascertained to be entirely
gone, he made motions to his new subject, to aid
him in clearing the dead from the area in front.
The bodies were thrown down the rocks. In a
small sink-hole near at hand, they were all
promiscuously
buried; and while this service was
performing
,
two that still breathed after the battle,
expired. Between twenty and thirty of these terrible
and misguided beings were slain, and the
recollection
of the sad necessity of his case, was a painful
one to him. They then proceeded to wash away
from the turf of the area, all traces of the blood.
Augusta, during the emergency of peril, had
deported
herself with Spartan heroism and
self-possession
.
But the moment the danger and
excitement
of the battle was passed, she had retired, faint
and sickened with the sight of blood, slaughter, and
death. She received him on his return from these
necessary offices, with an effusion of tears,
tenderness
,
and joy. While the pledged pair embraced
each other, in the mutual congratulations of
deliverance
and triumph, the tall and powerful young
savage woman, whom he had saved, contemplated
the beautiful Augusta in tears, and all this new
scene, with an amazing degree of admiration and
astonishment. Augusta was apparently the first
white woman she had ever seen, and in proof that
there is in all countries a common standard and
estimate of beauty, it was impossible to mistake
her expressions of ecstasy in view of so fair a being.
She readily comprehended, that there was no
danger from the countenances of the two persons
before her. The mirrors, the carpets, the hangings,
the splendid curtains and coverings of the bed,
every thing in the grand vault of the grotto, so
commodiously and splendidly fitted up, struck her
with an infantine admiration, which they so
frequently
saw her afterwards express by somersets
of capering, snapping her fingers, and often
repeating
the exclamation, Eh! Eh! But she seemed
perfectly docile, and regarded the two persons
before her, of countenances and appearance so
different
from herself, as superior beings. They were
both equally surprised and delighted, to find their
new subject so ready of comprehension, and so
susceptible of instruction. In the compass of that
day, she already so far comprehended their wishes
and gestures, and her own obligations, that she had
begun her apprenticeship at the duties of the kitchen,
by being already useful. She was quick, laborious,
and desirous of being usefulsmiled at her own
ignorance and awkwardness, and evinced, that she
would soon prove an invaluable acquisition, as a
helper in the burdens of their duties.
What an evening succeeded such a day of eventful
incident, hazard, and blood! He reproached himself
for the rashness, with which he had committed the
safety of one so dear to him. She assured him, with
the most gratifying and affectionate compliments
on his bravery and conduct in the case, that she
should never have loved him, had she not, from the
first, discovered in him that forgetfulness of self,
which she was aware, would at any time inspire in
him the impulse to hazard life and every thing, to
perform such an act as the rescuing the delivered
victim before them.
It is in moments like this, when high happiness
is anticipated, and when some signal deliverance
has been wrought, or some grand point obtained,
that the affections of the heart rush from their deep
beds. Never had he seen his fair companion evince
the same degree of intelligence and feeling. All
reserve and all the cold restraints of the habits of
society were laid aside, and caresses, and tears of
joy were often intermingled in the delightful
conversations
of the evening. The new guest looked
on with a pleased and infantine kind of
consciousness
;
and when they exchanged caresses, rose from
her posture, as she sat viewing them, to take her
joyful capers and snap her fingers. They motioned
her, after she had afforded them such aid as she
was able, in preparing their supper, to sit by the
table, while they took it. It was to them a treat
of no moderate zest, to see with what delighted
curiosity she watched their movements,
occasionally
laughing as she looked in their faces. The
provisions, prepared after their fashion, for the
most part appeared acceptable to her taste,
particularly
sweetened coffee; and she made a supper
no ways stinted by recollections of the dreadful
death from which she had escaped, or by awkward
bashfulness, in view of her new position. When
they surveyed her at more leisure, she was a tall,
athletic, finely formed savagess, of a dark olive
complexion, a person of admirable proportions,
and her countenance was not destitute of a pleasing
kind of interest. She wore a cincture of cloth of
the South Sea islands, ornamented with feathers
about the waist, and was in other respects, except
the delicacy of complexion and beauty of face,
much as Milton has so charmingly painted our
common mother, before sin and shame dictated the
invention of fig leaves.
There was something inexpressibly ludicrous in
the appearance and deportment of this new subject,
as she stalked about the apartment. The smallness
of the number of spectators, and the approaching
prospects of the parties rendered the decorum of
the show less questionable, than it would have been
in other circumstances. But with the natural and
first feeling of female instinct and decorum,
Augusta
took her apart, that she might assist in the
first dressing of her woman, as it was agreed she
should be called. He only requested that her dress
might be loose, and light, as befitting the climate,
and one that had never yet been accustomed to its
restraints. In an hour, Augusta returned with her
new subject, from her first toilette. Imagine a
savagess, six feet and two inches in height, and
Herculean in make and moulding, as simple as a
babe, dressed for the first time in the cast finery of
Augusta. It was a dress of crape, such, it is
believed
,
as is called a loose or morning dress, and it
was festooned and looped up in a most curious
manner. Nothing could be imagined more
ludicrously
awkward, than her gait and deportment in
her new and unwieldy costume. Conceive of
Goliah, imprisoned in petticoats, or Hercules at
his distaff, or any other outr image, and the
conception
will probably fall entirely short of her
laughable management in this dress. Both the
parties laughed heartily; and she, though
seemingly
conscious of her part in furnishing the mirth,
laughed as heartily as either. But a perplexing
doubt, that had caused him no small research when
a beardless philosopher in his native village, was
settled on this occasion in a moment. His opinions
had sometimes wandered on the question, whether
such different races as were found in different parts
of the world, could all have originated from one
common mother. He here saw at a glance, that
had there been an Eve for the races of the south
seas, she must have been as like the other of the
Scriptures, as one thing can be to another. No
peacock ever enjoyed the spreading display of his
plumage in the morning sunbeams, more fully and
more proudly, than did this uncouth being in her
own eyes, constituted a belle for the first time in
her life.
The amusement furnished by this new guest, the
plans for educating her, and training her to become
a good servant, and different views of the best way
in which to teach her English, afforded themes for
discussion, in which there was only difference
enough of opinion to give zest to the investigation.
When they finally settled upon one plan, they both
expressed the hope, that after years of residence
together, as husband and wife, they might come to
the affectionate union of sentiment upon those little
points of family discussion, which generally create
bitterness in the inverse ratio of their importance,
and create an asperity as keen as the differences
are trifling. They remarked, that she was theirs
by the most indissoluble ties, rescued by the
exposure
of their own lives, from a terrible death. She
was strong, healthful, used to the climate, seemingly
intelligent, and sweet tempered. They would so
train her, as that she should so feel the difference
between her comforts in her new condition and her
former one, as that she should prefer to remain with
them, if the alternative were in her power to return
to her former way of life. They agreed, that every
precaution should be adopted to inspire this
preference
,
and prevent the wish to escape from them.
They questioned her by signs that she
comprehended
,
from whence she came. They were only
able to make out from her gestures in the way of
reply, that she was profoundly ignorant of her
relative position at present to the place whence
she came. He doubted not, that she was an
inhabitant
of the other side of the mountains. There
was no probability, that she had ever scaled this
loftly range, or had any idea of her vicinity to that
valley. They took proper precautions, touching
the place of her sleeping the first night, that she
might not be able to escape without awakening
them. In a tone of cheerful confidence in
Providence
,
they also discussed the chances of the
return
of the defeated savages, in greater numbers, to
attack them. In view of all the deliverances that
Providence had wrought for them, they agreed
that it would argue guilty distrust and ingratitude
in them, to give way to gloomy and apprehensive
forebodings in these joyous hours. Never had
stronger sentiments of confidence and unlimited
submission been seen on human countenance, than
on that of this untaught savagess. The prospect
of enjoyment for them, in the new relation before
them, was brightened in his view, as he reflected,
that now his fair bride might relinquish the burden
of duties, which, however pleasantly she had hitherto
seemed to discharge them, could not but be tiresome
and painful to one reared as she had been. She
might now taste the Arcadian life in all its
pleasantness
.
She might read, or walk, or write, or
converse
,
as pleased her best. Her chief duties would
be those, which seemed in prospect delightful, and
furnishing pleasant occupation for her hours of
leisure; those of instructing her new subject in the
duties of civilized life, to read, and write, and to
know and practise the duties of the Christian
religion.
It was peculiarly pleasant to her, in view of
decorum
,
to have a female companion, who would
VOL. I.20
soon learn the proprieties of her relation, and who
would be the constant companion of her walks and
of her retirement, when he should be necessarily
absent. She, too, would be companion, witness,
and bridemaid, at the approaching solemnity of
the marriage; and though not exactly all that
could have been wished, was certainly a long step
above their domestic animals. It was delightful to
consider how Providence had prepared, step by
step, for their increase of comforts and enjoyments.
Anticipation of evil is a bitter evil in itself, and
imparts not the slightest strength or fortitude to
sustain
it, when it comes. In the delighted and
endearing
conversations of this evening, they cast
fears and apprehensions to the winds. They dwelt
on the conviction, that they should be as near the
innocence and enjoyment of the first pair, before
sin had entered the groves of Paradise, as any thing
that earth had seen, since that period. Nor did
they fail, before they separated, to scan with the
eye of sober morla courage, the evening of those
days, which they hoped to spend together, nor
that last solemn hour, when love, even like theirs,
must be sundered. They cheered each other with
the sure and certain hope of the renewal of virtuous
wedded love beyond the grave, and on the
everlasting
hills
.
Next day, with due solemnity, Augusta was
installed professor, and her new and delighted
pupil introduced to the duties of her noviciate.
The instructress and the pupil managed their
respective parts to a charm; and the mock gravity
on the one part, and the arch curiosity and the
inquisitive ignorance on the other, afforded a happy
variety to the uniform tenor of her former modes
of spending her time. In grateful commemoration
of the manner in which their new subject came into
their possession, they agreed to give her the name
Rescue
, which they repeated to her with great
solemnity of manner. It was difficult to preserve
it through this ceremonial; for, comprehending their
intent in a moment, she laughed, sprang into her
dancing attitudes, snapped her fingers, repeated her
former name, which, as it sounded in their ears, had
been
Mahutai
, and attempted to pronounce her new
name with such whimsical tone and emphasis, as
absolutely disconcerted the gravity of her sponsors
in this kind of domestic baptism. They gave her
to understand, that they wished to question her, if
she was willing to stay with them for ever. She
replied by flourishing both hands in repeated circles,
to imply days, or courses of the sun, and then
crossed and joined her hands, to denote the
continual
recurrence of her days of obedience. They
then inquired of her, if she had no wish to escape
from them. She replied by moving her finger
slowly in the direction of the sun from east to west,
and then pointing to the cavity in which the dead
bodies of her captors had been deposited, implying
that she would stay with them until her body should
be added to the number.
They dined this day in their usual manner, but
with a gaiety and cheerfulness of heart that no
words can reach, and which can only be imagined.
Rescue had already become an efficient servant.
What she wanted in adroitness and practice, she
more than compensated in her eager anxiety to
understand and anticipate their wants, in her good
humoured efforts to correct her errors of ignorance
and want of comprehension. When it came her
turn to dine after them, to hearts that enjoyed their
own pleasures anew in seeing them shared by
another
,
it was a still higher treat than their own had
been, to remark with what zest of devouring
appetite
Rescue attacked the remainder of the dinner.
Nor did they fail to remark upon the comfortable
circumstance in their condition, that the abundance
of the waters and the island left them no fear
of famine. They admitted, that it would have
required no large colony of such servants to have
inspired that fear with show of reason.
Augusta had often spoken, with a look of regret,
of the want of any human eye to witness their
approaching assumption of their mutual vows. He
discoursed with her on this subject as they walked
to the lake after dinner, attended by Rescue. He
promised that he would devote some time this
evening, in attempts to explain to Rescue's
understanding
,
the nature of the relation which they
contemplated, and to learn her to pronounce in
English, that she understood, and was witness to
the ceremony. Of course, after their return from a
charming promenade, in which the afternoon had
passed most pleasantly, he commenced with his
subject this evening after supper; and while Augusta
was retired to her own apartment, attempted to
make Rescue comprehend the great transactions
which were expected to take place on the morrow.
He was perplexed to find, that some of the signs
and gestures, by which he wished to explain to
Rescue his love for her mistress, the tall savagess
interpreted as a fair attempt to make love to
herself
,
which she, as a docile servant, showed no
disposition to frown upon. When she
discovered
that she had misinterpreted him in that
point, with great shrewdness she disguised her
disappointment, and made signs to him to proceed
in his explanation. Precisely at the moment, in the
approaching ceremony, when, taking each other's
hand, they should pronounce their vows, he wished
her to say, I witness. It seemed an easy word
to pronounce. But it appeared to be a shibboleth to
Rescue; nor could her master forbear thinking
that she affected more ignorance than she felt in
the case. He repeated the favourite word a hundred
times, and she as often repeated it after him, and
always with the same imperfect pronunciation as at
first. Despairing of rendering her more perfect in
her part, he repeated it a last time with emphasis,
inquiring by gesture, if she knew the proper point
of the ceremony, at which she was to pronounce the
assigned word, I witness. She nodded assent,
and after he left her to go to her rest, he heard her
still laughing, and pronouncing her word as though
it were
E wheetnee
.
The light of the following day would have
seemed charming to this happy pair, had it been a
day of clouds and storms. But it dawned in
unusual
loveliness, even for that delicious climate. The
ocean, the air, the trees, the mountains, the island,
and all nature smiled, and gave signs of gratulation.
Their birds and animals seemed to be forewarned
of the happiness reserved for the day; or, rather, the
imagination of the parties invested nature, physical
and animal, with the aspect of participation in
their happiness. They wandered, hand in hand,
through the groves. They visited the place where
he had found her; the tree under which she had
laid herself down to die, and where, with such
gentleness and tenderness of nursing, he had raised
her up. There was enough in their views of the
past to fill her eye with tears, compounded of the
pleasant and painful remembrance, and enough of
darkness in the dim prospects of the future, to blend
trembling with their joy. They discussed the
history of the past, and soberly looked forward to
the chances of the future, even to that solemn day,
when they should sink in social sleep, under the
palms that had witnessed their innocent loves, until
the day when their spirits should fly together to
scenes,
Where love and bliss immortal reign.
Their walks were plundered of the most beautiful
flowers. Wild roses and the splendid tropical
wreaths, the branches of the palm, branches of the
bread-fruit tree loaded with their fruits, and the
verdure of the most fragrant and graceful shrubs,
ornamented every part of the interior apartment.
Rescue moved briskly in this business of
preparation
.
She seemed not only to comprehend it, and
enter into it with her whole heart, but to
manifest
the usual increase in stature and importance,
natural to the female assistants on those important
occasions. That she did comprehend the object of
these preparations was obvious from various parts
of her deportment; and once, when her mistress,
in the bloom of beauty, and in all the splendour
of bridal preparation, passed her, she gently put
her arm round the neck of her mistress, and kissed
her glowing cheek, laughing the while, and
displaying
her somersets with more than ordinary
demonstrations of elasticity.
All the varieties of fruit, flesh, fish, and fowl, were
put in requisition for the bridal supper, upon which
all the skill of the parties in cookery had been
exhausted. The wine cup was graced with the
most brilliant and fragrant flowers; and they sat
down to their repast, embowered in a vegetable
splendour, to which all the glory of Solomon was
not to be compared. The altar was a pillar of
rose-coloured basalt. Cardinals, with their
purple-tufted
heads, were in cages upon one side, and pairs
of purple pigeons on the other. The favourites
among the trained animals of the bride were allowed
to make their way to the altar. The sun had
descended. The queen of the night raised her
broad pale torch from the ocean, and threw her
radiance upon the scene. The interior apartment
was brilliantly illuminated. The English Episcopal
bridal service was open on the altar. Augusta,
arrayed in all the splendour of her own taste, and
the range which her ample wardrobe allowed,
placed herself on one side of the altar, and he on
the other. Rescue sat at a little distance, her face
resting upon her hands as she sat, and her black
eyes glistening with an eagerness of intense curiosity
which can only be imagined.
He, from a paper which he had prepared for the
occasion, read a short formula of the circumstances
under which Providence had brought them
together
,
and of the reasons which, in his view,
justified
them in the sight of honour and conscience,
and the laws of heaven and earth, to unite in
marriage
.
He invoked God to witness, that he intended
to hold himself bound by all the strongest ties,
human and divine, to consider himself a lawful
wedded husband. He called upon the all-seeing
God to witness, that if they should ever leave that
island, and be again joined to society, he would
renew the marriage covenant, and render it legal
by the rites of the law, and the church, in the
most public and solemn manner; and he called
upon heaven to reward or punish him, according
to his sincerity in making those vows, and his
religious fidelity in fulfilling their obligations.
He then, in a voice trembling with emotion, read
the service. They mutually joined their hands.
The bridal ring was placed on her finger. They
mutually repeated their vows, and looked to Rescue
to utter her trained response, I witness. But,
whether she really did not understand her part, or
whether a little envy and perverseness mingled
with her thoughts on the occasion, she stretched
her neck, and exhibited either the most real, or the
best feigned ignorance, astonishment, and want of
comprehension; staring the while, and saying
nothing. Judging from her gaping and constrained
silence, that no ratification of the contract was to
be expected from any words of hers, he fell on his
knees before his bride, folded her in his arms, and
said, You are now my own wedded wife. Saying
this, he kissed away the tears of excitement and
joy, that sprung in the eyes of his bride. That
ceremony, no doubt performed with energy and
earnestness, seemed to have been uttered in a kind
of general language, well understood even by
Rescue. It was a key, that unlocked the whole
mystery she had been witnessing. She danced,
and snapped her fingers, kissed her mistress, and
laughed, uttering with ready fluency,
Me stand
thatMe wheetnee:
intimating, that all the
ceremony
,
up to that time, had been heathen Greek to
her.
END OF VOL. I.